Apnea-hypopnea indices and snoring in children diagnosed with ADHD: a matched case-control study.To measure apnea-hypopnea indices and snoring in children diagnosed with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in a case-control design. Additionally, the study design allowed us to investigate whether or not methylphenidate had any effect on breathing variables.Twenty-eight children (22 boys) aged 6-12 years meeting diagnostic criteria for Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM)-IV ADHD were studied together with matched controls. Two nights of polysomnography (PSG) were conducted that included recordings of snoring waveforms. A randomly assigned 48-h on-off medication protocol was used for ADHD children. Control children's recordings were matched for PSG night, but medication was not used. A low apnea-hypopnea index (AHI) threshold of >1 event per hour was used to define sleep-disordered breathing (SDB) because of a clinical relevance in ADHD.Categorical analyses for paired binary data showed no significant differences between control and ADHD children for presence of an AHI >1 or snoring. Variables were extracted from a significantly shorter total sleep time (67 min) on the medication night in children with ADHD. Eight (28%) control and 11 (40%) ADHD children snored >60 dB some time during the night. Methylphenidate had no effect on central apneas, AHI, desaturation events, or any snoring data.Our PSG findings show no strong link between ADHD and SDB although our findings could be limited by a small sample size. Findings from PSG studies in the literature argue both for and against an association between ADHD and SDB. Our results suggest medication is not a factor in the debate.Methylphenidate restores visual memory, but not working memory function in attention deficit-hyperkinetic disorder.Dysfunction of executive neuropsychological performance, mediated by the prefrontal cortex, has been the central focus of recent attention deficit/ hyperkinetic disorder (AD-HKD) research. The role of other potential neuropsychological "risk factors", such as recognition memory, remains understudied. Further, the impact of methylphenidate (MPH) on key neuropsychological processes in AD-HKD remains poorly understood.To compare the performance of boys with AD-HKD on a spatial working memory (SWM) task and on two non-working memory tasks [a simultaneous and delayed matching-to-sample task (DMtS) and a pattern-recognition task] with that of healthy boys, and to investigate the impact of acute and chronic MPH on performance of these tasks.Baseline performance of 75 stimulant-naive boys with AD-HKD was compared with that of 70 healthy boys. The AD-HKD boys were then re-tested following the administration of acute and chronic challenges with MPH (0.3 mg/kg and 0.6 mg/kg) under randomised double-blind placebo controlled conditions.Compared with healthy boys, the AD-HKD boys demonstrated performance deficits on all neuropsychological tasks. A single dose of MPH restored performance on the DMtS task but had no impact on the SWM or pattern-recognition tasks. Chronic MPH administration did not alter performance on the SWM task but did improve performance on both the pattern-recognition and DMtS tasks. However, the acute restorative effect of MPH on DMtS diminished with repeated administration.Our results suggest that current conceptualisations of the neuropsychological basis of AD-HKD and the proposed therapeutic mechanisms of MPH require broadening.An open-label, randomized, active-controlled equivalent trial of osmotic release oral system methylphenidate in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder in Taiwan.This study examined the efficacy and safety of osmotic release oral system methylphenidate (OROS MPH) as compared with immediate-release MPH (IR MPH) in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in Taiwan. Sixty-four children with Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th edition (DSM-IV) ADHD, ages 6-15 years, were randomized to OROS MPH once daily (n = 32) and IR MPH three times daily (n = 32) in an open, randomized, active-controlled equivalent 28-day trial. The main outcome measures included the Conner's Teacher Rating Scale -Revised: Short Form and Conner's Parent Rating Scale-Revised: Short Form, and other measures of social adjustment and side effects. Results showed significant reductions in the core ADHD symptoms, which did not differ between the two treatment groups. Compared to the IR MPH group, the OROS MPH group showed a significantly greater slope of reductions in ADHD symptoms and decline in the severity of problems at school, and with peers and parents over time. There was no difference in rates of side effect profile between the two groups. Our findings suggest that OROS MPH is superior over IR MPH in the greater magnitude of improvement over study period without increased side effects in the Chinese population.Anxiety and depression symptoms and response to methylphenidate in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder and tic disorder.This study examined response to methylphenidate in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and chronic multiple tic disorder. The primary goal was to determine if children with anxiety or depression symptoms showed a less favorable response to treatment. Subjects were 38 prepubertal children who participated in an 8-week, double-blind, placebo-controlled, methylphenidate crossover evaluation. Treatment effects were assessed with direct observations of child behavior in public school and clinic settings; rating scales completed by parents, teachers, and clinicians; and laboratory analogue tasks. There was little evidence (group data) that children with anxiety or depression symptoms responded in a clinically different manner to methylphenidate than youngsters who did not exhibit these symptoms, particularly in school observations of the core features of ADHD. Seeming differences between children with and without comorbid anxiety or depression symptoms and drug response are likely explained by differences in pretreatment levels of negativistic behaviors (i.e., symptoms of oppositional defiant disorder or conduct disorder). Methylphenidate appears to be effective for the management of ADHD behaviors in children with mild to moderate anxiety or depression symptoms; nevertheless, much research remains to be performed in this area.Once-daily OROS methylphenidate is safe and well tolerated in adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.This 8-week, open-label extension of a double-blind study reports on safety data for 171 adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) who received once-daily OROS methylphenidate (MPH) (18-72 mg/day). Headache, anorexia, and insomnia were the most frequently reported treatment-related adverse events. The incidence of adverse events was not related to dose. OROS MPH was safe and well tolerated at doses up to 72 mg/day.Attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder drugs and growth: an Italian prospective observational study.This study was conducted to assess the long-term effect of methylphenidate (MPH) or atomoxetine (ATX) on growth in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) drug-naïve children.The study was an observational, post-marketing, fourth phase study.Data on height and weight were collected at baseline and every 6 months up to 24 months.Both ATX and MPH lead to decreased height gain (assessed by means of z-scores); the effect was significantly higher for ATX than for MPH. At any time, height z-score decrease in the ATX group was higher than the corresponding decrease observed in the MPH group, but the difference was significantly relevant only during the first year of treatment. An increment of average weight was observed both in patients treated with MPH and in those treated with ATX. However, using Tanner's percentile, a subset of patients showed a degree of growth lower than expected. This negative effect was significantly higher for ATX than for MPH.We conclude that ADHD drugs show a negative effect on linear growth in children in middle term. Such effect appears more evident for ATX than for MPH.Outcomes of OROS methylphenidate compared with atomoxetine in children with ADHD: a multicenter, randomized prospective study.This community-based study was designed to evaluate treatment outcomes with OROS methylphenidate (MPH) and atomoxetine in children with attentiondeficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), as assessed by physicians and parents in a setting that resembles clinical practice. In a multicenter, prospective, open-label study, children 6 to 12 years of age with ADHD were randomized (2:1, respectively) to 3 weeks of treatment with once-daily OROS MPH or atomoxetine. Investigatorrated measures of symptoms included the ADHD Rating Scale (ADHD-RS) and the Clinical Global Impression-Improvement of Illness scale (CGI-I). Assessments were made at baseline and during a telephone interview in week 1, a clinic visit in week 2, and a final clinic visit in week 3. In total, 1323 patients received OROS MPH (n = 850) or atomoxetine (n = 473). Significant reductions from baseline in investigator-evaluated ADHD-RS scores were observed among patients receiving OROS MPH and those receiving atomoxetine. At the end of the study, mean decreases from baseline ADHD-RS scores were 20.24 for OROS MPH and 16 for atomoxetine (P < .001). Between-treatment differences appeared to increase over time (2.77, 3.44, and 4.24 at weeks 1, 2, and 3, respectively; P < .001). Treatment response (ie, 25% reduction from baseline ADHD-RS scores) was significantly greater at each evaluation for patients taking OROS MPH than for those taking atomoxetine (P < .001). Similar percentages of patients taking OROS MPH (4.8%) and atomoxetine (5.5%) withdrew because of adverse events. Although community-based studies often lack the control of randomized, placebo-controlled trials, these results nevertheless suggest greater ADHD symptom improvement with OROS MPH compared with atomoxetine.Regional brain perfusion before and after treatment with methylphenidate may be associated with the G1287A polymorphism of the norepinephrine transporter gene in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.The noradrenergic system modulates attention and arousal. Dysregulation of the noradrenergic system may be involved in the pathophysiology of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). This study intended to examine the differences in methylphenidate (MPH) treatment response and pre- and post-treatment cerebral perfusion associated with the G1287A and -3081(A/T) polymorphisms of the norepinephrine transporter (NET) gene in ADHD children. Thirty-seven drug-naïve ADHD children (8.9±1.8 years old, M=32, F=5) were genotyped. Next, baseline single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) and clinical assessments were carried out for ADHD subjects. After 8 weeks of MPH treatment, SPECT and clinical assessment were repeated. There were no differences in baseline clinical assessments or cerebral perfusion based on genotype. However, after treatment, ADHD children with the G/G genotype at the G1287A polymorphism showed more improvement in symptoms than children without the G/G genotype as evaluated by the Clinical Global Impressions-Improvement scale (p=0.022). Furthermore, ADHD children with the G/G genotype at the G1287A polymorphism showed hyperperfusion in the right inferior temporal gyrus (p<0.001, uncorrected) and middle temporal gyrus (p=0.001, uncorrected) compared to children without the G/G genotype. Although the results of this study should be interpreted cautiously, they suggest that polymorphisms of the NET gene may contribute to an intermediate phenotype. Further studies should clearly elucidate the relationship between treatment response and functional connectivity in the brain according to this genetic polymorphism.Comorbidities in ADHD children treated with methylphenidate: a database study.Methylphenidate (MPH) is the most common drug treatment of attention deficit / hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in children. Treatment with MPH is contraindicated in the presence of certain psychiatric, cerebro- and cardiovascular conditions. We assessed MPH treatment prevalence and incidence and the frequency of comorbid conditions related to these contraindications in new MPH users compared to a control group without ADHD and ADHD medication.We used health care data for the years 2004 to 2006 from the German Pharmacoepidemiological Research Database (GePaRD) which includes about 18% of the German population. MPH treatment prevalence and incidence was assessed based on at least one MPH prescription in the given year. In MPH users, the prevalence of psychiatric and other comorbidities was assessed in the quarter of the first MPH prescription and the three preceding quarters, whereas in controls it was assessed in the earliest four quarters of continuous insurance time starting at 01.01.2004 or the start of insurance if this was later. Differences in the presence of comorbid diagnoses between MPH users and controls were tested by logistic regression.In 2005, 1.5% of all children and adolescents aged 3 to 17 years (2.3% of males and 0.6% of females) received MPH in Germany. The proportion of children with a record of a psychiatric comorbidity in any of the nine ICD categories of diagnoses was substantially higher in new MPH users (83%) compared to controls (20%). Cerebro- and cardiovascular comorbidities were rare in general. Still, among new MPH users, 2% of males and females had a diagnosis of a pre-existing cardiovascular disorder but only 1.2% of controls.Besides MPH treatment prevalence we first publish age-specific incidence rates for Germany. A high proportion of children who were started on MPH had a record of a psychiatric comorbidity preceding the first prescription. Cerebro- and cardiovascular conditions were rare in the studied age range, but still higher among children who received MPH than in the control group. Results show that in a substantial subgroup of patients, comorbidities require a thorough weighting of possible risks of MPH medication against the risks of untreated ADHD.Response to methylphenidate in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder and manic symptoms in the multimodal treatment study of children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder titration trial.Recent reports raise concern that children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and some manic symptoms may worsen with stimulant treatment. This study examines the response to methylphenidate in such children.Data from children participating in the 1-month methylphenidate titration trial of the Multimodal Treatment Study of Children with ADHD were reanalyzed by dividing the sample into children with and without some manic symptoms. Two "mania proxies" were constructed using items from the Diagnostic Interview Schedule for Children (DISC) or the Child Behavior Checklist (CBCL). Treatment response and side effects are compared between participants with and without proxies.Thirty-two (11%) and 29 (10%) participants fulfilled criteria for the CBCL mania proxy and DISC mania proxy, respectively. Presence or absence of either proxy did not predict a greater or lesser response or side effects.Findings suggest that children with ADHD and manic symptoms respond robustly to methylphenidate during the first month of treatment and that these children are not more likely to have an adverse response to methylphenidate. Further research is needed to explore how such children will respond during long-term treatment. Clinicians should not a priori avoid stimulants in children with ADHD and some manic symptoms.Attention patterns in children with attention deficit disorder with or without hyperactivity.The objective of this study was to differentiate the attention patterns associated with attention deficit disorder with or without hyperactivity using continuous performance test (CPT). The diagnoses were based on the DSM-III, III-R, and IV criteria and of the 39 children who participated in the study, 14 had attention deficit disorder with hyperactivity (ADDH) and 11 had attention deficit disorder without hyperactivity (ADDWO), while 14 normal children served as a control group. Attention patterns were examined according to the performance of subjects on the CPT and parental scores on the ADHD Rating Scale, the Child Attention Profile, and the Conners Rating Scale. CPT performances were assessed before and after administration of 10 mg methylphenidate. We found as hypothesized that the CPT differentiated between the ADDH and ADDWO groups. However, contrary to our expectations, the ADDH children made more omission errors than the ADDWO children; they also showed more hyperactivity and impulsivity. The performance of both groups improved to an equal degree after the administration of methylphenidate. It is concluded that different subtypes of the attention deficit disorders are characterized by different attention profiles and that methylphenidate improves scores on test of continuous performance.Neuropharmacology of methylphenidate and a neural substrate for childhood hyperactivity.What began as a simple chemical question about the clinical utility of MPH SL measurement has led our group across a broad expanse of research endeavors, from the problem of nonintercorrelated stimulant effects to a theory of hyperactivity as a dysregulatory disorder based on frontal-striatal dysfunction or dysmaturation. The transition has been from a traditional and fairly circumscribed question in psychopharmacology to a new interest in the neuropsychological approach to hyperactivity and its treatment. Biologic psychiatry and neuropsychology have developed as distinct disciplines well insulated from one another, but a degree of cross-fertilization is beginning to occur. Rather than thinking of childhood hyperactivity in terms of vague metapsychological concepts such as "attention" or "arousal," it will be perhaps more constructive to base a model for the disorder on the foundation of known elements of brain function. Perhaps the most interesting research areas to pursue will be neuropsychological and neurodiagnostic (for example, PET). The specific locus of disorders, such as the HKS and the specific mechanisms of drug action, may not be so elusive after all.A randomized, controlled effectiveness trial of OROS-methylphenidate compared to usual care with immediate-release methylphenidate in attention deficit-hyperactivity disorder.The thrice daily dosing regimen of immediate release methylphenidate (IR-MPH) for Attention Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD) requires in-school dosing, leading to issues surrounding dispensing and storage of controlled substances by school personnel and concerns over children?s privacy and the embarrassment associated with taking medication in public at school. OROS-methylphenidate (OROS-MPH) is a once-daily controlled-release formulation of methylphenidate (MPH) developed to overcome some of the limitations associated with IR-MPH and first-generation sustained-release formulations. Randomized, controlled trials (RCTs) that focus on treatment efficacy provide the best evidence for demonstrating whether an intervention works, but under ideal conditions one cannot discount the importance of efficacy study results. However, the most useful information to clinicians comes from an effectiveness study design.To evaluate the effectiveness and tolerability of OROS-MPH versus usual care with IR-MPH in children aged 6 to 12 years with ADHD.This 8 week, multicentre, open-label study randomized 147 subjects to either once-daily OROS-MPH or usual care with IR-MPH. Subjects were titrated to a clinically effective dose of either study medication over 4 weeks and maintained on that dose for an additional 4 weeks. The SNAP-IV parent-rating scale was used to assess effectiveness.OROS-MPH showed statistically significant superiority to IR-MPH in remission rate based on the 18 ADHD symptoms (p=0.0002, X2=13.8, df=1) and severity of ADHD and ODD symptoms (p=0.004, F=8.4, df=1,127), as well as on the following secondary assessments: IOWA Conners, Conners Parent Rating Scale (short version), Parent Stress Index, (short version); Visual Analogue Scale for social play; Clinical Global Impression-Severity, Clinical Global Impression-Improvement and Parent Satisfaction with treatment. OROS-MPH and IR-MPH were both well tolerated with a similar side effect profile.Once-daily OROS-MPH is significantly more effective than usual care with IR-MPH based on multiple outcome measures including remission rate.Executive function in adolescence among children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder in Taiwan.Little is known about executive function among adolescents with a childhood diagnosis of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), and there is a lack of such information in an ethnic Chinese population. This study investigated nonverbal executive functions in adolescence among Taiwanese children with ADHD.The sample included fifty-three 11- to 16-year-old adolescents (male, 75.5%) with a childhood diagnosis of ADHD according to the DSM-IV criteria, and 53 age-, sex-, IQ-, and parental education-matched comparison adolescents. They were assessed using psychiatric interviews (mothers included), the Weschler Intelligence Scale for Children-3rd edition, and the tasks involving the executive functions of the Cambridge neuropsychological test automated battery: the spatial span, spatial working memory, intradimensional/extradimensional shifts, and stocking of Cambridge. A linear multilevel model was used for data analysis for the matched case-control study design and repeated measures within the same participants.Forty-three adolescents (81.1%) had persistent DSM-IV ADHD diagnosis. The ADHD group made more errors in the spatial span and spatial working memory, had more complete stage trials in the intradimensional/extradimensional shifts, and had fewer problems solved and shorter initial and subsequent thinking time in the stockings of Cambridge than the controls. The magnitudes of group differences increased with increased task difficulties. Persistent ADHD and methylphenidate did not make significant difference in executive functions.The findings of the authors suggest that adolescents with childhood ADHD need extra assistance when they are assigned complex tasks regardless of persistence of ADHD at adolescence.National Institute of Mental Health Multimodal Treatment Study of ADHD follow-up: 24-month outcomes of treatment strategies for attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.In the Multimodal Treatment Study of ADHD (MTA), the effects of medication management (MedMgt) and behavior modification therapy (Beh) and their combination (Comb) and usual community comparison (CC) in the treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) differed at the 14-month assessment as a result of superiority of the MTA MedMgt strategy (Comb or MedMgt) over Beh and CC and modest additional benefits of Comb over MedMgt alone. Here we evaluate the persistence of these beneficial effects 10 months beyond the 14 months of intensive intervention.Of 579 children who entered the study, 540 (93%) participated in the first follow-up 10 months after the end of treatment. Mixed-effects regression models explored possible persisting effects of the MTA medication strategy, the incremental benefits of Comb over MedMgt alone, and the possible superiority of Beh over CC on 5 effectiveness and 4 service use domains.The MTA medication strategy showed persisting significant superiority over Beh and CC for ADHD and oppositional-defiant symptoms at 24 months, although not as great as at 14 months. Significant additional benefits of Comb over MedMgt and of Beh over CC were not found. The groups differed significantly in mean dose (methylphenidate equivalents 30.4, 37.5, 25.7, and 24.0 mg/day, respectively). Continuing medication use partly mediated the persisting superiority of Comb and MedMgt.The benefits of intensive MedMgt for ADHD extend 10 months beyond the intensive treatment phase only in symptom domains and diminish over time.No elevated genomic damage in children and adolescents with attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder after methylphenidate therapy.Attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is the most frequent psychiatric disorder in children and adolescents and is often treated with methylphenidate (MPH), resulting in MPH exposure in more than 1% of all children in many countries. A 2005 report on cytogenetic effects in peripheral lymphocytes from 12 ADHD children treated for 3 months with MPH raised questions about its genetic toxicity and potential carcinogenicity. In 2007, we described no elevated micronucleus frequency in 21 children after 3 months of MPH-treatment; since the difference between the two studies could not be explained we now enlarged the overall sample size, and added a healthy control group, a new chronically treated group and positive control slides. Furthermore, micronuclei were analyzed in a second tissue, buccal mucosa.A healthy control group (23 individuals), a chronically MPH-treated (>12 months) group (21 patients), and a drug naïve group of ADHD-affected children (26 patients), which was analyzed again after 3 months (17 patients) and 6 months (11 patients), provided samples for analysis of micronucleated lymphocytes. With inclusion of 14 previously obtained blood samples, an overall group size of 31 patients was reached for the comparison of the 3 months observation time with before for micronucleated lymphocytes. For buccal mucosa cells, an additional inclusion of 10 more chronically treated patients (no lymphocytes donated) yielded sample numbers of 22 (healthy), 17 (chronically treated), 23 (ADHD drug naïve), 14 (3 months) and 11 (6 months).No significant alteration in genomic damage as seen as micronucleus frequency in peripheral lypmphocytes or buccal mucosa cells was detected after MPH treatment.No indication for genomic damage induced by MPH was obtained in this study, as in our previous study. Together with our previous study, our overall number of MPH-treated patients is now 68 (30 chronically treated, 38 prospectively followed), plus 23 healthy controls. Ongoing studies in the USA, as well as continuation of recently published epidemiological cancer incidence analysis should provide additional reassurance for MPH-treated ADHD patients.Children's self-reports on perceived effects on taking stimulant medication for ADHD.This study investigates children's views on positive and negative effects of stimulant medication for ADHD and the children's willingness to stop taking medication.Questionnaire data were collected from 79 children with ADHD and one of each child's parents.Swedish children treated with stimulants generally experienced positive treatment effects in many areas, especially in the school setting, and a majority wished to continue taking their medication. There was, however, a small group of children who reported a relatively large number of negative effects. Few differences between parents and children were found for positive effects, although parents reported higher levels of negative effects. Results also indicate that the child's knowledge of why he or she is on stimulant medication and the parent's views of medication are important factors to take into consideration as they influence the child's willingness to continue his or her medication.Catechol-O-methyltransferase valine158methionine polymorphism moderates methylphenidate effects on oppositional symptoms in boys with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.The catechol-O-methyltransferase enzyme plays a key role in the function of prefrontal cortex, accounting for most of the degradation of dopamine. Previous studies have documented the improvement of oppositional symptoms in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) patients with methylphenidate (MPH) treatment. However, the effect of the COMT gene in the response to MPH on oppositional symptoms has not been investigated.A total of 251 children with ADHD fulfilled inclusion criteria to participate in the study. Dosages of short-acting MPH were augmented until no further clinical improvement was detected or until there were significant adverse events (MPH dose always > .3 mg/kg/day). The outcome measure was the parent-rated oppositional subscale of the Swanson, Nolan and Pelham Scale-Version IV (SNAP-IV). The scale was applied by child psychiatrists blinded to genotype at baseline and in the first and third months. The COMT valine158methionine polymorphism was genotyped by polymerase chain reaction based methods.We detected significant improvement in SNAP-IV oppositional scores from baseline to the first and three months of treatment [n = 112; F(2,231) = 5.35, p = .005]. A significant effect of the presence of methionine allele in oppositional defiant disorder scores during treatment [F(1,148) = 5.02, p = .027] and a significant interaction between the methionine allele and treatment over time for the SNAP-IV oppositional scores during this period of treatment [F(2,229) = 6.40, p = .002] were both observed.These results suggest an effect of the COMT genotype on the trajectory of oppositional defiant disorder symptoms improvement with MPH treatment in boys with ADHD.Effects of methylphenidate on saccadic responses in patients with ADHD.This study examined the effects of methylphenidate on different measures of saccade control, using a repeated measurement design, and the experimental and statistical control of practice effects. Twenty-seven boys with ADHD (mean age 12.6 years, range 10-15 years) were randomly assigned to two testing order conditions (first on-, second off-medication versus first off-, second on-medication) and accomplished the pro-saccadic overlap and the anti-saccadic 200-ms gap tasks (200 trials each). Methylphenidate was found to reduce pro- and anti-saccadic reaction times, error correction times, and the proportion of direction errors during the anti-saccade task. Furthermore, the drug augmented the proportions of express saccades and error corrections. Overlain practice effects were found for most of these measures. Our results suggest a weakening of the fixation, and a strengthening of the "voluntary" system of saccade control by methylphenidate.The effect of methylphenidate on school grades in children with attention deficit disorder without hyperactivity: a preliminary report.Ten children, aged 7-12 years, were diagnosed by DSM-III criteria for attention deficit disorder (ADD) without hyperactivity. Each child was treated with methylphenidate for one academic grading period. School grades were obtained for the grading periods before, during, and after drug treatment. Correlated t tests revealed that academic performance during drug treatment was significantly superior to that during the preceding grading period (p less than .01) and the period following drug treatment (p less than .001). ADD without hyperactivity may represent a potentially drug-treatable disorder in children.The sleep of children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder on and off methylphenidate: a matched case-control study.In the present study, we assessed the effects of regular use of methylphenidate medication in children diagnosed with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) on sleep timing, duration and sleep architecture. Twenty-seven children aged 6-12 years meeting diagnostic criteria for Diagnostic and Statistical Manual version IV ADHD and 27 control children matched for age (+/-3 months) and gender. Two nights of standard polysomnographic (PSG) recordings were conducted. ADHD children were allocated randomly to an on- or 48 h off-methylphenidate protocol for first or second recordings. Control children's recordings were matched for night, but no medication was used. Mixed modelling was employed in the analyses so that the full data set was used to determine the degree of medication effects. Methylphenidate in ADHD children prolonged sleep onset by an average of 29 min [confidence interval (CI) 11.6, 46.7], reduced sleep efficiency by 6.5% (CI 2.6, 10.3) and shortened sleep by 1.2 h (CI 0.65, 1.9). Arousal indices were preserved. Relative amounts of stages 1, 2 and slow wave sleep were unchanged by medication. Rapid eye movement sleep was reduced (-2.4%) on the medication night, an effect that became non-significant when control data were incorporated in the analyses. PSG data from ADHD children off-medication were similar to control data. Our findings suggest that methylphenidate reduces sleep quantity but does not alter sleep architecture in children diagnosed with ADHD. An adequate amount of sleep is integral to good daytime functioning, thus the sleep side effects of methylphenidate may affect adversely the daytime symptoms the drug is targeted to control.Methylphenidate and somatic hallucinations.Predictive factors for persistent use and compliance of immediate-release methylphenidate: a 36-month naturalistic study.The objective of this study was to evaluate predictors of long-term adherence to treatment with methylphenidate (MPH).A total of 134 children (ages 4-16) with a diagnosis of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) determined by specific protocols, including a semistructured parent interview, Conners' Teacher/Parent Rating Scales, cognitive and learning evaluation, and child self-reports for anxiety and depression, were assessed monthly for up to 36 months. At the end of the study (36 months), three outcomes were evaluated (continuing medication, medication withdrawn due to functional remission, and medication withdrawn for other reasons including poor compliance). Outcomes were first analyzed by mean of the chi-squared test, Mann-Whitney-U test, or t-test, and predictive models were subsequently generated using Cox proportional hazards model analysis. Age, ADHD subtype, co-morbidity, cognitive functioning, side effects, and family and social characteristics were considered as independent variables.Thirty-six months after starting MPH, 62 children (46%) were still on treatment, 32 (24%) had stopped MPH due to functional remission, and 40 (30%) had suspended MPH for other reasons. Within the last group, 20 suspended for poor compliance, 10 for decrease of efficacy, 5 for side effects, and 5 because they entered in an atomoxetine clinical trial. The presence of associated disorders, younger age, female gender, and not living with both parents were predictors for continuing medication until end of the study (36 months); absence of associated disorders and older age were predictors of discontinuation medication due to functional remission before the end of study, older age, and hyperactive subtype were predictors of discontinuing medication for other reasons.Clinical outcome of ADHD treatment is heterogeneous: Specific clinical and social predictive parameters for long-term MPH use and compliance can be identified. An accurate tailoring of clinical intervention to the individual child appears crucial for good outcome.Fitness level and gross motor performance of children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder.The purpose of this study was to assess fitness and gross motor performance of children with ADHD, including users and nonusers of methylphenidate medication. Seventy boys took part in the study. Fitness level of children with ADHD using medication or not, including body composition, flexibility, and muscular endurance, was similar to that of a control group. The only difference was observed for body mass index, which was lower in children with ADHD using medication. Aerobic capacity was also similar when measured by a treadmill test. A lower performance was observed when aerobic capacity was estimated using a field shuttle test, however, suggesting that the methodology used is important. Finally, both groups of children with ADHD presented significantly lower scores for locomotion skills.[Visual hallucinations caused by methylphenidate].Efficacy of methylphenidate for attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder in children with tic disorder.The findings from case reports and patient questionnaire surveys have been interpreted as indicating that administration of stimulants is ill-advised for the treatment of attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder in children with tic disorder.Thirty-four prepubertal children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder and tic disorder received placebo and three dosages of methylphenidate hydrochloride (0.1, 0.3, and 0.5 mg/kg) twice daily for 2 weeks each, under double-blind conditions. Treatment effects were assessed using direct observations of child behavior in a simulated (clinic-based) classroom and using rating scales completed by the parents, teachers, and physician.Methylphenidate effectively suppressed hyperactive, disruptive, and aggressive behavior. There was no evidence that methylphenidate altered the severity of tic disorder, but it may have a weak effect on the frequency of motor (increase) and vocal (decrease) tics.Methylphenidate appears to be a safe and effective treatment for attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder in the majority of children with comorbid tic disorder.Effect of methylphenidate on motivation in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.The effects of methylphenidate (MPH) on motivation were examined using a progressive ratio (PR) task in children who were prescribed MPH for the treatment of ADHD. Twenty-one children, 7 to 12 years of age, completed two test sessions, one under the effects of medication and one not. During each session, children pressed a lever to earn nickel reinforcers, where the first press resulted in a reinforcer and 10 additional presses were required for each subsequent reinforcer. Children on MPH had a significantly higher breakpoint than when off medication. This MPH-associated increase in the breakpoint manifested as a significant decrease in the interresponse times (IRT). Further, MPH administration resulted in a significant decrease in IRT variability. In contrast, MPH administration had no significant effects on the means and variability of postreinforcement pause duration. These results suggest that MPH increased motivation in children being treated for ADHD. Further, the inability of MPH to significantly reduce postreinforcement pause duration while simultaneously decreasing IRTs suggests that while MPH may increase motivation to perform an ongoing task, it may have little effect on the initiation of that task.Allergic contact dermatitis caused by methylphenidate.Bupropion versus methylphenidate in the treatment of children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder: randomized double-blind study.To compare the safety and efficacy of bupropion with methylphenidate in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).In a 6-week randomized double-blind study, 44 patients with a DSM-IV-TR diagnosis of ADHD were randomly assigned to receive bupropion 100-150 mg/day (100 mg/day for <30 kg and 150 mg/day for >30 kg) or methylphenidate 20-30 mg/day. Symptoms were assessed using Teacher and Parent Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder Rating Scale-IV (ADHD-RS-IV) at baseline and weeks 3 and 6.Forty patients had at least one post-baseline measurement, and 38 patients completed the trial. No significant difference was found between the two groups on the Parent and Teacher ADHD-RS-IV scores ([F(1, 38) = 0.266, p = 0.609] and [F(1, 38) = 0.001, p = 0.972], respectively). By week 6, 18 patients (90%) in each group achieved response on the Parent scale (Fisher's exact test p-value = 1.0). With the Teacher ADHD-RS-IV used, eight (40%) patients in the bupropion group and 12 (60%) patients in the methylphenidate group achieved response by week 6 (χ(2) (1) = 1.600, p = 0.206). Headache was observed more frequently in the methylphenidate group. Frequency of other side effects was not significantly different between the two groups.Bupropion has a comparable safety and efficacy profile with methylphenidate in children and adolescents with ADHD.Does switching from oral extended-release methylphenidate to the methylphenidate transdermal system affect health-related quality-of-life and medication satisfaction for children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder?To evaluate health-related quality of life (HRQL) and medication satisfaction after switching from a stable dose of oral extended-release methylphenidate (ER-MPH) to methylphenidate transdermal system (MTS) via a dose-transition schedule in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).In a 4-week, multisite, open-label study, 171 children (164 in the intent-to-treat [ITT] population) aged 6-12 years diagnosed with ADHD abruptly switched from a stable dose of oral ER-MPH to MTS nominal dosages of 10, 15, 20, and 30 mg using a predefined dose-transition schedule. Subjects remained on the scheduled dose for the first week, after which the dose was then titrated to an optimal effect. The ADHD Impact Module-Children (AIM-C), a disease-specific validated HRQL survey instrument measuring child and family impact, was used to assess the impact of ADHD symptoms on the lives of children and their families at baseline and study endpoint. Satisfaction with MTS use was assessed via a Medication Satisfaction Survey (MSS) at study endpoint. Both the AIM-C and MSS were completed by a caregiver (parent/legally authorized representative). Tolerability was monitored by spontaneous adverse event (AE) reporting.AIM-C child and family HRQL mean scores were above the median possible score at baseline and were further improved at endpoint across all MTS doses. Similar improvements were noted for behavior, missed doses, worry, and economic impact AIM-C item scores. Overall, 93.8% of caregivers indicated a high level of satisfaction with their child's use of the study medication. The majority of treatment-emergent AEs (> 98%) were mild to moderate in intensity, and the most commonly reported AEs included headache, decreased appetite, insomnia, and abdominal pain. Seven subjects discontinued the study due to intolerable AEs (n = 3) and application site reactions (n = 4).This study demonstrates that MTS, when carefully titrated to optimal dose, may further improve child and family HRQL, as well as behavioral, medication worry, and economic impact item scores, as measured by the AIM-C in subjects switching to MTS from a stable dose of routinely prescribed oral ER-MPH after a short treatment period. Furthermore, following the abrupt conversion from oral ER-MPH to MTS, the majority of caregivers reported being highly satisfied with MTS as a treatment option for their children with ADHD.NCT00151983.Effects of methylphenidate on early adolescent growth.Thirty-one hyperactive adolescents treated with methylphenidate for at least 6 months demonstrated no significant deviation from expected height and weight growth velocities. In contrast to findings in prepubertal children, these results suggest that early adolescent growth is insensitive to methylphenidate.Sleep and daytime sleepiness in methylphenidate medicated and un-medicated children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Excessive daytime sleepiness due to any cause can result in various symptoms similar to those used for the diagnosis of attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). A common treatment for children diagnosed with ADHD is methylphenidate which is also used to treat excessive daytime sleepiness. This paper reports on a study which compared the perceived levels of daytime sleepiness and prevalence of sleep disorders in medicated and un-medicated children with ADHD.The sample consisted of two matched groups of children who had been formally diagnosed with ADHD. One group (n=12) was taking immediate release methylphenidate twice daily, while the other group (n=11) had never, and were not currently, taking any medication. The two groups, as well as their parents, rated their levels of daytime sleepiness at three points in a single day.Significantly higher levels of daytime sleepiness were reported by the parents of the un-medicated children between the hours of 13:00 and 15:00, compared to the medicated children. The medicated children became increasingly sleepier from the first to the second measurement in both the morning and afternoon. There was no significant difference in the number of sleep disorders/disruptions reported by the parents of either group.In a group of children with ADHD taking methylphenidate, there was a significant increase in sleepiness a few hours after taking the medication, which may then have a significant impact on their learning. The data also imply that part of the mechanism of action of methylphenidate effects in these children may be by reduction of daytime sleepiness.[A pilot study of methylphenidate and parent training in the treatment of children with attention-deficit hiperactivity disorder].This study gives information about a parent training program and a clinical trial with a stimulant drug (methylphenidate) to reduce the symptoms of attention deficit hiperactivity disorder (ADHD) in a group of children in Venezuela.24 children, aged between 6 and 10 years and diagnosed as having ADHD, identified in ADHD screening days, were randomly assigned to two groups of treatment: parent training and a stimulant drug (methylphenidate).Both groups showed an improvement in their symptoms, to different degrees, after treatment. The differences were statistically significant, as evaluated by their parents, regarding the symptoms of inattention, hyperactivity and impulsivity. The teachers observed a significant improvement for the medication group with respect to the symptoms of hyperactivity and impulsivity, but no change in the inattention, whilst in the parent training group there was only significant difference in the ADHD index. There was no difference in the effectiveness of the two types of treatment.When the two programs of treatment were compared it was observed that both parent training and psychostimulant medication were effective in reducing the symptoms of ADHD. Although there was no difference in the effectiveness of the two programs, there was a tendency for medication to be more effectiveMethylphenidate treatment in pediatric patients with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder and comorbid trichotillomania: a preliminary report.Trichotillomania (TTM) is a heterogenic mental disorder with a high rate of comorbidity and stressful life events (SLEs). Serotonergic and dopaminergic dysfunction are implicated in the pathophysiology of TTM. As in other impulse control disorders, increased prevalence of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is reported in patients with TTM as well. This study aimed to assess the efficacy and tolerability of methylphenidate (MPH) treatment in children and adolescents who met the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition, criteria for both ADHD and TTM.Nine children and adolescents, aged 6 to 18 years, diagnosed with ADHD and TTM, were treated with MPH for a 12-week period. The severity of ADHD was assessed using the ADHD Rating Scale, and the hair pulling was rated using the Massachusetts General Hospital Hair-Pulling Scale. Additional scales were used for assessing depression and anxiety levels, and history of SLE was recorded.Significant improvement was detected in ADHD after MPH treatment (P < 0.003), but no significant change was observed in hair pulling, as measured by the Massachusetts General Hospital Hair-Pulling Scale (P = 0.096) or in depression and anxiety levels. Lack of response of TTM to MPH (improvement, <50%) was associated with higher rate of positive SLE history (P = 0.047).Some efficacy of MPH treatment was shown in TTM patients with low rate of SLE. A large-scale study is mandatory to evaluate the efficacy of MPH for TTM in ADHD/TTM patients.Combining carbamazepine, neuroleptics and acetylcholinesterase inhibitors with methylphenidate only reduces adverse side effects, but is less effective than a combination with atomoxetine.A report of two cases of sexual side effects with OROS methylphenidate.Case Report: Testicular failure possibly associated with chronic use of methylphenidate.Methylphenidate is a commonly prescribed treatment for attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). However, little is known about its adverse effects on the male reproductive system. We report a 20-year-old male patient whose chief complaint was of delayed puberty. He spoke in a high-pitched voice and complained of lack of body hair, impaired libido, inadequate erectile function, chronic fatigue, and low energy. He had been treated with methylphenidate as an infant and had continued treatment for 17 years. On examination, the patient was lean and visibly lacked facial or body hair. He further explained that he had never been able to grow underarm or facial hair and that he was often mistakenly considered a young teenager rather than a 20-year-old. The patient's genitalia were categorized as Tanner Stage 2. Laboratory studies confirmed low serum follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH), luteinizing hormone (LH), and testosterone levels. The patient was given exogenous testosterone supplementation with pellets and human chorionic gonadotropin to maintain testicular size. After 4 months his symptoms improved and he demonstrated signs of puberty. Our goal is to further elucidate the possible impact of methylphenidate on the male reproductive system. Long-term tolerability of the methylphenidate transdermal system in pediatric attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder: a multicenter, prospective, 12-month, open-label, uncontrolled, phase III extension of four clinical trials.Short-term treatment with the meth-ylphenidate transdermal system (MTS) has been well tolerated in several clinical trials in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). However, the effects of long-term use have not been systematically evaluated.The primary objective of this study was to assess the 12-month tolerability of MTS in children with ADHD. Effectiveness was a secondary objective.This Phase III study was a multicenter, 12-month, open-label, flexible-dose extension of 4 previous trials. In those studies, children aged 6 to 12 years with a diagnosis of ADHD (Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition, Text Revision criteria) received MTS, osmotic-release oral system methylphenidate, or placebo. At entry into the present study, the children either continued to receive their optimal dose of MTS (10, 15, 20, or 30 mg per 9-hour patch wear time) or underwent dose titration over 4 weeks to an optimal MTS dose, which was continued for the remainder of the study. Tolerability was evaluated based on adverse events (AEs), physical examinations, vital signs, electrocardiograms, laboratory tests, the Children's Sleep Habits Questionnaire, and the occurrence of application-site reactions.Of 327 enrolled subjects, 326 received treatment and 157 completed the study. The majority of enrolled subjects were male (64.8%) and white (73.7%), with a mean (SD) age of 9.2 (1.9) years. Two hundred sixty-five (81.3%) of the 326 subjects who received MTS reported AEs. AEs led to study discontinuation in 29 subjects (8.9%). The majority (98.3%) of treatment-emergent AEs were of mild or moderate severity. The most common AEs were decreased appetite (24.8%), headache (16.6%), upper respiratory tract infection (12.3%), cough (11.7%), pyrexia (10.1%), and decreased weight (10.1%). Of the 1118 AEs, 40.8% were considered possibly or probably related to study treatment. Three serious AEs (facial contusion, ankle fracture, and syncope) occurred and were considered unrelated to study treatment. Based on data collected across all study visits, application-site reactions generally consisted of mild erythema associated with mild discomfort at the patch site. Application-site reactions accounted for 22 (6.7%) study discontinuations.Slightly less than half (48.0%) of subjects completed this 12-month, open-label extension study of MTS. Most AEs were mild to moderate in severity and, with the exception of application-site reactions, were typical of those previously observed with methylphenidate. ClinicalTrials.gov identifier: NCT00151957.Ningdong granule: a complementary and alternative therapy in the treatment of attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is a common neurobehavioral and neuropsychiatric disorder in school-age children, and recent studies provide evidence implicating the metabolic abnormalities of dopamine (DA) for its pathophysiology. Methylphenidate, a kind of psychostimulant, is widely used in the treatment of ADHD, but some patients do not respond to it or cannot bear its side effects. As a traditional Chinese medicine preparation, Ningdong granule (NDG) has been used in the treatment of ADHD for several years in China. However, a systematical pharmacological study on its safety and mechanism still remains obscure.This paper aims to evaluate the efficiency, safety, and possible mechanism of NDG on ADHD children compared to methylphenidate.Seventy-two ADHD children were recruited to perform an 8-week, randomized, methylphenidate-controlled, doubled-blinded trial. The subjects were equally assigned to two groups receiving either NDG 5 mg/kg/day or methylphenidate 1 mg/kg/day for 8 weeks. The efficiency was assessed by the Teacher and Parent ADHD Rating Scales every 2 weeks for a total of 8 weeks. The side effects were recorded during the study. Blood, urine, and stool routine samples, liver and renal function test, and DA and homovanillic acid (HVA) concentration in sera were tested at the beginning and end of the trial.NDG ameliorated ADHD symptoms after an 8-week medication with fewer side effects compared to methylphenidate (P < 0.05). The result also showed NDG to be safe and tolerable for ADHD children as monitored by the blood, urine, and stool analysis and liver and renal function for 8 weeks (P < 0.05). Moreover, the level of HVA in sera increased in NDG-treated group (P < 0.05), while the content of DA had no significant change during the study. An analysis of Pearson correlation coefficients also showed that the increased content of HVA in sera was associated with the improved scores of Teacher and Parent ADHD Rating Scales.Compared to methylphenidate, NDG is effective and safe for ADHD children in the short term, increases the HVA concentration in sera to regulate DA metabolism, and promises to be an alternative medication, safely and effectively.Methylphenidate, interstimulus interval, and reaction time performance of children with attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder: a pilot study.Thirteen children with attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD: DSM-IV-TR) participated in the pilot study. They carried out a Go/No-Go test with a short (2 seconds) and long (6 seconds) interstimulus interval (ISI) when on placebo and a therapeutic dose of methylphenidate (MPH). For the long-ISI placebo condition the responses were slow and inaccurate. This pattern of response may be due to underactivation of the readiness-to-respond state that is not fully controlled by effort allocation. Speed of response and accuracy were enhanced during the short-ISI placebo condition and the long-ISI MPH condition. However, the combined effect (short ISI and MPH) resulted in a fast but inaccurate response style. This pattern of response may be due to overactivation of the readiness-to-respond state. The data of the pilot study support the stimulus shift hypothesis: MPH administration result in deterioration on tests on which children had previously done well (short ISI plus placebo versus short ISI plus MPH). In addition, the data support the idea that ADHD is associated with poor state regulation rather than motivational (delay aversion) theories or temporal-processing/time-estimation theories of ADHD. The pilot study defined empirically an issue for further study with the larger controlled sample.[Cardiovascular side effects secondary to treatment with methylphenidate].A preliminary study on the effect of methylphenidate on motor performance in children with comorbid DCD and ADHD.Attention Deficit Hyperactive Disorder (ADHD) and Developmental Coordination Disorder (DCD) are two developmental disorders with considerable comorbidity. The impact of Methylphenidate (MPH) on ADHD symptoms is well documented. However, the effects of MPH on motor coordination are less studied. We assessed the influence of MPH on motor performance of children with comorbid DCD and ADHD. Participants were 18 children (13 boys, mean age 8.3 years) diagnosed with comorbid DCD and ADHD. A structured clinical interview (K-SADS-PL) was used to determine psychopathology and the Movement Assessment Battery for Children-Checklist were used to determine criterion for motor deficits. The Movement Assessment Battery for Children (M-ABC) was administrated to all participants once under the influence of MPH and once under a placebo pill condition. The motor tests were administered on two separate days in a double-blinded design. Participants' motor performance with MPH was significantly superior to their performance in the placebo condition. Significant improvement was observed in all the M-ABC sub-tasks except for static balance performance. The findings suggest that MPH improves motor coordination in children with comorbid DCD and ADHD but clinically significant improvement was found in only 33% of the children.ADHD treatment with once-daily OROS methylphenidate: interim 12-month results from a long-term open-label study.Few treatment studies of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) extend beyond a few months. This article reports an interim analysis of a 24-month study evaluating the 12-month tolerability and effectiveness of a once-daily OROS formulation of methylphenidate (OROS MPH) in children with ADHD.Children, aged 6-13 years, with ADHD who participated in previous controlled studies and were MPH responders, received once-daily OROS MPH in this multicenter, open-label, nonrandomized study. Effectiveness was evaluated monthly by parents/caregivers and schoolteachers using validated rating scales (e.g., IOWA Conners). Safety and adverse events assessments involved objective (e.g., vital signs, growth) and subjective (sleep quality, tics) reporting.Seventy-one percent of subjects (289/407) completed 12 months' treatment. Effectiveness was maintained throughout 12 months as demonstrated by stable IOWA Conners ratings and sustained improvements in peer interaction and Global Assessment Scale scores. OROS MPH was well tolerated, with adverse events similar to those expected with short-acting stimulant medication. OROS MPH had minimal impact on sleep quality and tics. There were no clinically meaningful changes in blood pressure, pulse, or height. The apparent absence of meaningful changes is tempered by the fact that children were MPH responders and were medicated at baseline, most for extended periods prior to enrollment.In this open-label study, once-daily OROS MPH treatment appears to be well tolerated and effectiveness was maintained for up to 12 months in these children with ADHD.Methylphenidate response in aggressive and nonaggressive ADHD children: distinctions on laboratory measures of symptoms.Response to a single, 5-mg dose of methylphenidate was compared in aggressive and nonaggressive attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) children using objective measures of inattention, impulsivity, and activity level. After medication, both ADHD groups had a significant decrease in inattention, whereas impulsivity remained unchanged. Activity level decreased only in the nonaggressive ADHD group. Unmedicated normal controls showed no change on any measure. These results support the hypothesis that aggressive and nonaggressive ADHD children have somewhat different underlying determinants for some of their symptoms. In addition, they suggest that inattention, impulsivity, and overactivity may be mediated by partially distinct neural mechanisms.Bone mineral density and turnover in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder receiving methylphenidate.Attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is the most common behavior disorder among children; methylphenidate is a drug frequently prescribed for the control of its symptoms. One of the potential side effects of methylphenidate that concerns parents is its impact on the growth of children, since the mechanism by which methylphenidate might influence growth is not known. As linear growth is associated with an increase in bone mineral density and turnover, this study was undertaken to evaluate bone mineral density by dual photon absorptiometry and bone turnover by measuring serum bone-specific alkaline phosphatase and the urinary deoxypyridinoline excretion rate in children treated with methylphenidate for 1 to 2 years as compared to a control group. There were no significant differences in bone mineral density at either the lumbar spine or femoral neck in the study group (0.662 +/- 0.04 and 0.735 +/- 0.07 g/cm2, respectively) as compared to the controls (0.675 +/- 0.05 g/cm2 and 0.734 +/- 0.07 g/cm2, respectively). Furthermore, there were no significant differences in serum bone-specific alkaline phosphatase in the study group (58 +/- 22 U/L) as compared to the control children (71 +/- 34 U/L) or in urinary deoxypyridinoline in the study group (34 +/- 38 nM/mM), as compared to the control group (27 +/- 12 nM/mM). In conclusion, our data do not support a significant effect of methylphenidate on bone mineral density turnover in children when used for 1 to 2 years.Catechol-O-methyltransferase Val158Met polymorphism is associated with methylphenidate response in ADHD children.Methylphenidate is the most frequently prescribed drug in the treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) but it is not effective in every case. Therefore, identifying genetic and/or biological markers predicting drug-response is increasingly important. Here we present a case-control study and pharmacogenetic association analyses in ADHD investigating three dopaminergic polymorphisms. Previous studies suggested variable number of tandem repeats (VNTR) in the dopamine D4 receptor (DRD4) and the dopamine transporter (DAT1) genes as genetic risk factors for ADHD and as possible markers of methylphenidate response. Our results did not indicate substantial involvement of these two VNTRs in ADHD, however, both the case-control and the pharmacogenetic analyses showed significant role of the high activity Val-allele of cathecol-O-methyltransferase (COMT) Val158Met polymorphism in our ADHD population. The Val-allele was more frequent in the ADHD group (n = 173) compared to the healthy population (P = 0.016). The categorical analysis of 90 responders versus 32 non-responders showed an association between the Val-allele or Val/Val genotype and good methylphenidate response (P = 0.009 and P = 0.034, respectively). Analyzing symptom severity as a continuous trait, significant interaction of COMT genotype and methylphenidate was found on the Hyperactivity-Impulsivity scale (P = 0.044). Symptom severity scores of all three genotype groups decreased following methylphenidate administration (P < 0.001), however Val/Val homozygote children had significantly less severe symptoms than those with Met/Met genotype after treatment (P = 0.015). This interaction might reflect the regulatory effect of COMT dominated prefrontal dopamine transmission on subcortical dopamine systems, which are the actual site of methylphenidate action.Effects of atomoxetine and methylphenidate on sleep in children with ADHD.This study compared the effects of atomoxetine and methylphenidate on the sleep of children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). This study also compared the efficacy of these medications for treating ADHD in these children.Randomized, double-blind, crossover trial.Two sleep disorders centers in the United States; 1 in a private-practice setting and 1 in a hospital setting.85 children diagnosed with ADHD.Twice-daily atomoxetine and thrice-daily methylphenidate, each for approximately 7 weeks.Relative to baseline, the actigraphy data indicated that methylphenidate increased sleep-onset latency significantly more than did atomoxetine (39.2 vs 12.1 minutes, p < .001). These results were consistent with the polysomnography data. Child diaries indicated that it was easier to get up in the morning, it took less time to fall asleep, and the children slept better with atomoxetine, compared with methylphenidate. Parents reported that it was less difficult getting their children up and getting them ready in the morning and that the children were less irritable, had less difficulty getting ready for bed, and had less difficulty falling asleep with atomoxetine, compared with methylphenidate. There were no significant differences between medications using the main measures of efficacy for ADHD treatment. Atomoxetine was superior on some secondary ADHD treatment-efficacy measures, based on parent reports. The only significant differences in treatment-emergent adverse events were greater incidence of decreased appetite and greater incidence of insomnia with methylphenidate.Patients receiving twice-daily atomoxetine had shorter sleep-onset latencies, relative to thrice-daily methylphenidate, based on objective actigraphy and polysomnography data. Although both medications decreased nighttime awakenings, the decrease was greater for methylphenidate.Retrospective comparison of Adderall and methylphenidate in the treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.Methylphenidate is the most frequently prescribed stimulant medication for the treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). However, the short duration of action of methylphenidate requires that patients take multiple daily doses for optimal efficacy. Recent studies suggest that Adderall, a psychostimulant indicated for the treatment of ADHD, may provide an efficacious, less frequently dosed alternative to methylphenidate. This retrospective review compares the efficacy, safety, dosing frequency, and medication switch rates of Adderall with methylphenidate in children and adolescents with ADHD treated in a private, outpatient psychiatric clinic. Of the evaluable patients, 54 received Adderall, and 75 received methylphenidate. No statistically significant differences were noted between Adderall and methylphenidate in efficacy or safety parameters. Fewer patients receiving Adderall required twice daily, thrice daily, or in-school dosing than those receiving methylphenidate (p < 0.001). During the initial 6-month treatment period, patients treated with Adderall were less likely to switch medications than those receiving methylphenidate (p = 0.0002). In this analysis, Adderall and methylphenidate provided comparable efficacy and safety in children and adolescents with ADHD. The use of Adderall allowed patients to extend their dosing interval and reduced the need for in-school dosing, a measure that may substantially influence compliance.Predictors of weight loss in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder treated with stimulant medication.A retrospective study was undertaken to examine predictors of weight loss in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) treated with stimulant medication.Children diagnosed with ADHD and treated with methylphenidate hydrochloride (MPH) or dextroamphetamine sulfate (DEX) for at least 5 months were identified by retrospective chart review. Analyses were performed on 32 children (29 boys) treated with MPH and 28 children (25 boys) treated with DEX. Variables examined included pretreatment weight, pretreatment body mass index (BMI), duration of treatment, total daily dose, and weight-adjusted dose.The MPH-treated group was initially seen at a mean age (+/- standard deviation) of 7.5 years (+/- 2.1). Mean duration of follow-up was 11.2 months (+/- 3.8). Mean total daily dose was 25.5 mg (+/- 8.2) and mean weight-adjusted dose was 1.0 mg/kg/day (+/- .5). Mean change in weight as expressed in z scores was -0.4 SD (+/- .7). The DEX-treated group was initially seen at a mean age of 9.3 years (+/- 2.7). Mean duration of follow-up was 10.8 months (+/- 4.1). Mean total daily dose was 14.9 mg (+/- 8.2) and mean weight-adjusted dose was .5 mg/kg/day (+/- .3). Mean change in weight was -0.6 SD (+/- .6). Although the MPH group was younger than the DEX group, there were no between-group differences in weight or height either before treatment or at follow-up when adjusted for age and gender. Using linear regression analysis, significant correlations were found between pretreatment weight and change in weight for both the MPH-treated group (r = .63) and the DEX-treated group (r = .47). Stepwise multiple-regression analysis indicated that pretreatment age, weight-adjusted dose, and duration of follow-up did not significantly contribute to the variance in change of weight for either the MPH- or DEX-treated groups. To adjust for height, changes in BMI were also analyzed. For both medication groups, no differences were found between the heavier (BMI > or = 50%) and thinner (BMI < 50%) children in duration of follow-up, total daily dose, or weight-adjusted dose. When the medication groups were combined, a greater proportion of heavier children experienced a decrease relative to their predicted BMI compared with thinner children (80% vs 52%). Comparisons of mean BMI slopes revealed that the heavier group experienced an absolute decrease in their BMI (-.139) in contrast to the thinner group (+.014) (t = 2.70).Pretreatment weight, adjusted for age, gender, and height, is a significant predictor of weight loss in children with ADHD treated with either MPH or DEX. In contrast, pretreatment age, duration of treatment, and weight-adjusted dose were not found to be significant predictors.Long-term effects of short-acting methylphenidate on growth rates of children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder at Queen Sirikit National Institute of Child Health.Methylphenidate (MPH) is generally considered to be first-line treatment for the core symptoms of Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD). Long-term administration of MPH in childhood may have adverse effects on growth.To determine the effect of long-term, short-acting MPH medication on growth.A retrospective descriptive study was employed by gathering the data of patients who were diagnosed as ADHD by child psychiatrists at the child and adolescent clinic, Queen Sirikit National Institute of Child Health. Subjects were patients received the first dose of short-acting methylphenidate from January 1st 2000 to December 31st 2007 and continued medication for at least 1 year. Data about height and weight were reviewed at the beginning of short-acting MPH medication, 6 months (mo), 1 yr, 2 yr, 3 yr, 4 yr, 5 yr, 6 yr and 7 yr interval. Collecting data was interpreted with INMU-Nutri Stat software program. Paired t-test was used to compare Z score of height and weight at different time points.There were 96 cases in the present study; the ratio of male to female was 3.6: 1. The first dose of short-acting methylphenidate was started at an average age of 8.62 +/- 1.70 years. Average drug dose ranged from 0.41-0.49 mg/kg/day. The data evaluated at 6 mo, 1 year 2 years, 3 years, 4 years and 5 years after drug use found that weight was not affected. Height decreased at 6 mo. after drug use (p < 0.05) but long-term treatment was not statistically significant.Prolonged medication with short-acting MPH has shown to have minimal impact on height only at the first 6 months; however, catch up growth was detected during adolescent period.Task demands interact with the single and combined effects of medication and contingencies on children with ADHD.To investigate single and combined effects of stimulant medication and contingencies on the performance of ADHD children with tasks involving different cognitive demands.Children diagnosed with ADHD participated in a within-subjects design. At two separate sessions, children on either medication or placebo (administered in a double-blind fashion) completed two tasks, a match-to-sample task and a stop-signal task, under three conditions (reward, response cost, and no contingency) in a counterbalanced order.Contingencies and medication administered singly improved performance on both tasks. For the match-to-sample task, the combination of medication and contingencies was more efficacious than either alone. For the stop-signal task, the combination of medication and reward was no more effective than either alone; however, medication and response cost combined was more effective than either treatment alone.Results suggest that both medication and contingencies improve task performance. The findings suggest that task demands interact with single and combined treatment effects.Prospective, naturalistic study of open-label OROS methylphenidate treatment in Chinese school-aged children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is one of the most common mental disorders during childhood, characterized by the core symptoms of hyperactivity, impulsivity and inattention and puts great burden on children themselves, their families and the society. Osmotic release oral system methylphenidate (OROS-MPH) is a once-daily controlled-release formulation developed to overcome some of the limitations associated with immediate-release methylphenidate (IR-MPH). It has been marketed in China since 2005 but still lacks data from large-sample clinical trials on efficacy and safety profiles. The aim of this study was to evaluate the effectiveness and safety of OROS-MPH in children aged 6 to 16 years with ADHD under naturalistic clinical setting.This 6-week, multi-center, prospective, open-label study enrolled 1447 ADHD children to once-daily OROS-MPH (18 mg, 36 mg or 54 mg) treatment. The effectiveness measures were parent-rated Inattention and Overactivity With Aggression (IOWA) Conners I/O and O/D subscales, physician-rated CGI-I and parent-rated global efficacy assessment scale. Blood pressure, pulse rate measurement, adverse events (AEs) and concomitant medications and treatment review were conducted by the investigator and were served as safety measures.A total of 1447 children with ADHD (mean age (9.52 ± 2.36) years) were enrolled in this trial. Totally 96.8% children received an OROS-MPH modal dose of 18 mg, 3.1% with 36 mg and 0.1% with 54 mg at the endpoint of study. The parent IOWA Conners I/O score at the end of week 2 showed statistically significant (P < 0.001) improvement with OROS-MPH (mean: 6.95 ± 2.71) versus the score at baseline (10.45 ± 2.72). The change in the parent IOWA Conners O/D subscale, CGI-I and parent-rated global efficacy assessment scale also supported the superior efficacy for OROS-MPH treatment. Fewer than half of 1447 patients (511(35.3%)) reported AEs, and the majority of the events reported were mild (68.2%). No serious adverse events were reported during the study.This open-label, naturalistic study provides further evidence of effectiveness and safety of OROS-MPH in school-aged children under routine practice.Acute focal dystonic reaction after acute methylphenidate treatment in an adolescent patient.[Methylphenidate and sleep: Results of a multicentre study on a population of children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder].The attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is the most common neuro-behavioural disorder in children and adolescents. Methylphenidate (MPH) is the drug most often used in the treatment of this disorder. It is important to know the effects methylphenidate can have on sleep due to the repercussions that insufficient sleep can have on the behaviour and cognitive function of children and adolescents.The purpose of this study was to find out the repercussions that methylphenidate can have on sleep, using a questionnaire.This is a multicentre study in which six hospitals in the Valencian Community took part. All those patients who were diagnosed with ADHD over a period of 6 months were given a questionnaire, before starting treatment, and after three months of this treatment. The questionnaire was a version of the Paediatric Sleep Questionnaire. The differences found were analysed.A total of 114 children were studied. Significant differences were found in the questions associated with enuresis, somnambulism and night-wakings, these sleep disorders decreasing after starting the treatment. The rest of variables did not show any changes.According to our results we can say that the MPH not only does not make worse the sleep, but that it improves the quality of the sleep in those patients with sleep disorders.Atomoxetine and methylphenidate treatment in children with ADHD: a prospective, randomized, open-label trial.To assess the comparability of atomoxetine, a new therapy for attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and methylphenidate. (Atomoxetine was originally called tomoxetine. The name was recently changed in order to avoid any potential confusion with tamoxifen that might lead to errors in dispensing drug.)Children with ADHD were randomized to open-label atomoxetine or methylphenidate for 10 weeks. Response was assessed with the ADHD-IV Rating Scale.Two hundred twenty-eight patients were randomized (atomoxetine n = 184, methylphenidate n = 44). Both drugs were associated with marked improvement in inattentive and hyperactive-impulsive symptom clusters as assessed by parents and investigators. No statistically significant differences between treatment groups were observed on the primary outcome measure (investigator-rated ADHD-IV Rating Scale total score: atomoxetine baseline: 39.4 [8.5], endpoint: 20.0 [13.9]; methylphenidate baseline: 37.6 [9.7], endpoint: 19.8 (16.6); p = .66). Safety and tolerability were also similar between the 2 drugs. Discontinuations due to adverse events were 10/184 (5.4%) for atomoxetine and 5/44 (11.4%) for methylphenidate; p = .175.These data provide preliminary evidence that atomoxetine is associated with therapeutic effects comparable to those of methylphenidate.Atomoxetine versus methylphenidate in paediatric outpatients with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder: a randomized, double-blind comparison trial.To (i) test whether atomoxetine is non-inferior to methylphenidate in treating symptoms of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in paediatric patients; and (ii) determine the tolerability of the two drugs.This double-blind study was conducted in 6- to 16-year-old outpatients with ADHD (DSM-IV) in China, Korea and Mexico (January-October 2004). Patients were randomly assigned to once-daily atomoxetine (0.8-1.8 mg kg(-1) day(-1); n = 164) or twice-daily methylphenidate (0.2-0.6 mg kg(-1) day(-1); n = 166) for approximately 8 weeks. Primary efficacy assessment was the comparison of response rates (> or =40% reduction from baseline to end point in total score) on the Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder Rating Scale-IV-Parent Version: Investigator-Administered and -Scored. Tolerability measures included, but were not limited to, the assessment of treatment-emergent adverse events (TEAEs) and weight.Atomoxetine was non-inferior to methylphenidate in improving ADHD symptoms based on response rates (atomoxetine, 77.4%; methylphenidate, 81.5%; one-sided 95% lower confidence limit = -11.7%, p = 0.404). Treatment-emergent adverse effects experienced significantly more frequently in the atomoxetine group, compared with the methylphenidate group, included anorexia (37.2% vs. 25.3%; p = 0.024), nausea (20.1% vs. 10.2%; p = 0.014), somnolence (26.2% vs. 3.6%; p <0.001), dizziness (15.2% vs. 7.2%; p = 0.024) and vomiting (11.6% vs. 3.6%; p = 0.007), most of which were of mild or moderate severity. Atomoxetine-treated patients experienced a small but significantly greater mean weight loss from baseline to end point than methylphenidate-treated patients (-1.2 kg vs. -0.4 kg; p <0.001).This study suggests that atomoxetine is non-inferior to methylphenidate in the improvement of ADHD symptoms in paediatric outpatients. Although both of the drugs were well tolerated, atomoxetine was associated with a higher incidence of TEAEs than methylphenidate.Functional MRI in attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder: evidence for hypofrontality.Using event-related functional magnetic resonance imaging to study the Stroop effect on both behavioral and brain activation of ADHD children off or on methylphenidate (MPH). Nine ADHD boys (aged 9.8-14.5 years) and 9 age-matched normal controls were included. A Stroop-like paradigm was used. AFNI (Analysis of Functional NeuroImaging) and its Deconvolution Analysis were used in a descriptive comparison between ADHD and control groups. (1) Both behavioral reaction time and brain activation showed Stroop effect in controls but neither was found in ADHD children off MPH. When MPH was administered, the Stroop effect tended to appear. (2) The activation volume (AV) of prefrontal cortex (PFC) in both the neutral (NC) and interference conditions (IC) in ADHD children off MPH was smaller than in controls. AV of anterior cingulate cortex in the IC in ADHD children off MPH was smaller than that in controls, but was similar in the NC to that in controls. AV of the basal ganglia, insula and cerebellum was also smaller in the IC, but was larger in the NC for ADHD children off MPH compared with controls. These findings are consistent with prior findings of hypofrontality in ADHD children and implicate a compensatory network including basal ganglia, insula and cerebellum for relative lower cognitive load tasks.Osmotic release oral system-methylphenidate improves neural activity during low reward processing in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is neurobehavioral disorder characterized by inattention, hyperactivity/impulsivity and impaired reward system function, such as delay aversion and low reward sensitivity. The pharmacological treatment for ADHD includes methylphenidate (MPH), or osmotic release oral system-MPH (OROS-MPH), which increases extrasynaptic dopamine and noradrenaline levels by blocking their reuptake. Although previous functional magnetic resonance imaging (fMRI) studies revealed that acute treatment with MPH alters activation of the nucleus accumbens during delay aversion in children and adolescents with ADHD, the effects a relatively long period of OROS-MPH treatment on delay aversion as well as reward sensitivity remain unclear. Thus, we evaluated brain activation with fMRI during a reward sensitivity paradigm that consists of high monetary reward and low monetary reward conditions before and after a 3-month treatment with OROS-MPH in 17 children and adolescents with ADHD (mean age, 13.3 ± 2.2) and 17 age- and sex-matched healthy controls (mean age, 13.0 ± 1.9). We found that before treatment there was decreased activation of the nucleus accumbens and thalamus in patients with ADHD during only the low monetary reward condition, which was improved to same level as those of the healthy controls after the treatment. The observed change in brain activity was associated with improved ADHD symptom scores, which were derived from Japanese versions of the ADHD rating scale-IV. These results suggest that treatment with OROS-MPH for a relatively long period is effective in controlling reward sensitivity in children and adolescents with ADHD. An open study of adjunct OROS-methylphenidate in children who are atomoxetine partial responders: II. Tolerability and pharmacokinetics.The aim of this study was to evaluate the tolerability of adding OROS methylphenidate (MPH) to children who are partial responders to atomoxetine (ATMX) in the treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).This was a two-phase, 7-week, open study in children aged 6-17 years. Phase 1 initiated ATMX for a minimum of 4 weeks. Phase 2 entered partial responders to ATMX and added OROS MPH to their regimen. Safety was assessed using blood pressure and heart rate measurements, electrocardiogram readings, AEs, laboratories, and ATMX levels.Fifty subjects who were partial responders to ATMX received the combination therapy, with 41 subjects completing the entire protocol. As reported elsewhere (Wilens et al., 2009 ), OROS MPH added to partial responders of ATMX was accompanied by a 40% reduction in the ADHD rating scale score and improvements in executive functioning. However, the combination of ATMX plus OROS MPH was associated with greater rates of insomnia, irritability, and loss of appetite compared to ATMX alone. A small significant increase in diastolic blood pressure was observed during adjunctive OROS MPH, with no clinically meaningful changes in electrocardiogram (ECG) parameters during the study. ATMX levels and liver function tests did not significantly change during the combination treatment.Adjunct OROS MPH in ATMX partial responders yielded an additive adverse effect burden in this short-term study. Further controlled research with larger samples of children is warranted.Medium-term outcomes are comparable with short-term outcomes in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder treated with stimulant medication.To compare the short- and medium-term effects of psychostimulant medication in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Seventy-three children with ADHD participated in a double-blind crossover study of dextroamphetamine (DEX) and methylphenidate (MPH; results previously reported). At the completion of this study, subjects continued to take the preferred stimulant. Subjects were restudied 6-9 months later. The principal outcome measures were the Revised Conners' Parent and Teacher Rating Scales.Fifty-three families (73%) returned the follow-up surveys. At 6-9 months, mean T scores were still significantly lower than the mean at baseline for all factors of both the CPRS-R and CTRS-R (P < 0.01). There were no statistically significant differences between scores at 6-9 months and scores at the completion of the corresponding medication period in the crossover trial.After 6-9 months treatment with stimulant medication, ratings remained significantly better than at baseline. This suggests that the early benefits of stimulants are sustained for at least 6 months.No association between catechol-O-methyltransferase (COMT) genotype and attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in Japanese children.This study ascertained the association between attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in Japanese children and a polymorphism of catechol-O-methyltransferase (COMT), a dopamine-control gene. The secondary aim of the study was the evaluation of a putative association between methylphenidate (MPH) effect/adverse effects and the COMT genotype.To ascertain the distribution of the Val158Met variant of COMT, 50 children meeting ADHD inclusion criteria were compared with 32 healthy children. Clinical improvement and the occurrence of adverse effects were measured before and 3 months after MPH administration in children with ADHD, and analyzed for genotype association. Wechsler Intelligence Scale for Children-Third Edition (WISC-III), age, MPH dose were included as co-variables.The occurrence of the COMT Val/Val genotype was significantly higher in children with ADHD (χ(2)(1)=7.13, p<0.01). However, there was no significant difference in the Val/Val genotype according to disorder, and WISC and ADHD rating scale scores, after correcting for the interaction between disorder and COMT genotype. Furthermore, no significant difference in MPH effect/adverse effects was observed in association with the COMT genotype in the ADHD group.These results showed a lack of association between the COMT Val/Val genotype and ADHD in Japan.Two different solicitation methods for obtaining information on adverse events associated with methylphenidate in adolescents: a 12-week multicenter, open-label study.We explored two different methods of determining adverse events (AEs) among methylphenidate (MPH)-treated adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).We performed a 12-week open label study of osmotic-release oral system (OROS) MPH in adolescents with ADHD who were recruited from four child and adolescent psychiatric outpatient clinics. The AEs were evaluated via a two-step procedure at weeks 1, 3, 6, and 12. The first step was to ask a general question to subjects and their parents regarding AEs. The second step included an AE evaluation process by the investigators, which was performed using a drug-specific checklist. One-way repeated measures ANOVA were used to compare the number of AEs reported by patients and their parents compared with the number reported by clinicians. This statistical technique was also used to compare the number of AEs reported by various sources (i.e., patients, parents, and clinicians) at weeks 1, 3, 6, and 12.Of the 55 participants (43 males, 12 females) between the ages of 12 and 18 enrolled in this study, 47 participants completed the trial. When the number of AEs reported by patients, parents and clinicians were compared, there were no statistically significant differences. When the numbers of AEs obtained from the three different information sources at each study visit were compared, we noted differences. At week 6, the number of AEs evaluated by clinical investigators was higher than those reported by patients and their parents (p=0.003). Although the results did not reach statistical significance, the number of AEs reported by clinical investigators appeared to be greater than those obtained from patients or parents at weeks 3 and 12. The number of AEs reported by patients and their parents were similar at every visit. There were some differences in the pattern of AEs reported between patients and their parents.Clinicians should supplement the subjective report on AEs from patients or their parents with a more drug-specific checklist to obtain drug side effects more effectively. As there are some differences in the pattern of AEs reported by patients and their parents, it is generally recommended that clinicians obtain information from both parties when possible.Stimulant-responsive and stimulant-refractory aggressive behavior among children with ADHD.The objective of this study was to examine factors that are associated with aggression that is responsive versus refractory to individualized optimization of stimulant monotherapy among children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Children who were aged 6 to 13 years and had ADHD, either oppositional defiant disorder or conduct disorder, significant aggressive behavior, and a history of insufficient response to stimulants completed an open stimulant monotherapy optimization protocol. Stimulant titration with weekly assessments of behavior and tolerability identified an optimal regimen for each child. Families also received behavioral therapy. Parents completed the Retrospective-Modified Overt Aggression Scale (R-MOAS) at each visit. Children were classified as having stimulant-refractory aggression on the basis of R-MOAS ratings and clinician judgment. Differences that pertained to treatment, demographic, and psychopathology between groups with stimulant monotherapy-responsive and -refractory aggression were evaluated.Aggression among 32 (49.3%) of 65 children was reduced sufficiently after stimulant dosage adjustment and behavioral therapy to preclude adjunctive medication. Those who responded to stimulant monotherapy were more likely to benefit from the protocol's methylphenidate preparation (once-daily, triphasic release), showed a trend for lower average dosages, and received fewer behavioral therapy sessions than did children with stimulant-refractory aggression. Boys, especially those with higher ratings of baseline aggression and of depressive and manic symptoms, more often exhibited stimulant-refractory aggression.Among children whose aggressive behavior develops in the context of ADHD and of oppositional defiant disorder or conduct disorder, and who had insufficient response to previous stimulant treatment in routine clinical care, systematic, well-monitored titration of stimulant monotherapy often culminates in reduced aggression that averts the need for additional agents.Methylphenidate-associated enuresis in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.This is a case report of possible association of methylphenidate and enuresis in an 11-year-old boy with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.Unraveling the nature of hyperactivity in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Seated hyperactivity is a defining feature of the combined and predominantly hyperactive-impulsive subtypes of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), but its underlying nature is unknown.To determine whether hyperactivity is a consequence of an impaired ability to inhibit activity to low levels or to maintain positional stability.Case-control study.Academic research center and school.Sixty-two boys 9 to 12 years of age (of 73 screened), recruited from the community by advertisement, who met DSM-IV criteria for ADHD combined subtype on structured interview. Sixty-two controls were selected by matching for age and sex from a community sample of 1168 subjects in 3 participating school districts. Pupils with Conners' Teacher Rating Scores Revised within +/-1 SD of the mean for age were eligible for randomized matching. Intervention Infrared motion analysis of head-marker movements (50 Hz) during performance of a 15-minute cognitive control task. Subjects with ADHD were tested at least 18 hours following their last dose of methylphenidate and again 120 minutes after a 0.4-mg/kg probe dose.Inhibitory control (spike and basal amplitude) and head-marker stability (approximate entropy, Lyapunov, and spectral exponents).Inhibitory control measures were 2-fold higher in subjects with ADHD (d' = 0.63-0.95). Group differences in head-marker stability were even greater (d' = 2.20-4.71; receiver operating characteristic area = 0.956-1.0). Methylphenidate restored inhibitory ability to control levels but only partially corrected stability deficits, which still distinguished subjects with ADHD from controls (receiver operating characteristic area = 0.722-0.995).Children with ADHD have a deficient ability to inhibit activity to low levels and unstable control of head-marker position characterized by deterministic chaos (sensitivity to initial conditions). These deficits differed in degree of correctability by methylphenidate, suggesting that they may be mediated by different neural circuits (eg, corticostriatal vs cerebrovestibular).National survey of adherence, efficacy, and side effects of methylphenidate in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder in Taiwan.To identify the determinants of adherence to immediate-release (IR) methylphenidate in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD); to examine the impact of adherence on ADHD-related symptoms; and to compare the efficacy, adherence, and side effects of IR methylphenidate and osmotic release oral system (OROS) methylphenidate.This national survey, involving 12 hospitals, consisted of 2 phases of assessment. Treatment adherence in 240 (39.5%) of the 607 children aged 5 to 16 years with a clinical diagnosis of DSM-IV ADHD enrolled in the study was poor (defined as missing >or= 1 dose of ADHD medication a day and on 2 days or more during school days). Children with poor adherence at phase 1 were able to switch to OROS methylphenidate, while adherents remained on the IR variant. We reassessed 124 poor adherents who switched to OROS methylphenidate. The global ADHD severity, parent-child interaction, classroom behavior, academic performance, and side effects of the child subjects were evaluated by investigators. Parents completed the rating scales about the ADHD-related symptoms. The study began in April 2005 and was completed in February 2006.Determinants for poor adherence included older age, later onset of ADHD, family history of ADHD, higher paternal education level, and multi-dose administration. Mental retardation and treatment at medical centers were inversely related to poor adherence. Overall, poor adherence was associated with more severe ADHD-related symptoms by comparison to good adherence. Similar side effect profile, superior adherence, and improved efficacy were demonstrated in intra-individual comparison of the OROS and IR methylphenidate forms.Given that poor adherence to medication may be an important reason for suboptimal outcome in ADHD treatment, physicians should ensure adherence with therapy before adjusting dosage or switching medication.clinicaltrials.gov Identifier NCT00460720.One-year prospective follow-up of pharmacological treatment in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.To delineate the safety and tolerability profile of methylphenidate and atomoxetine in children and adolescents with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) monitored for more than 1 year.A cohort study analyzing data from the national ADHD register on patients from the Lombardy Region treated with MPH or atomoxetine.A total of 229 children (median age 11 years, range 6-17), enrolled in 15 regional centers between June 2007 and May 2010.The prevalence rate of pharmacological treatment for ADHD was 0.23%, whereas the estimated ADHD prevalence in the population was 0.95%. In total, 73.8% of patients had been treated with atomoxetine (10-90 mg daily) or MPH (10-75 mg daily); 22% of patients also received an additional psychotropic drug. Of the treated children, 26.9% discontinued the drug prior to 1 year of treatment, mostly because of adverse effects (28.6%). No new or unexpected adverse events (rate 39.2%) were encountered. Decreased appetite, headache, and unstable mood were the leading events. The most severe events occurred in two boys: one experienced absence seizures for the first time with MPH, the other experienced hallucinations with atomoxetine. Therapy was discontinued in ten male patients (7.7%) because of adverse events. All patients with adverse effects recovered well.A very low rate of ADHD prevalence was estimated in Italian children compared to that reported in other countries. Although the medications for ADHD are generally well tolerated, with only mild or minor adverse effects in most cases, their rational use can only be guaranteed by disseminating and monitoring evidence-based practices and by monitoring the safety and efficacy of treatments in both the short and long terms with appropriate tools and approaches.Long-term stimulant medication treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder: results from a population-based study.The purpose of this study was to offer detailed information about stimulant medication treatment provided throughout childhood to 379 children with research-identified attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in the 1976-1982 Rochester, MN, birth cohort. Subjects were retrospectively followed from birth until a mean of 17.2 years of age. The complete medical record of each subject was reviewed. The history and results of each episode of stimulant treatment were compared by gender, DSMIV subtype of ADHD, and type of stimulant medication. Overall, 77.8% of subjects were treated with stimulants. Boys were 1.8 times more likely than girls to be treated. The median age at initiation (9.8 years), median duration of treatment (33.8 months), and likelihood of developing at least one side effect (22.3%) were not significantly different by gender. Overall, 73.1% of episodes of stimulant treatment were associated with a favorable response. The likelihood of a favorable response was comparable for boys and girls. Treatment was initiated earlier for children with either ADHD combined type or ADHD hyperactive-impulsive type than for children with ADHD predominantly inattentive type and duration of treatment was longer for ADHD combined type. There was no association between DSM-IV subtype and likelihood of a favorable response or of side effects. Dextroamphetamine and methylphenidate were equally likely to be associated with a favorable response, but dextroamphetamine was more likely to be associated with side effects. These results demonstrate that the effectiveness of stimulant medication treatment of ADHD provided throughout childhood is comparable to the efficacy of stimulant treatment demonstrated in clinical trials.HRQL and medication satisfaction in children with ADHD treated with the methylphenidate transdermal system.To evaluate the impact of methylphenidate transdermal system (MTS) on health-related quality of life (HRQL) and medication satisfaction in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) as well as to identify potential moderators of HRQL and medication satisfaction.Children aged 6-12 years diagnosed with ADHD were enrolled (N = 128) and 115 children completed the study. MTS dose was optimized over 5 weeks using 10-, 15-, 20-, or 30-mg patches worn for 9 hours. The efficacy of 4- and 6-hour wear times was then assessed in an analog classroom setting in a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blind, three-way crossover design study.The ADHD Impact Module-Children (AIM-C), a validated HRQL instrument, was used to assess the impact of ADHD symptoms on children and their families. Satisfaction with MTS use was assessed via a Medication Satisfaction Survey (MSS). A parent or legally appointed representative (LAR) completed the measures. Tolerability was monitored by spontaneous adverse event reporting.Mean scores on AIM-C child and family HRQL scales improved from baseline to endpoint across all MTS doses and the magnitude of improvement increased with time from baseline. Improvement was noted for behavior, missed doses, worry, and economic impact AIM-C scores. Overall, parents/LARs indicated a high level of satisfaction with their child's use of MTS (Visit 7 [92.1%]; Visit 10 [89.1%]). Most treatment-emergent adverse events (TEAEs) were mild to moderate. The most frequent TEAEs included decreased appetite (28%), headache (21%), insomnia (20%), and abdominal pain (12%).At study endpoint, MTS treatment of ADHD was associated with robust improvement in child and family HRQL, key economic impact items, and overall medication satisfaction with the effectiveness and ease of use of MTS as an ADHD treatment. Also, the majority of MTS TEAEs were mild to moderate in severity. Limitations of this study included the potential for a significant halo effect when measuring HRQL and medication satisfaction as well as the uncertainty regarding whether the improvements seen over this relatively short study duration would be sustainable long term.#NCT00151970.Clinically-oriented monitoring of acute effects of methylphenidate on cerebral hemodynamics in ADHD children using fNIRS.Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD), a common developmental syndrome with inattention, hyperactivity, and impulsivity, is typically treated with the psychostimulant drug, methylphenidate (MPH). We explored the feasibility of using functional near-infrared spectroscopy (fNIRS) to search for a clinically implementable biological marker for the acute MPH effect on ADHD children.Following an MPH washout period, twelve ADHD children performed a go/no-go task before and 1.5 h after MPH intake. fNIRS was used to monitor the lateral prefrontal cortical hemodynamics of ADHD children performing a go/no-go task.There was no significant activation in the lateral prefrontal cortices examined before MPH intake. However, after MPH intake, significant MPH-elicited activation (oxygenated hemoglobin signal increase) was detected in the right lateral prefrontal cortex (LPFC) implicated with response inhibition functions. There was a large significant correlation between increases in task performance and activation in the right LPFC.The improved cognitive performance was associated with activation in the right LPFC, which might serve as a biological marker to monitor the effect of MPH in ADHD children.MPH-effect assessment in ADHD children using fNIRS can be performed within a 3 h stay at a hospital during a single visit, and thus may be integrated into clinical practice.Late potentials in the signal-averaged electrocardiogram in pre-pubertal children with ADHD, before and after methylphenidate treatment.Reports on sudden cardiac death (SCD) of children and adolescents treated with stimulant agents have raised concerns regarding the need for cardiovascular monitoring and risk stratification schedules. Cardiac ventricular late potentials (LPs) represent delayed ventricular activation that might predispose to fatal ventricular arrhythmias and SCD in cardiac patients. LPs have not previously been measured in children with attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). LPs were measured in 18 physically healthy ADHD children (5 girls and 13 boys, age 11.9 ± 2.5 years, treatment duration 2.6 ± 1.9 years) before and 2 h after oral methylphenidate administration. No significant changes were detected and LPs were found to be within normal ranges. In conclusion, this preliminary small-scale study suggests that methylphenidate in physically healthy children with ADHD was not associated with cardiac ventricular LPs, suggesting the safety of the agent in this age group.Hypoglycemia and propranolol in pediatric behavioral disorders.Methylphenidate dosage for children with ADHD over time under controlled conditions: lessons from the MTA.To examine the trajectory of methylphenidate (MPH) dosage over time, following a controlled titration, and to ascertain how accurately the titration was able to predict effective long-term treatment in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Using the 14-month-treatment database of the NIMH Collaborative Multisite Multimodal Treatment Study of Children With Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (MTA), the outcome of the initial placebo-controlled, double-blind, randomized daily switch titration of MPH was compared with the subsequent maintenance pharmacotherapy. Children received monthly monitoring visits and, when needed, medication adjustments.Of the 198 children for whom MPH was the optimal treatment at titration (mean +/- SD dose: 30.5 +/- 14.2 mg/day), 88% were still taking MPH at the end of maintenance (mean dose 34.4 +/- 13.3 mg/day). Titration-determined dose and end-of-maintenance dose were significantly correlated (r = 0.52-0.68). Children receiving combined pharmacotherapy and behavioral treatment ended maintenance on a lower dose (31.1 +/- 11.7 mg/day) than did children receiving pharmacotherapy only (38.1 +/- 14.2 mg/day). Of the 230 children for whom titration identified an optimal treatment, 17% continued both the assigned medication and dosage throughout maintenance. The mean number of pharmacological changes per child was 2.8 +/- 1.8 (SD), and time to first change was 4.7 months +/- 0.3 (SE).For most children, initial titration found a dose of MPH in the general range of the effective maintenance dose, but did not prevent the need for subsequent maintenance adjustments. For optimal pharmacological treatment of ADHD, both careful initial titration and ongoing medication management are needed.No significant association between response to methylphenidate and genes of the dopaminergic and serotonergic systems in a sample of Brazilian children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Few studies on pharmacogenetics of Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD) have been conducted. Most of them evaluated dopaminergic genes resulting in positive and negative findings. We assessed effects of polymorphisms in candidate dopaminergic (DRD4, DAT1) and serotonergic genes (HTR1B, HTR2A, and 5-HTT) on the response to treatment in 111 patients for whom methylphenidate (MPH) was prescribed. Outcome measures (Swanson, Nolan, and Pelham scale-version IV, Children Global Assessment Scale, Barkley's Stimulants Side Effects Rating Scale) were assessed at baseline and 1 month after the intervention. No significant association was detected between polymorphisms assessed and both response and side effects to MPH. Prospective multi-site controlled studies with larger sample sizes are needed in order to disentangle the role of candidate genes in response to ADHD treatment.Do ADHD children with and without child behavior checklist-dysregulation profile have different clinical characteristics, cognitive features, and treatment outcomes?The Child Behavior Checklist-Dysregulation Profile (CBCL-DP), characterized by elevated scores on the "Attention Problems," "Aggressive Behavior," and "Anxious/Depressed" scales in the CBCL, has been associated with later severe psychopathology. In a sample of children with ADHD, this study sought to further explore the clinical characteristics, the response to methylphenidate medication, and the cognitive features of ADHD children with CBCL-DP.The sample consisted of 173 ADHD outpatients (age = 10.9 ± 2.81) assessed using symptom severity scales, personality questionnaires (Emotionality Activity Sociability [EAS] and Junior Temperament and Character Inventory [JTCI]), and neuropsychological tests. A subsample of 136 participants was reassessed after optimal adjustment of methylphenidate dosage.Variables that were independently associated with CBCL-DP were clinical severity (ADHD Rating Scale [ADHD-RS]), internalized disorders, high emotionality (EAS), and low self-directedness (JTCI). CBCL-DP was associated neither with poorer response to methylphenidate nor with more side effects. There were no differences in cognitive performances between participants with and without CBCL-DP.Sleep architecture and REM sleep measures in prepubertal children with attention deficit disorder with hyperactivity.A 2-night polysomnographic study of 9 rigorously assessed prepubertal children who fit Diagnostic Statistical Manual-III criteria for attention deficit disorder with hyperactivity (ADDH) and a contrast group of 11 control children is reported. Despite the fact that 57% of the ADDH group were reported to experience restless sleep on structured parental rating forms, they did not show any sleep architecture abnormalities on polysomnographic recordings when compared with the normals at baseline other than decreased rapid eye movement (REM) activity. Seven of the ADDH boys were restudied after 6 months of continuous methylphenidate therapy (mean daily dose of 34.4 +/- 14.0 mg or 1.4 +/- 0.7 mg/kg). Across and within (pre-post) group comparisons showed that methylphenidate therapy was associated with delayed sleep onset, lengthened sleep, and changes in certain REM sleep variables.Gaze pursuit and arm control of adolescent males diagnosed with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and normal controls: evidence of a dissociation in processing visual information of short and long duration.Three-dimensional kinematic analysis of line of gaze, arm and ball was used to describe the visual and motor behaviour of male adolescents diagnosed with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). The ADHD participants were tested when both on (ADHD-On) and off (ADHD-Off) their medication and compared to age-matched normal controls in a modified table tennis task that required tracking the ball and hitting to cued right and left targets. Long-duration information was provided by a pre-cue, in which the target was illuminated approximately 2 s before the serve, and short-duration information by an early-cue illuminated about 350 ms after the serve, leaving approximately 500 ms to select the target and perform the action. The ADHD groups differed significantly from the control group in both the pre-cue and early-cue conditions in being less accurate, in having a later onset and duration of pursuit tracking, and a higher frequency of gaze on and off the ball. The use of medication significantly reduced the gaze frequency of the ADHD participants, but surprisingly this did not lead to an increase in pursuit tracking, suggesting a barrier was reached beyond which ball flight information could not be processed. The control and ADHD groups did not differ in arm movement onset, duration and velocity in the short-duration early-cue condition; in the long-duration pre-cue condition, however, the ADHD group's movement time onset and arm velocity differed significantly from controls. The results show that the ADHD groups were able to process short-duration information without experiencing adverse effects on their motor behaviour; however, long-duration information contributed to irregular movement control.Medication treatment strategies in the MTA Study: relevance to clinicians and researchers.Clinicians have difficulty applying drug research findings to clinical practice, because research protocols use methods different from those used in daily office practice settings.To design a medication protocol for a multisite clinical trial involving 576 children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) while maintaining relevance to clinical practice, investigators from the NIMH Collaborative Multisite Multimodal Treatment Study of Children with Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (MTA study) developed novel medication strategies. These were designed to work either in a monomodal or multimodal format and to ensure standard approaches are used across diverse sites. Each child randomized to medication (projected N = 288) is individually titrated to his or her "best" methylphenidate dose and has individual ADHD symptoms monitored. Decision rules were developed to guide "best dose" selection, dose changes, medication changes, the management of side effects, and integration with psychosocial treatments.The MTA study uses a controlled method to standardize the identification of each child's "best" methylphenidate dose in a national, multisite cooperative treatment program. Although the titration protocol is complex, the study's individual dosing approach and algorithms for openly managing ADHD children's medication over time will be of interest to clinicians in office practice.An observational study of once-daily modified-release methylphenidate in ADHD: the effect of previous treatment on ADHD symptoms, other externalising symptoms and quality-of-life outcomes.Methylphenidate (MPH) is the most commonly prescribed stimulant for children with ADHD. Data on the effects of different MPH formulations in real-life settings are scarce, and the role of previous therapy on treatment outcome when switching medications has not been well studied. OBSEER was an observational study designed to evaluate the effectiveness and safety of Equasym XL(®) in routine care. This study assessed whether the improvements reported with Equasym XL(®) are influenced by the degree of symptom control achieved with the previous medication. Patients enrolled in OBSEER were stratified by prior treatment (none, MPH-immediate release [IR] once daily [o.d.] [MPH-IR o.d.], MPH-IR repeated [MPH-IR >o.d.] and MPH-MR [modified release] excluding Equasym XL(®)), and changes in ADHD and other externalising symptoms (CGI-S, FBB-ADHD and DAYAS) and quality of life (QoL, KINDL) were evaluated during treatment with Equasym XL(®). A total of 782 patients were analysed. Significant group-by-time interactions were found for all symptom variables analysed, indicating that effects varied by previous medication. For CGI-S and FBB-ADHD total scores, the greatest reductions in ADHD symptoms were observed in the treatment-naïve subgroup, followed (in order) by MPH-IR o.d., MPH-IR >o.d. and MPH-MR. A similar profile was seen for DAYAS ratings for all periods of the day except the evening, when there were no significant differences between subgroups. Similarly, the treatment-naïve and MPH-IR o.d. subgroups showed the greatest improvements in KINDL ratings. Although effects were greatest for treatment-naïve patients, improvements were also observed in the prior treatment subgroups for symptoms and QoL. This suggests that a change to Equasym XL(®) may be beneficial in patients with suboptimal effects on prior medication.Emergence of tics in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder treated with stimulant medications.The emergence of tics in children treated with stimulant medication for attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) was investigated. A retrospective chart review of the medical records of 555 subjects was performed to examine the emergence of tics in relation to treatment with a stimulant medication, dosage, duration of treatment, and age of subjects. A total of 7.8% of the subjects treated with stimulants developed tics: 8.3% of subjects treated with methylphenidate, 6.3% with dextroamphetamine, and 7.7% with pemoline. The subjects who developed tics were significantly younger than those who did not. Subjects treated with higher doses of stimulant medication were not more likely to develop tics. While the emergence of tics was common, these subjects may have developed tics irrespective of stimulant medication. Controversy remains as to the long-term risk of tics in relation to stimulant medication and to appropriate practice should tics emerge during the course of stimulant medication treatment.Methylphenidate-induced acute orofacial and extremity dyskinesia.Methylphenidate is a short-acting stimulant. In this article, the authors report a 7-year-old male patient who presented with orofacial and limb dyskinesia after his first dose of methylphenidate treatment for a diagnosis of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder; he was also receiving sodium valproate treatment for epilepsy. Orofacial dyskinesia appeared 5 hours after methylphenidate administration, persisted for 10 hours, and had completely resolved within 2 days. Although limb dyskinesia after methylphenidate is a commonly reported side effect, to the authors' knowledge this is only the second reported case to develop both orofacial and limb dyskinesia in the acute period after the first dose of methylphenidate. This case is reported to emphasize the potential side effects of methylphenidate, individual differences in drug sensitivities, and drug-receptor interactions via different mechanisms.Child and parent perceptions of stimulant medication treatment in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.To evaluate child and parent perceptions of treatment with stimulant medication in a sample of children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Child and parent perceptions questionnaires were completed for 102 subjects participating in a double-blind, crossover trial of methylphenidate (MPH) and dexamphetamine (DEX).Most children viewed medication effects favourably, although 12.7% and 18.8% of children reported feeling worse than usual when taking MPH and DEX, respectively. There was disagreement between the child's and parents' perceptions of response in over one quarter of cases. Most disagreements involved parents viewing the child's response favourably, but the child rating reporting an unfavourable outcome. Side-effects were the main determinant of children's perceptions of adverse response.A substantial proportion of children with ADHD experience treatment with stimulant medication adversely. Side-effects are the principal determinant of negative child perceptions. Parental report is usually in agreement with child report; however, parental report alone is not infallible in providing reliable information regarding effects as experienced by the child.Effects of once-daily osmotic-release methylphenidate on blood pressure and heart rate in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder: results from a one-year follow-up study.Studies of vital signs in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) receiving stimulants indicate a variable effect on blood pressure (BP) and heart rate (HR). We evaluated the longer-term effects on vital signs of once-daily osmotic-release methylphenidate (MPH, Concerta) in children with ADHD.As part of a 1-year open-extension trial, we studied children with ADHD (aged 6-13 years; baseline assessment, n = 432) who were entered into an open-label study of osmotic-release MPH (18-54 mg) for up to 1 year. Subjects' BP and HR were recorded at monthly visits and, when applicable, analyses were by last observation carried forward.Compared to off-drug baseline, osmotic-release MPH was associated with minor clinical, although statistically significant, changes in systolic and diastolic blood pressure (DBP) (3.3 and 1.5 mm Hg, Ps < 0.001) and HR (3.9 bpm, P < 0.0001) at 12-month end point. There was no clear dose-response relationship. There was no tolerance to the pressor effects of osmotic-release MPH over the 1-year period. There was an inverse relationship between baseline vital signs and positive change in vital signs at end point.Over a 12-month period, osmotic-release MPH produced minor clinical, although statistically significant, changes in BP and HR in children with ADHD.Does methylphenidate cause a cytogenetic effect in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder?Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is the most common psychiatric disorder in children and adolescents (6-12% affected). Treatment with methylphenidate (MPH) in the United States has increased to a current prescription rate of > 5 million per year. However, a 2005 study by El-Zein and co-workers [Cancer Lett 230:284-291] reporting a 3-fold increase in genomic damage in all 12 analyzed children after 3 months of therapy with MPH resulted in much concern about potential carcinogenic effects. Here we provide new information concerning the cytogenetic effect of MPH in children.In a prospective study, we analyzed the genomic damage in children with ADHD (initial sample size 38 children) before and 1 (30 children), 3 (21 children), and 6 (8 children) months after initiation of MPH therapy. In addition, we investigated a group of 9 children receiving chronic MPH therapy. Patients were recruited within a study of our Clinical Research Group on ADHD in the Department of Child and Adolescent Psychiatry and Psychotherapy of the University of Würzburg. Assessment and treatment of patients were performed during inpatient or outpatient health care. The measure for genomic damage was the frequency of micronuclei, a subset of chromosomal aberrations, in peripheral lymphocytes.MPH treatment resulted in no significant alteration in the micronucleus frequency.Because the findings published in 2005 by El-Zein and co-workers could not be replicated, the concern regarding a potential increase in the risk of developing cancer later in life after long-term MPH treatment is not supported.Methylphenidate and ADHD: influence of age, IQ and neurodevelopmental status.Sixty-nine children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) underwent blind methylphenidate trials. 36 had ADHD alone (with or without a learning disability) and 33 had additional neurodevelopmental disorders. Of the children with ADHD alone, 88 per cent improved significantly on methylphenidate. This did not differ significantly from the 69 per cent response rate for children with ADHD and other neurodevelopmental disorders. The results confirm and add to the research literature indicating that ADHD children who are of preschool age and/or who have co-existing neurological disorders may benefit from methylphenidate.[ADHD register: post-marketing evaluation of the benefit-risk profile of drugs and promotion of the appropriateness].The Register was aimed at assessing the benefit-risk profile of the treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) with atomoxetine and methylphenidate.Post-marketing observational study, phase IV. Prescription medication to children and adolescents with ADHD aged between 6 and 18 years in the centres of reference for ADHD accredited by the Italian regions.In the period from September 2007 to October 2011, 1098 children and adolescents were treated with methylphenidate and 951 with atomoxetine. 411 (21.5%) patients are released from the register: 274 treated with atomoxetine and 167 with methylphenidate, with a greater risk of discontinuation for atomoxetine: RR 1.4 (1.3-1.6) p<0.001. The length of treatment at the time of removal from the register is 4.1 months for atomoxetine and 2 months for methylphenidate. Patients treated with atomoxetine are more likely to experience an adverse event compared to those treated with methylphenidate (RR 2.8; 1.9-4.2). The total number of serious adverse events observed was 110: 82 (75%) patients treated with atomoxetine and 28 (25%) individuals treated with methylphenidate. For 98 patients with serious adverse events, the adverse event led to the interruption of treatment with exit from the registry. The chance of a serious adverse event among those treated with atomoxetine compared to those with methylphenidate is RR 2.8 (1.8-4.2). There have been 14 cardiovascular events, all grown positively. 69 were found with a ECG alterations, with an increased risk for methylphenidate (RR 2.4; 1.4-4.2). The incidence of suicidal ideation was 4.5/1000 patients treated with atomoxetine. Hepatic alterations occurred with an incidence of 1/1000 subjects treated with methylphenidate and 4/1000 of those who received atomoxetine.The survey was carried out on a population which represents appropriately the paediatric population. The observed prevalence of ADHD corresponds to the expectation based on data from previous epidemiological investigations in Italy but considerably lower than what is reported in the international scientific literature. The rate of exposure to pharmacological treatments is similar to that of other European countries.Covert visual spatial attention in boys with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder: lateral effects, methylphenidate response and results for parents.We report three related studies of covert visual spatial orienting in child attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). In Study 1, we examined covert visual spatial orienting in ADHD and comparison boys, Study 2 comprised a dose-response study of methylphenidate for the ADHD group, and Study 3 was an investigation of biological and adoptive parents. In contrast with comparison subjects (n = 17). ADHD boys aged 6-12 (n = 27) showed both slower reaction times overall and within-condition (lateral) asymmetries in reaction times. Specifically, boys with ADHD reacted more slowly to uncued targets in the left visual field than in the right visual field. Responses to stimuli in the two visual fields were differentially affected by methylphenidate for the ADHD group. Medication equalized visual field responses to the uncued targets, resulting in a significant cue x dose x visual field interaction. Further, medication altered the relative cue responsivity in the two visual fields, resulting in a significant dose x visual field interaction for the Validity Effect. Biological parents of ADHD boys (n = 16) also showed slower reaction times to uncued left visual field targets than to right visual field targets; in addition they showed slower response to invalidity cued targets in the right visual field. These literal effects were not observed in adoptive parents of ADHD boys (n = 12) or biological parents of comparison boys (n = 14). Possible abnormal hemispheric asymmetry of attention functions in boys with ADHD and their biological parents is discussed.Effects of stimulant medications on children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder and excessive beta activity in their EEG.This study investigated the effects of stimulant medications on the Electroencephalography (EEG) of children with the combined type of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) together with excessive beta activity in their EEG.Twenty ADHD and 20 control subjects participated in this study. EEG was recorded from 21 sites during an eyes-closed resting condition and Fourier transformed to provide estimates for total power and absolute and relative power in the delta, theta, alpha and beta bands, and for the theta/alpha and theta/beta ratios. Subjects were placed on a 6-month trial of a stimulant medication and a second EEG was recorded at the end of the trial.The unmedicated ADHD group had greater absolute and relative beta, less absolute and relative alpha, a higher theta/alpha and a lower theta/beta ratio than the control group. In the frontal regions the ADHD group had an increase in total power, absolute theta, absolute and relative beta and the theta/beta ratio, with greater relative delta, relative theta, and absolute and relative alpha in posterior regions. With medication use, absolute beta activity and frontal total power decreased, although these changes represented a reduction in power, not a normalisation.These results indicate that ADHD children with excessive beta activity in their EEG are probably not hypoaroused as previously suggested, and that beta activity in these children is probably only associated with the impulsivity and/or hyperactivity aspects of the disorder, but may not necessarily be associated with inattention.This study is the first to investigate effects of stimulant medications on the EEG of ADHD children with excessive beta activity in their EEG.Height, weight, IGF-I, IGFBP-3 and thyroid functions in prepubertal children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder: effect of methylphenidate treatment.To investigate if there are any disease-related or methylphenidate-induced aberrations in growth parameters, growth hormone insulin-like growth factor (IGF)-I, IGFBP-3 axis and the thyroid function tests in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Newly diagnosed and untreated prepubertal children with ADHD were longitudinally followed before and approximately every 4 months after methylphenidate treatment for up to 16 months. Height SDS, weight SDS, BMI SDS, serum GH, IGF-I, IGFBP-3, T4, free T4, T3, and TSH were measured at each visit.All of the examined parameters were within normal limits for age before treatment. Methylphenidate treatment did not significantly affect SDS of height, weight, BMI, IGF-I and IGFBP-3 in the long run. Serum T4 and free T4 levels showed modest reductions within normal limits in a time-dependent manner.Prepubertal children with ADHD had normal height, weight, BMI, serum IGF-I and IGFBP-3 and thyroid functions. Methylphenidate treatment had no sustained effects on growth parameters, IGF-I and IGFBP-3 during the follow-up period of this study. However, it caused a mild decrease in total and free T4 which may warrant further monitoring.A commentary on "A young man with acute dilated cardiomyopathy associated with methylphenidate".Rapid improvement in academic grades following methylphenidate treatment in attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder.In the present study a 16 week comparison study was conducted of behavioral, cognitive and educational measures in school-age Taiwanese children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) receiving open-label methylphenidate (MPH). Subjects include 14 male and five female ADHD children. They received MPH twice per day continuously for 16 weeks. Measures of behavior, cognitive function (Wisconsin Card Sorting Test, Tower of London and Continuous Performance Test), Chinese and arithmetic learning achievement were compared with those of their baseline condition. After MPH, 68-78% of children showed improving behavior in classroom and at home. Among the neuropsychological tests, only the percentage of preservative error was improved (P = 0.022). Approximately 61-66% of children had improvement in academic learning (P = 0.013 for Chinese, 0.004 for arithmetic). The MPH treatment demonstrated improvement in domains of classroom/home behaviors and academic performance, but showed minimal change on neuropsychological functioning in Taiwanese ADHD children. The finding of academic gain was unexpected, which might be due to the greater interest in achievement and better compliance to cultural expectations by Taiwanese versus Western students, which translated into more rapid improvement in academic performance.Sleep disturbances in adolescents with symptoms of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.We evaluated 32 nonmedicated male adolescents diagnosed with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in childhood, 35 male adolescents similarly diagnosed who were receiving methylphenidate (MPH), and 77 control boys. Both ADHD groups completed self-report questionnaires assessing sleep disturbances; weekday and holiday sleep duration; and symptoms of ADHD, anxiety, and depression. Parents and teachers rated the severity of the participants' ADHD. The control group completed self-report questionnaires assessing sleep disturbances. We found that nonmedicated participants and controls did not differ in the severity of sleep disturbance. In contrast, the medicated participants demonstrated a significantly greater severity of sleep disturbance compared with the nonmedicated participants and reported elevated levels of symptoms of ADHD, anxiety, and depression. Specific analyses showed that depressive symptoms contributed significantly to the degree of sleep disturbance when controlling for ADHD diagnosis and MPH treatment. These findings suggest that among adolescents with ADHD symptoms, the severity of symptoms of depression may contribute to the degree of sleep disturbance in addition to the effect of their primary disorder and MPH treatment.Effect of methylphenidate and folic Acid on ADHD symptoms and quality of life and aggression: a randomized double blind placebo controlled clinical trial.This clinical trial examines the effect of augmentation of methylphenidate (MPH) with folic acid to improve quality of life, and to treat aggression and ADHD symptoms.Participants of this eight week randomized double blind placebo controlled clinical trial were 49 children with ADHD. They were randomly assigned into one of the two groups: the first group receiving methylphenidate (10 to 20mg/day) plus folic (5mg/day), and the second group receiving methylphenidate plus placebo. Parent-reported ADHD symptoms and Overt Aggression Scale score were the outcome measures. Quality of life was assessed as well. Assessments were performed at pre-intervention, and at one month and two months after starting the interventions using repeated measure analysis.The mean age of children was 9.6(2.7) years. Age and gender were not associated with the groups. ADHD symptoms significantly decreased in both groups during the trial. However, no difference was observed between the groups. Moreover, aggression non-significantly decreased in both groups. Meanwhile, there was no difference between the two groups in efficacy for treating different types of aggressive behaviors including: verbal aggression, physical aggression against people, physical aggression against properties or objects, and aggression against self (self-injurious behavior). While methylphenidate improved quality of life of children with ADHD, folic acid did not improve it more than placebo. Both medications were well tolerated.considering the marked limitations of this trial, this primarily report suggests that methylphenidate may improve ADHD symptoms and the quality of life of children with ADHD. Current evidence does not support that folic acid as an adjuvant is effective for treating ADHD symptoms or aggression, or the improving quality of life of children with ADHD.Psychotic side effects of psychostimulants: a 5-year review.To examine the rate of psychotic and mood-congruent psychotic side effects of stimulant medications in children treated for attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).A chart review was completed of all children diagnosed with ADHD in an outpatient clinic from January 1989 to March 1995.Over 5 years, 192 children were diagnosed with ADHD. Ninety-eight children received treatment at the clinic with stimulants. Six children developed psychotic or mood-congruent psychotic symptoms during treatment. Children on medication were followed for an average of 1 year and 9 months.Awareness of the potential for psychotic side effects from stimulant medications is important when prescribing for children. A large prospective study would be useful to predict the frequency and classification of the side effects in children.Atomoxetine and methylphenidate treatment in children with ADHD: the efficacy, tolerability and effects on executive functions.The aim of this study was to compare the safety, efficacy, tolerability, and the effects of atomoxetine and OROS-MPH on executive functions in children with ADHD. This study was an open-label study that only included two medication groups. Children were randomized to open-label atomoxetine or OROS-MPH for 12 weeks. Primary efficacy measures were T-DSM-IV-S, CGI-I and neuropsychological tests battery. Safety assessments included electrocardiogram, adverse events checklist and laboratory tests. According to the endpoint improvement scores of CGI and parents T-DSM-IV-S, treatment responses were not significantly different between the two study groups. OROS-MPH led to a significantly greater reduction in teacher T-DSM-IV-S scale scores. OROS-MPH was more effective than atomoxetine on Stroop-5 time and number of corrections. Significant decrease in the percentage of perseverative errors on WCST in the OROS-MPH group was seen (p = 0.005). The most frequently reported adverse events in the atomoxetine group were anorexia, nausea, nervousness, weight loss, abdominal pain, and somnolence. In the OROS-MPH group, patients most frequently reported anorexia, nervousness, insomnia, headache, nausea, and weight loss. When all these results are considered, although both drugs can be considered effective in ADHD treatment, more remarkable improvement is provided by OROS-MPH based on the rates across informant (i.e., teachers, clinicians) and neuropsychological evaluation.Design and rationale of controlled study of long-term methylphenidate and multimodal psychosocial treatment in children with ADHD.To describe the rationale, methodology, and sample characteristics of a dual-site treatment study (New York and Montreal) of children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) conducted between 1990 and 1995. The hypotheses were that (1) methylphenidate combined with comprehensive multimodal psychosocial treatment was superior to methylphenidate alone in improving multiple functions and (2) the efficacy of the psychosocial intervention resulted from its specific components and not from nonspecific treatment effects.One hundred three children with ADHD (ages 7-9), free of conduct and learning disorders, who responded to methylphenidate, were randomized for 2 years to (1) methylphenidate treatment alone; (2) methylphenidate combined with multimodal psychosocial treatment that included parent training and counseling, academic assistance, psychotherapy, and social skills training; or (3) methylphenidate plus attention control treatment that excluded specific aspects of the psychosocial intervention. Children were switched to single-blind placebo after 12 months; methylphenidate was reinstituted when clinically indicated. Assessments included ratings by parents, teachers, children, and psychiatrists; school observations in academic and gym classes; and academic performance tests. Almost 80% of families completed the 2-year study. Companion papers present treatment effects.A comprehensive 2-year psychosocial treatment was delivered successfully to children with ADHD and their families.Cardiovascular effects of methylphenidate.Methylphenidate oral dose plasma concentrations and behavioral response in children.The relationship between methylphenidate (MP) oral dose and plasma concentration to social and cognitive behaviors was studied in 25 boys diagnosed as having "attention deficit disorder with hyperactivity". Children were administered successive 1-week treatment conditions under the following schedule of fixed oral doses given twice daily: placebo; 0.25 mg/kg; 0.50 mg/kg; 1.0 mg/kg; placebo. Teacher and parent ratings showed increased improvement in social behavior as a function of MP dose. No drug effects were obtained on cognitive performance. MP plasma concentrations were significantly associated with oral dose and with measures of social behavior. No relationship was found with cognitive behavior. Side effects at the largest dose were severe enough to require discontinuation of treatment for five children, but were relatively mild for the remaining children.Cardiovascular measures in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder who are new users of methylphenidate and atomoxetine.The purpose of this study was to assess the cardiovascular effects of drugs used for attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in children and adolescents treated in community care centers in Italy.This study was an open, prospective, observational study of youth with ADHD treated with atomoxetine (ATX) and methylphenidate (MPH). Measurements of blood pressure and heart rate, and electrocardiogram (ECG) assessment were performed at baseline and at regular intervals up to 24 months.By June 2010, 1758 youth were enrolled in the Italian ADHD National Registry. Statistically significant increases were observed in cardiovascular measures: in the MPH group after 6 months in heart rate (+2.01, p = 0.01); in the ATX group after 6 months in diastolic pressure (+1.60, p = 0.01) and in heart rate (+2.93, p = 0.001), and after 12 months in heart rate (+3.26, p = 0.003). Compared with the baseline, 59 patients had an alteration of ECG during the follow-up period. Although at 12 months, the probability of detecting an abnormal ECG was higher in the MPH group than in the ATX group, only 2 out of 30 cases at 6 months with altered ECG were considered to have experienced serious adverse events. One case was treated with ATX and one with MPH, and arrhythmia was the detected abnormality.Treatment with MPH and ATX in youth appears to have a small but significant impact on the cardiovascular system. The long-term impact of these medications is unknown. Several clinically meaningless ECG alterations were observed mostly in MPH-treated youth. We therefore suggest evaluating cardiovascular risks at baseline.Perceptual and response interference in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder, and the effects of methylphenidate.Fourteen children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and 14 normal control children were compared with respect to stimulus- and response-related processes. Subjects with ADHD took part in two additional sessions under methylphenidate or placebo. In both experiments, performance and electrophysiological measures such as the P2, N2, and P3 components of event-related potential and electromyogram (EMG) activity were measured during an Eriksen flanker task. In both groups of children, reaction times (RTs) to arrow stimuli incongruent with the target were longer than those to neutral stimuli (response interference), which were again slower than RTs to target-alone stimuli (perceptual interference). Children with ADHD made more errors to incongruent stimuli and showed more response interference. For correct responses, no differences between the groups in response interference effects on reaction time, P2, N2, and P3 latency, or EMG onset were found. Methylphenidate had a general enhancing effect on accuracy but did not specifically reduce interference from the flanking stimuli. Methylphenidate had no effects on RT, N2 and P2 latency, P3 amplitude or latency, or EMG activity. The conclusion that methylphenidate did not influence response processes contrasts sharply with findings reported by authors using the Sternberg memory search task.Side effects of methylphenidate and dexamphetamine in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder: a double-blind, crossover trial.To compare the side effect profiles of methylphenidate (MPH) and dexamphetamine (DEX) in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), as well as to determine which symptoms are genuine adverse effects of stimulant medication, as opposed to aspects of the child's underlying behavioral phenotype.Double-blind, crossover study.Pediatric teaching hospital ambulatory behavior clinic.A total of 125 children with ADHD with a mean age of 104.8 months.Subjects received DEX (0.15 mg/kg/dose) and MPH (0.3 mg/kg/dose) twice a day for 2 weeks each in a randomized order.The Barkley Side Effects Rating Scale (17 symptoms; 0 = absent, severity rated from 1 to 9) was completed by parents at baseline and at the completion of each trial fortnight.Subjects' parents reported a significantly greater mean number (8.19) and mean severity (4.08) of "side effects" before commencing the trial than during the MPH period (number 7.19; severity 3.24), but not the DEX period (number 7.64, severity 3.73). The mean severity (but not mean number) was greater on DEX than on MPH. DEX caused more severe insomnia and appetite suppression compared with the baseline rating. Appetite suppression was the only item rated more severe on MPH than at baseline. Six side effects were significantly more severe on DEX than MPH: insomnia, irritability, proneness to crying, anxiousness, sadness/unhappiness, and nightmares. None were more severe on MPH than DEX. Overall, both MPH and DEX were well tolerated by most subjects, with only four subjects discontinuing the trial period because of severe adverse effects (2 -1.6%- on each stimulant).Many symptoms commonly attributed to stimulant medication are actually preexisting characteristics of children with ADHD and improve with stimulant treatment. At the doses investigated, both DEX and MPH caused appetite suppression, and DEX caused insomnia. Negative emotional symptoms were more severe on DEX than MPH.[How to treat ADHD/DAMP? Is there a conclusive answer? A critical survey of the MTA trial?].Attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is a common psychiatric disorder occurring in approximately 3-6% of the population. The high prevalence of the disease and the fact that it has an onset early in life emphasise the importance of adequate treatment. This article focuses on the largest long-term treatment study of ADHD, the Multimodal Treatment study of Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (MTA), taking into consideration especially the limitations of the design and their impact on the outcome of the study. Primary among these is the fact that outcome was measured 4-6 months after the most intensive phase of behavioural treatment but while medication was still active. This may have had an impact on the study results, especially since the MTA study did not indicate a significant difference between combined and strictly pharmacological treatment.Slowing of growth in height and weight on stimulants: a characteristic pattern.The aims of the present study were to describe the growth pattern of children starting stimulant medication and to analyse the changes over time in height, weight and height velocity in a cohort of treated patients.Retrospective review of growth data from files of all newly treated patients with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder in one paediatric practice. Forty-four boys and seven girls were treated for 6-42 months with either dexam-phetamine (n = 32) or methylphenidate (n = 19).During the first 6 months on stimulant medication 44 children (86%) had a height velocity below the age-corrected mean and there was weight loss in 39 (76%). The height and weight standard deviation score (SDS) showed a progressive decline that was statistically significant after 6 and 18 months (P < 0.001, paired t-test). The height velocity was significantly attenuated for the first 30 months (P < 0.01), being lowest during the first 6 months. The mean height deficit during the first 2 years was approximately 1 cm/year. The change in weight SDS was 2.4 times the change in height SDS after 30 months on treatment with a significant correlation (Pearson's correlation coefficient r = 0.88, P < 0.001).Stimulant medication is associated with a decrease in height and weight SDS during the first 6-30 months with a characteristic pattern on the growth chart.Atrioventricular nodal re-entrant tachycardia associated with stimulant treatment.A 13-year-old African-American female taking sertraline for obsessive compulsive disorder was diagnosed with her first episode of atrioventricular (AV) nodal re-entrant tachycardia five days after beginning Mixed Salts of a Single-Entity Amphetamine Product (Adderall) for treatment of attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). She received successful cardioversion with 6 mg of intravenous adenosine, but developed a second episode of possible AV nodal re-entrant tachycardia twelve days after Adderall was reinitiated at half the previous dose. The patient had clinically similar cardiac episodes five and six months after treatment was changed to slow-release methylphenidate. Stimulant medication may evoke onset of AV nodal tachyarrhythmias in patients who have the potential to develop them, possibly in combination with a selective serotonergic reuptake inhibitor (SSRI).[Attention deficit disorder: treatment with methylphenidate].The authors present the results of the treatment with methylphenidate in 24 children with attention deficit disorder based on DSM-III. The prescribed dose was 5 to 10 mg per day, once or twice a day. The results were good in 79.1% of the patients and poor in 16.6%. The drug was withdrawn in one patient because of side effects and the evaluation of efficacy was not possible. Side effects occurred in 2 children (headache and/or nausea). The therapeutic response and the side effects are compared with the literature. The authors claim attention to the efficacy and safety of the treatment with methylphenidate.Methylphenidate induction of complex visual hallucinations.A 15-year-old boy with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) presented with complex visual hallucinations of rats running around and touching and smelling him soon after receiving a first low dose of methylphenidate. The hallucinations resolved upon discontinuation of the drug. Reintroduction of the drug 7 years later at an even lower dose had the same effect. Other cases of vivid complex hallucinations of living creatures associated with methylphenidate have been reported in the literature. The pathogenetic mechanism is still unknown. In our case, the occurrence of hallucinations after a very low dose of the drug on 2 occasions may suggest an idiosyncratic reaction. The phenomenon might also be explained by a drug-induced dysfunction of the monoamine transmitters. Given the wide use of methylphenidate, clinicians should be aware of this possible side effect.Pharmacokinetics of methylphenidate transdermal system (MTS): results from a laboratory classroom study.To evaluate the pharmacokinetic properties of the methylphenidate transdermal system (MTS) in pediatric patients diagnosed with ADHD (attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder) in a laboratory school setting.A phase II, randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled, laboratory classroom study was conducted with prior dose optimization. Children (aged 6-12 years) with ADHD were titrated over 5 weeks to an optimal clinical MTS dose (10, 15, 20, or 30 mg/9 h). Participants were randomized to 1 week of either MTS or corresponding placebo, followed by crossover to the alternate treatment. Laboratory school evaluations, including pharmacokinetic blood sampling, occurred at the end of each treatment.MTS delivered d- and l-MPH (methylphenidate) into the systemic circulation throughout the 9-hour wear time, and plasma concentrations declined rapidly after patch removal. Over the time-course of clinical effectiveness (2-12 h), mean plasma concentrations of d-MPH at the most frequently titrated doses (15 and 20 mg/9 h) ranged from 4.97 to 28.3 ng/mL. Systemic exposure increased approximately dose proportionately. Plasma concentrations of the l-MPH were approximately one-half to two-thirds those for d-MPH.Plasma concentrations of the much less active l-MPH were consistently lower than those of d-MPH. The clinical relevance of the MTS pharmacokinetic profile is discussed.Explosive outbursts associated with methylphenidate.Cardiac safety of central nervous system stimulants in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Case reports have raised concerns about the risk of cardiac events associated with central nervous system stimulants for the treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.This was a retrospective cohort study that used 10 years (July 1994 to June 2004) of Florida Medicaid claims data cross-linked to Vital Statistics Death Registry data. The cohort was composed of all youth 3 to 20 years old who were newly diagnosed with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder. Each month of follow-up was classified according to stimulant claims (methylphenidate, amphetamines, and pemoline) as current use (active stimulant claim), former use (time after periods of current use), or nonuse (time preceding the first stimulant claim, including follow-up of youth who were never exposed to stimulants). The study's end points were (1) cardiac death, (2) first hospital admission for cardiac causes or (3) first emergency department visit for cardiac causes. Risks were compared with time-dependent Cox regression analysis adjusting for various cardiac risk factors.During 124,932 person-years of observation (n = 55,383), 73 youth died, 5 because of cardiac causes. No cardiac death occurred during 42,612 person-years of stimulant use. Hospital admissions for cardiac cause occurred for 27 children (8 during stimulant use, 11 during 35,671 person-years of former use, and 8 during 46,649 person-years of nonuse); and 1091 children visited the emergency department for cardiac causes (8.7 per 1000 person-years). Current stimulant use was associated with a 20% increase in the hazard for emergency department visits when compared with nonuse. No increased risk was found for periods of former use when compared with nonuse.Incidence rates of cardiac events requiring hospitalization were small and similar to national background rates. Stimulants were associated with an increase in cardiac emergency department visits. More evidence is needed that addresses the long-term risk/benefit of the various treatment options and the effect of other cardiac risk factors and comedications.Bupropion versus methylphenidate in the treatment of attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder.In the treatment of attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), the efficacy of the tricyclic antidepressants and monoamine oxidase inhibitor antidepressants has been compared with that of both placebo and the stimulants (methylphenidate and/or dextroamphetamine). However, the effectiveness of bupropion has been contrasted only with placebo. The primary aim of this study was to contrast the efficacy of bupropion with that of methylphenidate in the treatment of ADHD.A double-blind, crossover design was used in this study. After a 14-day medication washout period, 15 ADHD subjects (7 to 17 years old) were randomized to either methylphenidate or bupropion for 6 weeks, washed out for an additional 2 weeks, and then "crossed over" to the other drug. Methylphenidate was titrated to the maximum effective dose of 0.4 to 1.3 mg/kg per day (mean 0.7 mg/kg per day) and bupropion was titrated to an effective dose ranging from 1.4 to 5.7 mg/kg per day (mean 3.3 mg/kg per day).Both methylphenidate and bupropion produced significantly greater (p < .001) and equivalent improvement on the Iowa-Conners Teacher's Rating Scale according to both the subjects' parents and teachers. The same pattern of improvement was also noted for improvement on the Clinical Global Impression Scale, Kagan's Matching Familiar Figures Test, Continuous Performance Test, Children's Depression Inventory, Children's Manifest Anxiety Scale, and Rey Auditory-Verbal Learning Test.In this double-blind, crossover trial, bupropion and methylphenidate were both effective and did not differ in their overall efficacy as treatments for ADHD.Reliability of global impressions for assessing methylphenidate effects in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder.Agreement between raters using global impressions to assess methylphenidate response was analyzed for children with Attention-Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD) undergoing double-blind, placebo-controlled, crossover methylphenidate trials. Caregivers were more likely to disagree than agree when asked to rate the children as "better, same, or worse" during each day of the trial. Over-all agreement was 42.9%, only 9.6% above what would be expected based on chance alone. Further, none of the interrater reliability coefficients (Cohen's kappa) for the individual children were statistically significant.Oral health status, salivary flow rate and salivary quality in children, adolescents and young adults with ADHD.Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is a childhood neurological disorder that presents in 3-7% of school-age children. Studies have shown that children, adolescents and young adults with ADHD are more prone to caries than those without.The study investigated a possible relationship between the oral health status of children, adolescents and young adults diagnosed with ADHD, both with and without pharmacological intervention, and the following: salivary flow rate, oral mucosal pH, plaque index (PI), oral hygiene and dietary behaviour.DMFT/dmft index (D;d-Decay, M;m-Missing; F;f-Filled,T;t-teeth), plaque index, oral mucosal pH and unstimulated whole salivary flow (USF) were examined in three groups of children, adolescents and young adults: those diagnosed with ADHD with no pharmacological intervention (N=31), those treated with medications for ADHD (N=30), and a healthy control group (N=30). Diet and oral health habits were assessed by means of questionnaires completed by parents.Mean USF values were 0.72, 0.85 and 1.13 ml/min for participants with ADHD and without medication, with ADHD and with medication, and without ADHD, respectively (p=0.016). There were no differences in the DMFT/dmft index and in parent reported diet and oral health behaviour between the three groups. Children with ADHD demonstrated a statistically significant higher plaque index (p<0.05).The ADHD group, with or without pharmacological intervention, showed higher plaque index and lower USF, but no difference in DMFT/dmft. The ADHD group did not differ from the non-ADHD group in their diet or oral health behaviour as assessed by parent reports.Use of methylphenidate for attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder in patients with epilepsy or electroencephalographic abnormalities.Methylphenidate is commonly believed to lower seizure threshold. The safe use of methylphenidate has not been clarified in patients with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and concomitant active seizure or electroencephalographic (EEG) abnormalities. Patients with ADHD and active seizures (n = 57) and patients with ADHD and EEG abnormalities (n = 62), 6 to 16 years of age, were included in the study. The safety and efficacy of treatment with antiepilepsy drugs combined with methylphenidate were determined by assessing seizure frequency, changes in ADHD symptoms, the Conners' Rating Scales, EEG differences, and side effects. The Conners' Rating Scales, performed by parents and teachers, and mean total ADHD symptom scores at the beginning of the study and at the end were significantly different (P = .05 for the Conners' Rating Scales and P = .001 for ADHD symptom scores). Methylphenidate had a beneficial effect on EEG. Seizure frequency did not change from baseline. The side effects of methylphenidate were mild and transient Methylphenidate is safe and effective in children with ADHD and concomitant active seizures or EEG abnormalities.The effect of methylphenidate on three forms of response inhibition in boys with AD/HD.The current study was aimed at (a) investigating the effect of three doses methylphenidate (MPH) and placebo on inhibition of a prepotent response, inhibition of an ongoing response, and interference control in Attention Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (AD/HD), and (b) studying dose-response relations for the three forms of response inhibition. To meet these aims, the following tasks were selected: two versions of the Stop Paradigm for inhibition of a prepotent response, a Circle Tracing Task and a recently developed Follow Task for inhibition of an ongoing response, and the Stroop Color-Word Test and an Eriksen Flanker Task for interference control. These tasks were administered to 23 boys with AD/HD during four treatment conditions: 5 mg MPH, 10 mg MPH, 20 mg MPH, and placebo. A pseudorandomized, multiple-blind, placebo-controlled, within-subject design was used. As hypothesized, inhibitory control in children with AD/HD improved under MPH compared to placebo. However, this effect was only significant for inhibition of a prepotent response and inhibition of an ongoing response (as measured by the Follow Task), but not for interference control. The relation between treatment condition and response was linear. However, this linear relation was due to improved inhibitory control under MPH compared to placebo, because no effects of MPH dose were observed for any of the response inhibition measures.[Quantitative effect of treatment with methylphenidate on EEG--a pilot study].As a presumptive side effect, a lowered seizure threshold due to medication with methylphenidate remains controversial. The pilot study at hand addresses the experimental verification of this claim. Furthermore, quantitative effects of methylphenidate treatment on EEG are measured.The EEGs of 15 patients with ADHD aged 6 to 14 years were acquisitioned. Diagnosis was made according to multi-axial diagnostic procedures and in observance of all ICD-10 criteria. In order to evaluate the electrophysiological effects of methylphenidate, the EEG-data were analysed with regard to the composition of the frequency spectrum and the occurrence of pathological EEG-alterations.The analysis of EEG data prior to and subsequent to medication with methylphenidate showed an increase of occipital alpha-activity, whereas of delta-theta-activity was reduced. Beta-activity increased in the central region and showed a trend towards a frontal increase. Neither before nor after treatment with methylphenidate could pathological potentials be detected.The results support the common view in the existing literature that methylphenidate does not lower the seizure threshold. Rather its effect on electrophysiological parameters can be described as a normalisation in terms of an acceleration of the occipital rhythm.ADHD treatment with once-daily OROS methylphenidate: final results from a long-term open-label study.Few studies have assessed effectiveness and tolerability of stimulants when used for prolonged periods in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). This article presents final results from an open-label, multisite study of a once-daily formulation of methylphenidate (MPH), OROS MPH.Subjects received OROS MPH (18-54 mg initially, with adjustments based on clinical condition) for up to 24 months. Multiple measures of ADHD symptoms, vital signs, weight, height, and laboratory results were assessed throughout the study period.A total of 407 children enrolled in the open-label study and 229 completed the trial. Effectiveness of OROS MPH therapy was maintained throughout the study as indicated by parent and investigator assessments. There was a 26% increase in mean daily dose over the study period, with the majority of the increase occurring during year 1. In general, treatment was well tolerated, with 31 (7.6%) of subjects discontinuing because of adverse events. Minimal effects on growth in height and weight were observed during the study. No clinically significant effects on vital signs or laboratory test parameters were observed.: Sustained effectiveness of OROS MPH was maintained for up to 24 months with minimal effects on growth, tics, vital signs, or laboratory test values.Comparative efficacy of methylphenidate and atomoxetine in oppositional defiant disorder comorbid with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.Oppositional defiant disorder (ODD) is frequently comorbid with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and is associated with substantial functional impairments. Methylphenidate and atomoxetine are well-established drugs for the management of ADHD. Some studies from Western countries have reported these drugs to be effective in the management of ODD comorbid with ADHD. This study aimed to assess if methylphenidate and atomoxetine are efficacious in treating Indian children with ODD comorbid with ADHD.In this prospective, open-label study, 37 patients of age 6-14 years with a diagnosis of ODD comorbid with ADHD randomly received either methylphenidate (dose 0.2-1 mg/kg/day) or atomoxetine (dose 0.5-1.2 mg/kg/day) for 8 weeks. Improvements in ADHD and ODD symptoms were assessed using Vanderbilt ADHD diagnostic parent rating scale (VADPRS).At 8 weeks, there were statistically significant improvements in both ADHD and ODD symptoms in both methylphenidate and atomoxetine groups, as per VADPRS. The improvements produced and tolerability was comparable in the two groups. 80% of the patients from methylphenidate group and 64.3% patients from atomoxetine group ceased to fulfill the criteria for the presence of ODD at 8 weeks.Methylphenidate and atomoxetine are effective in the treatment of ODD comorbid with ADHD in short duration.Pharmacokinetics and therapeutic effect of OROS methylphenidate under different breakfast conditions in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.To examine the pharmacokinetics (PKs) and pharmacodynamics (PDs) of OROS methylphenidate (OROS MPH) dosed once daily (QD) versus an early standard regimen (immediate-release [IR] MPH dosed three times daily [TID]) under various breakfast conditions.This single-center, double-blind, double-dummy, randomized, crossover study of OROS MPH (NCT00269815) in children aged 6 to 12 years with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder evaluated the PKs and PDs of MPH given with different breakfast conditions: OROS MPH administered after a high-fat breakfast, after a normal breakfast, or after fasting and IR MPH administered after a normal breakfast or after fasting in the morning and at two subsequent time points during the day. To maximize information, patients were divided into two groups, each receiving three of the five treatments for 1 day in a three-period, randomized, crossover design. Patients were assigned to 1 of 3 dosage levels (OROS MPH 18, 36, and 54 mg QD, and an assumed equivalent regimen of IR MPH 5, 10, and 15 mg given TID) based on their prestudy established clinical dose of IR MPH. PD measurements included Combined-Attention and Deportment scores on a rating scale of school behavior (the Swanson, Kotkin, Agler, M-Flynn, and Pelham), global assessments of efficacy, and activity monitor levels during academic seatwork. Serial blood samples for PK analysis were taken predose, and then every 60 to 90 minutes until 11.5 hours postdose. Vital signs were assessed predose, and then every 1.5 to 2.5 hours until 11.5 hours postdose.Of the 32 patients enrolled, 31 completed the study. The PK profiles for MPH after OROS MPH administration were similar under all conditions (with normal, high-fat breakfast, or fasting). No bioequivalence tests of OROS MPH and IR MPH under various breakfast conditions were done because there were so few patients in each dose level of treatment. The two IR MPH conditions (after normal breakfast and fasting) were not compared. The drug-to-metabolite ratios (area under the curve) for all OROS MPH and IR MPH treatments were similar. OROS MPH and IR MPH provided a similar therapeutic effect, irrespective of breakfast conditions, as demonstrated by the Swanson, Kotkin, Agler, M-Flynn, and Pelham Attention and Deportment measures and global assessments. No serious adverse events, no deaths, and no clinically significant changes in vital signs were reported, except for one patient who was discontinued early because of repeated systolic blood pressure elevations on study day 1.The results of this study demonstrate that in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder, administering OROS MPH with or without food produces similar PK and PD profiles.Association of salivary dehydroepiandrosterone levels and symptoms in patients with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder during six months of treatment with methylphenidate.This prospective study aimed to determine whether salivary levels of dehydroepiandrosterone (DHEA) in patients with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) change significantly during 6 months of treatment with methylphenidate (MPH), and to investigate long-term relationship between these levels and ADHD symptoms. Fifty ADHD patients aged between 6 and 12 years, and 50 age- and gender-matched healthy subjects were recruited. ADHD patients were prescribed oral MPH with a dose range of 5-15 mg/day at the discretion of the psychiatrist. DHEA levels were determined from saliva samples collected from both ADHD patients and healthy subjects at pretreatment and 1, 3, and 6 months from pretreatment visit. ADHD symptoms were evaluated with the Swanson, Nolan, and Pelham, Version IV Scale for ADHD and the ADHD Rating Scale, and computerized Continuous Performance Test (CPT). The results showed that salivary DHEA levels significantly increased in ADHD patients during the 6-month course of methylphenidate treatment, but the DHEA levels did not significantly change in the untreated healthy group during the 6-month period of natural observation. For the longitudinal observation, among ADHD patients, the salivary DHEA levels were independently correlated with distraction and impulsivity performance in the CPT, but not correlated with inattention and hyperactivity in the clinical ADHD symptoms. Whether DHEA exerts effects on neurocognitive functions as mediators or independently of MPH warrants further investigation.Impairment and deportment responses to different methylphenidate doses in children with ADHD: the MTA titration trial.Results of the NIMH Collaborative Multisite Multimodal Treatment Study of Children With Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (MTA) were analyzed to determine whether a double-blind, placebo-controlled methylphenidate (MPH) titration trial identified the best MPH dose for each child with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Children with ADHD assigned to MTA medication treatment groups (n = 289) underwent a controlled 28-day titration protocol that administered different MPH doses (placebo, low, middle, and high) on successive days.A repeated-measures analysis of variance revealed main effects for MPH dose with greater effects on teacher ratings of impairment and deportment (F3 = 100.6, n = 223, p = .0001; effect sizes 0.8-1.3) than on parent ratings of similar endpoints (F3 = 55.61, n = 253, p = .00001; effect sizes 0.4-0.6). Dose did not interact with period, dose order, comorbid diagnosis, site, or treatment group.The MTA titration protocol validated the efficacy of weekend MPH dosing and established a total daily dose limit of 35 mg of MPH for children weighing less than 25 kg. It replicated previously reported MPH response rates (77%), distribution of best doses (10-50 mg/day) across subjects, effect sizes on impairment and deportment, as well as dose-related adverse events.Norepinephrine transporter -3081(A/T) and alpha-2A-adrenergic receptor MspI polymorphisms are associated with cardiovascular side effects of OROS-methylphenidate treatment.The purpose of this study was to investigate a possible association between norepinephrine genes and cardiovascular side effects of the Osmotic Controlled-Release Oral Delivery System-methylphenidate (OROS-MPH) in Korean children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). One hundred and one children with ADHD (8.7 ± 1.7 years) were recruited from child psychiatric centers at six university hospitals in South Korea. All participants were drug-naive ADHD children treated with OROS-MPH for 12 weeks. During the treatment period the investigators titrated the OROS-MPH dosage on the basis of symptom severity and side effects. Resting heart rate (HR), diastolic blood pressure (DBP), and systolic blood pressure (SBP) were examined before and after treatment. The percentage change score (post-treatment - pretreatment/pretreatment × 100) of each parameter was calculated. Genotyping of SLC6A2 -3081(A/T) and G1287A, and alpha-2A-adrenergic receptor (ADRA2A) MspI and DraI polymorphisms was performed. Clinically significant changes were not found in cardiovascular monitoring during the course of treatment. An increase of HR after OROS-MPH treatment was found to be statistically significant (t = 3.54, p = 0.001). Changes in SBP and DBP were not significant and no specific change was found in the ECGs. However, an additive regression analysis demonstrated a significant association between SLC6A2 -3081(A/T) and percentage change in HR post-treatment (p = 0.01) after controlling for age, gender, dosage of MPH and response and baseline pulse rate. Children with ADHD having the T/T genotype of SLC6A2 showed a 12.5% increase in HR compared to baseline, whereas children with the A/T or A/A genotype showed a 3.5% and 2.5% increase after OROS-MPH treatment, respectively. There was also a significant association between the ADRA2A MspI genotype and percentage change of DBP post-treatment after controlling for age, gender, dosage of MPH and response and baseline DBP (p = 0.009). Children with ADHD having the C/C genotype of ADRA2A MspI showed an 18.5% increase in DBP compared to baseline, but children with the G/G or G/C genotype showed a 0.2% decrease after OROS-MPH treatment. The overall cardiovascular effects of OROS-MPH were modest. However, our findings show a positive association between norepinephrine-related gene polymorphisms and cardiovascular response induced by MPH in Korean children with ADHD. Consideration must be given to such children or adults with specific norepinephrine-related genotypes, especially if they show significant changes in HR or DBP after OROS-MPH administration.Switching from Methylphenidate-Immediate Release (MPH-IR) to Methylphenidate-OROS (OROS-MPH): A Multi-center, Open-label Study in Korea.The objective of this study was to evaluate the efficacy and safety of methylphenidate HCL OROS extended-release (OROS-MPH) among children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) who had been previously treated with methylphenidate HCL immediate-release (MPH-IR).The sample included 102 children aged 6-12 (9.4±2.6) years who had been diagnosed with ADHD according the criteria of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders-Fourth Edition (DSM-IV; American Psychiatric Association, 1994) and who were attending seven centers in Korea. All participants had been medicated with a stable dose of MPH (10-60 mg/day) for at least 3 weeks before entry into the study. Doses of OROS-MPH were comparable to daily doses of MPH. Efficacy was assessed at baseline (day 0) and at day 28 with the Inattentive-Overactive with Aggression (IOWA) Conners Rating Scale, which was completed by parents/caregivers and teachers, the Peer Interaction Rating Items, which were completed by teachers, and the Clinical Global Impression (CGI) scale, which was completed by child psychiatrists. Paired t-tests were used, and P-values were set at the 0.05 level.Of the subjects, 92.2% were boys and 79.4% were students in the first to fourth grades of elementary school. 72% were diagnosed with the combined type of ADHD, 23% were diagnosed with the inattentive type, and 5% were diagnosed with the hyperactive-impulsive type. The results of the parents' responses to the Inattention/Hyperactivity (I/H) and Oppositional/Defiant (O/D) subscales of the IOWA Conners scale indicated statistically significant improvement in childrens behavior after 4 weeks of treatment with OROS-MPH (t=6.28, p<.001, t=4.12, p<.001). However, the teachers' responses to the Conners I/H and O/D subscales indicated no significant improvement at 4 weeks. The teachers also reported no significant improvements under the OROS-MPH compared with the MPH-IR condition with respect to peer interactions. Scores on the CGI scale showed that 46.1% of children with ADHD were rated by psychiatrists as "minimally improved", 27.5% as "much improved," 1.0% as "very much improved," 3.9% as "minimally worse," and 16.7% as showing "no change". Children exhibited significantly fewer tics with OROS-MPH treatment than with MPH-IR treatment (19.6% vs. 27.7%). We found no differences between in sleep and appetite problems according to medication.The results of this study indicated that an MPH-IR regimen can be successfully changed to a once-daily OROS-MPH regimen without any serious adverse effects. The changes in parent/caregiver IOWA Conners ratings suggested that OROS-MPH improved the control of symptoms after school, a finding that is consistent with the 12-h duration of action of this medication. Because the therapeutic effect of OROS-MPH is sufficiently longer than that of a b.i.d. dose of MPH-IR, OROS-MPH had significant positive effects on oppositional/defiant behavior in addition to its effects on the core symptoms of ADHD.Methylphenidate and the risk of trauma.Children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) are prone to sustaining trauma that requires emergency department (ED) admission. Methylphenidate (MPH) can reduce ADHD symptoms and may thus theoretically reduce the risk of trauma-related ED admission, but previous studies do not make this association clear. This study examines this association.A total of 17 381 patients aged 6 to 19 years who received MPH prescriptions were identified by using the Clinical Data Analysis & Reporting System (2001-2013). Using a self-controlled case series study design, the relative incidence of trauma-related ED admissions was compared with periods of patient exposure and nonexposure to MPH.Among 17 381 patients prescribed MPH, 4934 had at least 1 trauma-related ED admission. The rate of trauma-related ED admission was lower during exposed periods compared with nonexposed periods (incidence rate ratio [IRR]: 0.91 [95% confidence interval (CI): 0.86-0.97]). The findings were similar only when the incident trauma episode was assessed (IRR: 0.89 [95% CI: 0.82-0.96]). A similar protective association was found in both genders. In validation analysis using nontrauma-related ED admissions as a negative control outcome, no statistically significant association was found (IRR: 0.99 [95% CI: 0.95-1.02]). All sensitivity analyses demonstrated consistent results.This study supports the hypothesis that MPH is associated with a reduced risk of trauma-related ED admission in children and adolescents. A similar protective association was found in both male and female patients. This protective association should be considered in clinical practice.Methylphenidate transdermal system: a multisite, open-label study of dermal reactions in pediatric patients diagnosed with ADHD.To characterize dermal reactions and examine methylphenidate (MPH) sensitization in subjects receiving methylphenidate transdermal system (MTS).This multicenter, open-label, dose-optimization study utilized MTS doses of 10, 15, 20, and 30 mg in children aged 6 to 12 years, inclusive (N = 305), with a DSM-IV-TR primary diagnosis of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder. The study was conducted between January 8, 2007, and August 23, 2007. Subjects wore MTS on their hips for 9 hours per day, alternating sides daily for a total of 7 weeks. Assessments included the Experience of Discomfort scale, Transdermal System Adherence scale, and Dermal Response Scale (DRS; 0 = no irritation, 7 = strong reaction). On-study reevaluations were conducted to characterize DRS scores ≥ 4. Epicutaneous allergy patch testing was conducted for DRS scores ≥ 6, persistent DRS scores ≥ 4, DRS score increase following an assessment of ≥ 4, or DRS scores of 4 or 5 following elective discontinuation.Approximately half of subjects experienced definite erythema at the patch site that generally dissipated within 24 hours. Four subjects experienced a DRS score of 4 (1%): erythema in 1 subject resolved on study treatment, 2 cases resolved poststudy and subjects tolerated oral MPH, and 1 subject discontinued treatment. The latter subject was referred for patch testing and was diagnosed with allergic contact sensitization to MPH.Few severe dermal effects were seen with MTS treatment. Dermal reactions were characterized as contact dermatitis and dissipated rapidly. On patch testing, 1 subject (0.3%) manifested sensitization to MPH.clinicaltrials.gov Identifier: NCT00434213.Peripheral vasculopathy associated with psychostimulant treatment in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Psychostimulants (methylphenidate and amphetamine salt) are the pharmacologic treatment of choice for children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder. However, psychostimulants have been linked to a variety of vascular problems, including peripheral vasculopathy. This article describes four boys with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder who developed vasculopathy during treatment with psychostimulants.Dose-response effects of chronic methylphenidate administration on late event-related potentials in attention deficit disorder.Stimulants, such as methylphenidate, are extensively used in the treatment of attention deficit disorder. In the present study, we used a double-blind placebo-controlled, prospective protocol to evaluate the effects of methylphenidate (MP) (dose 0.1 and 0.33 mg/kg three times daily) on the late event-related potentials, some of which are considered biological attention correlates. Sixteen patients, 6-15 years old, were tested, using an auditory target selection paradigm. The latencies of N200 and amplitudes of P150 increased with MP (p less than 0.01). These effects are in the direction of normal maturational change. The latencies of P300 tended to be shorter in adolescents than in children, and with high MP dose the P300 latencies became even shorter in adolescents but were prolonged in children (p less than 0.05). This pattern of change supports the view that pharmacological interactions with various cerebral phenomena including cognition may be age-specific.Does brief, clinically based, intensive multimodal behavior therapy enhance the effects of methylphenidate in children with ADHD?The additional value of a short-term, clinically based, intensive multimodal behavior therapy to optimally titrated methylphenidate in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) was investigated.Fifty children with ADHD (ages 8-12) were randomized to treatment of methylphenidate or treatment with methylphenidate combined with 10 weeks of multimodal behavior therapy. The multimodal behavior therapy consisted of a child and parent behavioral therapy and a teacher behavioral training. Assessments included parent, teacher and child ratings of ADHD symptoms, oppositional and conduct behavior, social skills, parenting stress, anxiety and self-worth.Both treatment conditions yielded significant improvements on all outcome domains. No significant differences were found between both treatments.No evidence was found for the additive effect of multimodal behavior therapy next to optimally titrated methylphenidate.This study does not support the expectation that optimally dosed stimulant treated children with ADHD should routinely receive psychosocial treatment to further reduce ADHD- and related symptoms.Brain biochemical effects of methylphenidate treatment using proton magnetic spectroscopy in youth with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder: a controlled pilot study.This study conducted spectroscopic analyses using proton (1H) Magnetic Resonance Spectroscopy (at 4 Tesla) in a sample of adolescents with Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD), before and after treatment with extended release methylphenidate (OROS MPH), as compared to a sample of healthy comparators.The main aim of this study is to use 1H MRS to measure differences in brain biochemistry between adolescents with and without ADHD, and to assess changes in cerebral biochemistry, before and after stimulant treatment in ADHD youth.Subjects with ADHD were medically healthy adolescents treated in an open label fashion with OROS MPH (mean dose: 54 mg/day; 0.90 mg/kg/day). Subjects with ADHD were scanned before and after OROS MPH treatment. Healthy comparators were scanned once. Magnetic resonance (MR) spectroscopy studies were performed on a 4.0 T Varian Unity/Inova MR scanner; proton spectra were acquired from the Anterior Cingulate Cortex (ACC). Data were analyzed using MANOVA and repeated measurement ANOVA. Higher metabolite ratios (Glutamate/myo-inositol, Glutamine/myo-inositol, Glutamate + Glutamine/myo-inositol) were observed in the ACC in untreated ADHD subjects as compared to controls, and to treated ADHD youth; these group differences did not reach the a priori threshold for statistical significance.These preliminary findings suggest the presence of glutamatergic abnormalities in adolescents with ADHD, which may normalize with MPH treatment. Larger sample, controlled studies are needed to confirm these preliminary findings.Effect of transitioning from extended-release methylphenidate onto osmotic, controlled-release methylphenidate in children/adolescents with ADHD: results of a 3-month non-interventional study.To explore the clinical outcomes of children/adolescents with ADHD who transitioned from extended-release methylphenidate (ER MPH, Medikinet Retard) to osmotic release oral system (OROS) MPH (Concerta). Medikinet Retard is a registered trade name of Medice, Bad Iserlohn, Germany. Concerta is a registered trade name of Janssen-Cilag GmbH, Neuss, Germany.This prospective, non-interventional study included patients aged 6 to 18 years with a confirmed diagnosis of ADHD who experienced insufficient clinical response and/or poor tolerability on ER MPH. Patients transitioned onto OROS MPH and were followed for 12 weeks. Symptoms, functional outcome, health-related quality of life, safety and tolerability were assessed.180 patients were included in the intention-to-treat analysis. The mean ER MPH dose before switching was 28.2 mg/day; mean OROS MPH starting dose was 38.1 mg/day, increasing to 41.2 mg/day at the final visit. Mean treatment duration was 79.49 ± 24.22 days (median 85; range 7-136). Several symptomatic and functional outcomes under OROS MPH treatment changed from baseline and included the Conners' Parent Rating Scale (CPRS; -11.7 ± 11.3; p < 0.0001), C-GAS (12.3 ± 15.2; p < 0.0001) and ILC-LQ0-28 (parents' rating 2.9 ± 4.3 and patients' rating 2.8 ± 3.8; both p < 0.0001). Improvements in social interactions, playing with other children, doing household chores, or school homework, going to bed, and behavior towards visitors/at visits were noted (p < 0.0001). Approximately 40% of patients reported better sleep quality and appetite (p < 0.0001), and 72.8% expressed satisfaction with OROS MPH therapy compared to previous ER MPH. OROS MPH was well tolerated; the most common AEs after switching, with an incidence >2% and possibly related to therapy, were involuntary muscle contractions (tics; 8.9%), insomnia (7.2%) and anorexia (5.0%). No relevant changes in body weight or vital signs were observed. Three patients reported four serious AEs, but none were considered related to OROS MPH. Limitations included those associated with the uncontrolled, open-label design, possible inclusion bias and non-validation of the CPRS in a German population.Transitioning onto OROS MPH improved functionality, symptom control and decreased burden of disease in patients with ADHD who had insufficient response to, and/or poor tolerability of ER MPH. Similarly, care givers benefited from patients' treatment and reported significant reduction in their burden of disease and improvement of their quality of life upon the child's transition onto OROS MPH.Stimulant medication withdrawal during long-term therapy in children with comorbid attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder and chronic multiple tic disorder.In this study we examined changes in attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder behaviors and motor and vocal tics during withdrawal from long-term maintenance therapy with stimulant medication.Subjects were 19 children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder and chronic tic disorder who had received methylphenidate (n = 17) or dextroamphetamine (n = 2) for a minimum of 1 year. Children were switched to placebo under double-blind conditions. Treatment effects were assessed by using direct observations of child behavior in a simulated (clinic-based) classroom and behavior rating scales completed by parents and clinician.There was no change (group data) in the frequency or severity of motor tics or vocal tics during the placebo condition compared with maintenance dose of stimulant medication (ie, no evidence of tic exacerbation while receiving medication or of a withdrawal reaction). There was no evidence of tic exacerbation in the evening as a rebound effect. Treatment with the maintenance dose was also associated with behavioral improvement in attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder behaviors, indicating continued efficacy.Abrupt withdrawal of stimulant medication in children receiving long-term maintenance therapy does not appear to result in worsening of tic frequency or severity. Nevertheless, these findings do not preclude the possibility of drug withdrawal reactions in susceptible individuals.[Infantile psychosis secondary to methylphenidate].Effect of osmotic-release oral system methylphenidate on learning skills in adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder: an open-label study.We evaluated the effect of osmotic-release oral system (OROS) methylphenidate on learning skills in adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). In an open-label study, 121 adolescents with ADHD were administered flexible doses of OROS methylphenidate for 12 weeks. The efficacy of methylphenidate on ADHD symptoms was evaluated by ADHD Rating Scale (ARS) and Clinical Global Impression Scale (CGI). Learning Skills Test (LST) was used to measure the learning skills of the participants at the baseline and the endpoint. Continuous performance test, visuospatial and verbal working memory, verbal fluency, and inhibition were evaluated before and after the 12 weeks of treatment. The mean total and subscores of LST were significantly increased after the 12-week treatment with OROS methylphenidate. Executive functions were also improved during the trial, with the exception of inhibition measured by the Stroop Test. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first study to examine the influence of OROS methylphenidate on learning skill. As a result, OROS methylphenidate was effective in enhancing learning skills in adolescents with ADHD.An observational study of once-daily modified-release methylphenidate in ADHD: quality of life, satisfaction with treatment and adherence.Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) impacts significantly on the quality of life (QoL) of patients and their families. Choice of therapy is increasingly influenced by treatment satisfaction and patient preference, with once-daily modified-release methylphenidate (MPH-MR) formulations offering clear benefits compared with immediate-release (IR) dosage forms. The effects of MPH-MR on QoL in ADHD have not been widely investigated and need more clarity in practice. The open-label OBSEER study evaluated the effectiveness and tolerability of Equasym XL(®), a MPH-MR formulation, in routine practice. Children and adolescents (aged 6-17 years) with ADHD and attending school were included if Equasym XL(®) treatment was planned by the treating physician. Physicians, parents and patients completed questionnaires assessing QoL (KINDL; parent, child or adolescent versions), satisfaction with medication, adherence and treatment tolerability at baseline (Visit 1), 1-3 weeks (Visit 2) and 6-12 weeks (Visit 3) over a maximum 3-month observation period. Data from 822 consecutively referred patients were analysed. QoL and medication satisfaction increased from Visit 1 to Visit 3, with both patients and parents rating therapy with Equasym XL(®) as better than previous drug therapy. KINDL total score effect sizes were 0.67 (parents' ratings), 0.52 (children's ratings) and 0.51 (adolescents' ratings; all p < 0.001). All KINDL subscores also increased: both parents and patients had the greatest improvement for school. Adherence to Equasym XL(®) was frequently rated as superior to prior treatment, particularly compared with MPH-IR repeated dosing. Treatment was generally well tolerated; approximately 3% of the patients discontinued treatment due to adverse events. Equasym XL(®) improved QoL compared with prior therapy, and resulted in good medication satisfaction and adherence in drug-naïve and previously treated patients.EEG coherence in girls with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder: stimulant effects in good responders.This study investigated the effects of stimulants on EEG coherence in girls with Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (AD/HD). Twenty girls with AD/HD (aged 7-12) and 20 age- and sex-matched controls had an eyes-closed resting electroencephalogram (EEG) recorded from 21 electrode sites. Coherence was calculated from eight intrahemispheric electrode pairs (four in each hemisphere), and eight interhemispheric electrode pairs, for the delta, theta, alpha and beta frequency bands. AD/HD participants were tested twice: first, prior to medication being prescribed, and second, six months later on a therapeutic dose of a stimulant. With intrahemispheric coherences at short-medium inter-electrode distances, AD/HD girls off-medication had reduced lateralisation in the delta, theta and alpha bands. They also had reduced lateralisation in the theta band for longer inter-electrode distances, and increased frontal interhemispheric coherences in all frequency bands. Medication had no impact on the laterality anomalies, but produced novel increases in intrahemispheric coherences at short-medium inter-electrode distances, which reached significance in the delta band and approached significance in the alpha band. However, these increased coherences remained indistinguishable from control levels. Reduced hemispheric lateralisations found in these AD/HD participants illustrate cortical abnormalities consistent with maturational lag explanations. The widespread elevated frontal interhemispheric coherences found in these AD/HD girls could reflect the narrow profile of female medication responders identified in clinical settings. The lack of substantial coherence medication effects in good clinical responders supports a previous medication study with AD/HD boys, and suggests that these coherence anomalies reflect structural, rather than solely functional, differences in brain development in AD/HD.Severe recurrent pancreatitis in a child with ADHD after starting treatment with methylphenidate (Ritalin).We present a case of a 10-year-old boy, who had severe relapsing pancreatitis, three times in two months within 3 weeks after starting treatment with methylphenidate (Ritalin) due to attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). Pancreatitis due to the use of (methylphenidate) Ritalin was never published before. Attention must be made by the physicians regarding this possible complication, and this complication should be taken into consideration in every patient with abdominal pain who was newly treated with Ritalin. Impact of comorbid autism spectrum disorders on stimulant response in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder: a retrospective and prospective effectiveness study.In the recent past, psychiatrists and paediatricians have avoided prescribing stimulant medication, such as methylphenidate and dexamphetamine to patients with autism spectrum disorders (ASD) because of both doubts about efficacy and concern that these medications make stereotypies worse. Recently, a number of small trials have suggested that methyphenidate does have a role in the management of hyperactivity in children with autistic spectrum disorders.Children with ASD and attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), and children with ADHD without ASD received standard treatment with methyphenidate from one specialist centre. A combination of standardized and novel outcome tools was used to allow both an exploratory retrospective study of 174 children and then a prospective study of a further 52 children to be carried out.After treatment with stimulants, the subjects in both groups showed statistically significant improvements in target symptoms of 'hyperactivity', 'impulsivity', 'inattention', 'oppositionality', 'aggression' and 'intermittent explosive rage'. The Clinical Global Impression-Improvement and efficacy index measures also improved in each group. In both the retrospective and the prospective studies, there was no statistically significant difference in the degree of improvements between each group. Importantly, neither tics nor repetitive behaviours worsened in either group. Children in the 'ADHD-only' group who were prescribed stimulants experienced significant 'nausea', 'giddiness', 'headaches' and 'sleep difficulties', whereas sleep difficulties were the only side effect that emerged in children in the ASD with ADHD group.Both studies presented here support previous findings from smaller studies that show children with autism and ADHD can respond as well to stimulants as children with ADHD alone. Although randomized controlled trials remain the gold standard for efficacy studies, systems like this that allow clinicians to continue rigorous and consistent monitoring for many years have a valuable role to play. Furthermore, such monitoring systems which now exist electronically can easily accumulate large data sets and reveal details about long-term effectiveness and long-term side effects of medication that are unlikely to be discovered in short-term trials.Comments on efficacy and tolerability of OROS methylphenidate in Korean children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Medication persistence in Turkish children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.The aim of this study was to investigate medication persistence in Turkish children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). The effects of sociodemographic characteristics, symptom severity of ADHD, comorbidity, and treatment-related factors influencing medication persistence in children diagnosed with ADHD were studied.Medication persistence over a continuous 12 month period was evaluated for 877 children and adolescents between 6 and 18 years of age, who were diagnosed with ADHD for the first time and started to receive medication. Medication persistence was determined according to whether or not taking the prescribed medication continued for 12 months after the initiation of treatment. Whereas the symptom severity of ADHD was assessed by using the Turgay Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th ed. (DSM-IV)-based Child and Adolescent Behaviour Disorders Screening and Rating Scale-Parents Form (T-DSM-IV-S), perceived medication efficacy after the first treatment was evaluated by the Clinical Global Impressions-Improvement Scale (CGI-I).In this study, medication persistence over a continuous 12 month period occurred at a rate of 30.2% (n=265) in the subjects studied. The hierarchical regression analysis conducted in this research revealed that younger age, higher hyperactivity/impulsivity symptom severity, use of long-acting methylphenidate, addition of another ADHD medication, addition of other psychotropic medications, absence of side effects, and perceived medication efficacy were associated with successful medication persistence over a continuous 12 month period.Understanding the factors that affect medication persistence in ADHD may improve treatment efficacy and symptom control, while minimizing future risks.Switching from oral extended-release methylphenidate to the methylphenidate transdermal system: continued attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder symptom control and tolerability after abrupt conversion.To evaluate symptom control and tolerability after abrupt conversion from oral extended-release methylphenidate (ER-MPH) to methylphenidate transdermal system (MTS) via a dose-transition schedule in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).In a 4-week, prospective, multisite, open-label study, 171 children (164 intent-to-treat) with diagnosed ADHD aged 6-12 years abruptly switched from a stable dose of oral ER-MPH to MTS in nominal dosages of 10, 15, 20, and 30 mg using a predefined dose-transition schedule. After the first week on the scheduled dose, the dose was titrated to optimal effect. The primary effectiveness outcome was the change from baseline (while taking ER-MPH) to week 4 in ADHD-Rating Scale-IV (ADHD-RS-IV) total scores. Adverse events (AEs) were assessed throughout the study.Most subjects (58%) remained on the initial MTS dose defined by the dose-transition schedule; 38% increased and 4% decreased their MTS dose for optimization. MTS dose optimization resulted in significantly better ADHD-RS-IV total (mean +/- SD) scores at week 4 than at baseline (9.9 +/- 7.47 vs. 14.1 +/- 7.48; p < 0.0001). The most commonly reported AEs included headache, decreased appetite, insomnia, and upper abdominal pain. Four subjects (2.3%) discontinued because of application site reactions and three discontinued because of other AEs.Abrupt conversion from a stable dose of oral ER-MPH to MTS was accomplished using a predefined dose-transition schedule without loss of symptom control; however, careful titration to optimal dose is recommended. Most AEs were mild to moderate and, with the exception of application site reactions, were similar to AEs typically observed with oral MPH. Limitations of this study included its open-label sequential design without placebo, which could result in spurious attribution of improvement to the study treatment and precluded superiority determinations of MTS over baseline ER-MPH treatment. The apparent superiority of MTS was likely due to more careful titration and clinical monitoring rather than the product itself. ClinicalTrials.gov: NCT00151983.Clinical assessment of psychopharmacological treatment of preschoolers with ADHD.Sixteen preschoolers, (8 with Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder [ADHD], 8 matched controls) were assessed twice, 5 months apart. Preschoolers with ADHD were rated by their parents as significantly more inattentive, exhibited more behavior problems, fewer age-appropriate social skills, made more errors of omission on both the visual and auditory attention tests, and more errors of commission on both the visual attention and the visual-search cancellation tests. Preschoolers with ADHD were then treated with stimulant medication and exhibited improved behavior as well as significantly reduced errors of omission on visual and auditory preschool vigilance tests, and fewer errors of commission on the visual-search preschool cancellation test. Developmentally appropriate direct measures of attention, in conjunction with parental ratings of child behavior, can be used to assess the efficacy of pharmacological treatment of preschoolers with ADHD.Long-term stimulant medication treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder: results from a population-based study.The purpose of this study was to offer detailed information about stimulant medication treatment provided throughout childhood to 379 children with research-identified attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in the 1976-1982 Rochester, MN, birth cohort. Subjects were retrospectively followed from birth until a mean of 17.2 years of age. The complete medical record of each subject was reviewed. The history and results of each episode of stimulant treatment were compared by gender, DSM-IV subtype of ADHD, and type of stimulant medication. Overall, 77.8% of subjects were treated with stimulants. Boys were 1.8 times more likely than girls to be treated. The median age at initiation (9.8 years), median duration of treatment (33.8 months), and likelihood of developing at least one side effect (22.3%) were not significantly different by gender. Overall, 73.1% of episodes of stimulant treatment were associated with a favorable response. The likelihood of a favorable response was comparable for boys and girls. Treatment was initiated earlier for children with either ADHD combined type or ADHD hyperactive-impulsive type than for children with ADHD predominantly inattentive type and duration of treatment was longer for ADHD combined type. There was no association between DSM-IV subtype and likelihood of a favorable response or of side effects. Dextroamphetamine and methylphenidate were equally likely to be associated with a favorable response, but dextroamphetamine was more likely to be associated with side effects. These results demonstrate that the effectiveness of stimulant medication treatment of ADHD provided throughout childhood is comparable to the efficacy of stimulant treatment demonstrated in clinical trials.The effects of stimulant medication on working memory functional connectivity in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Working memory impairments are commonly found in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and often improve with psychostimulant treatment. Little is known about how these medications affect the function of frontoparietal brain regions engaged for working memory. This study used functional magnetic resonance imaging (fMRI) to examine medication-related changes in brain activation and functional connectivity in ADHD.Eighteen ADHD-combined subtype youths (ages 11-17) twice completed a Sternberg working memory fMRI task in a randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled design. Medications were individualized as patients' standard, clinically effective psychostimulant (e.g., methylphenidate or dextroamphetamine/amphetamine combination) dose. Brain activity and functional connectivity were characterized using group independent component analysis. SPM5 repeated-measures t tests compared ADHD patients' network engagement and regional functional connectivity on and off medication.Independent component analysis identified six frontoparietal networks/components with hemodynamic responses to encoding/maintenance or retrieval phases of the Sternberg fMRI task. On medication, three of these networks significantly increased activation. Functional connectivity analyses found medication led to recruitment of additional brain regions that were not engaged into the networks when participants were on placebo. Also, medication strengthened connectivity of some frontoparietal regions. Many connectivity changes were directly related to improved working memory reaction time. Overall, there was strong evidence for regional functional connectivity changes following medication in structures previously implicated as abnormal in ADHD, such as anterior cingulate, ventrolateral prefrontal cortex, and precuneus.Stimulant medication has widespread effects on the functional connectivity of frontoparietal brain networks, which might be a mechanism that underlies their beneficial effects on working memory performance.Pharmacological treatment for attention deficit hyperactivity disorder: functional outcomes in children and adolescents from non-Western countries.Functional outcomes were measured over a 12-month period in children and adolescents with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) after they received monotherapy.Prospective, observational, noninterventional study.Conducted in six non-Western countries.Outpatients 6 to 17 years of age with a verified diagnosis of ADHD in accordance with the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual, Fourth Edition, Text Revision (DSM-IV-TR), together with their physicians, decided to initiate or switch treatment for ADHD. Patients were prescribed pharmacological monotherapy: methylphenidate (n=221), nootropic agents (n=91), or atomoxetine (n=234).Patients were followed for changes in their functional status and quality of life, which were assessed with the Child Health and Illness Profile-Child Edition (CHIP-CE) Achievement domain.At the end of the study, a mean improvement on the CHIP-CE Achievement domain score was observed for all countries and therapies except in Taiwan, where patients received atomoxetine, and in Lebanon, where patients received methylphenidate. No patient experienced a serious adverse event during the study. Four patients discontinued due to a treatment-emergent adverse event.After 12 months of treatment, clinical and functional outcomes were improved in children and adolescents from non-Western countries who initiated and remained on their prescribed pharmacological monotherapy.ADD and soft signs.Effects of osmotic-release methylphenidate on height and weight in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) following up to four years of treatment.There is some controversy concerning \the potential negative influence of methylphenidate on growth. The authors reviewed clinical records of 187 patients with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder under treatment with methylphenidate. The patients' weight, height, and body mass index were measured at diagnosis and during 4 years of follow-up. The dose of methylphenidate was gradually increased up to 1.31 ± 0.2 mg/kg/d. At diagnosis, mean weight value was lower than mean weight expected for age by 0.697 kg. This difference increased to 4.274 kg (at 30 months of treatment), although it subsequently decreased to 1.588 kg (at 48 months of treatment). Mean value of height was lower than expected mean height for age by 0.42 cm at diagnosis. This difference increased to 2.69 cm (at 30 months of treatment), but it subsequently decreased to 0.83 cm (at 48 months of treatment). The relationship between nutritional status and the negative effects on the height curve in those patients would require nutritional optimization to return anthropometric variables to normal.Can methylphenidate facilitate sleep in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder?Is methylphenidate-induced chorea responsive to chlorpromazine?Venlafaxine versus methylphenidate in pediatric outpatients with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder: a randomized, double-blind comparison trial.The present report aimed to investigate the efficacy and tolerability of venlafaxine compared to methylphenidate in children and adolescents with Attention Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD).This was a 6-week, parallel group, randomized clinical trial. Thirty-eight patients (27 boys and 11 girls) with a DSM-IV-TR diagnosis of ADHD were the study population of this trial. All study subjects were randomly assigned to receive treatment using capsules of venlafaxine at doses of 50-75 mg/day depending on weight (50 mg/day for <30 kg and 75 mg/day for >30 kg (group 1) or methylphenidate at a dose of 20-30 mg/day depending on weight (group 2) for a 6-week double blind, randomized clinical trial. The principal measure of outcome was the Teacher and Parent Attention Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder Rating Scale-IV.No significant differences were observed between the two groups on the Parent and Teacher Rating Scale scores (df = 1; F = 1.77; p = 0.19 and df = 1; F = 1.64; p = 0.20, respectively). Side effects of headaches and insomnia were observed more frequently in the methylphenidate group.The results suggest that venlafaxine may be useful for the treatment of ADHD. In addition, a tolerable side-effect profile is one of the advantages of venlafaxine in the treatment of ADHD.Effect of 12-week administration of 20-mg long-acting methylphenidate on Glu/Cr, NAA/Cr, Cho/Cr, and mI/Cr ratios in the prefrontal cortices of school-age children in Indonesia: a study using 1H magnetic resonance spectroscopy (MRS).Recent studies on the neurobiology of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) have suggested that there is dysregulation of dopamine-mediated neurotransmission, particularly in the prefrontal cortex and basal ganglia, and that treatment with methylphenidate reverses this dysregulation. Using methodology similar to previous studies involving putative markers of brain functioning, we used 1H magnetic resonance spectroscopy to study the effect of 12-week treatment with daily 20-mg long-acting methylphenidate on the glutamate/creatine, N-acetyl-aspartate/creatine, choline/creatine, and myoinositol/creatine ratios in the prefrontal cortices of medication-naive children with ADHD.This was a prospective study, using a pretest and posttest design, on a single group of 21 children (mean age, 8.52 years; 17 males and 4 females) with a diagnosis of ADHD. A low time echo (TE) magnetic resonance spectroscopic scans sampled voxels of interest (1.5 × 1.5 × 2.0) from both the right and left prefrontal cortices.After treatment, the N-acetyl-aspartate/creatine ratio increased 18.8% in the right prefrontal cortex (P = 0.001) and 10% in the left prefrontal cortex (P = 0.007); the glutamate/creatine ratio decreased 15% in the right prefrontal cortex (P = 0.005) and 14.1% in the left prefrontal cortex (P = 0.005); the choline/creatine ratio decreased 12.4% in the right prefrontal cortex (P = 0.037) and 16% in the left prefrontal cortex (P = 0.006); and the myoinositol/creatine ratio decreased 14.7% in the left prefrontal cortex (P = 0.011) and 7.7% in the right prefrontal cortex (P = 0.129).Notwithstanding the limitations of this pilot study, we found, after stimulant treatment, significant neurochemical changes (thought to reflect functional improvement and improved neuroplasticity) in the prefrontal cortices of children with ADHD.Neurotrophin 3 genotype and emotional adverse effects of osmotic-release oral system methylphenidate (OROS-MPH) in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Neurotrophin 3 (NTF3) has been studied in relation to the pathophysiology of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and mood disorders as well as psychostimulant action. We hypothesized that the risk of an emotional side effect to methylphenidate (MPH) treatment may be associated with NTF3 genotypes. Ninety-six medication-naïve children with ADHD (mean age 8.70, standard deviation 1.41 years, 79 males) were genotyped and treated with MPH. At baseline, which was prior to MPH treatment, and after two weeks of medication, investigators asked children and their parents or caregivers about adverse events using a symptom rating scale. ADHD subjects with the A/A genotype at the NTF3 rs6332 polymorphism showed the highest 'Emotionality' and 'Over-focus/euphoria' factor scores, followed by those with the G/A genotype and those with the G/G genotype (p=0.042 and p=0.045, respectively). ADHD subjects with the A/A genotype at the NTF3 rs6332 polymorphism showed the highest 'Proneness to crying' and 'Nail biting' item scores, followed by those with the G/A genotype and those with the G/G genotype (p=0.047 and p=0.017, respectively). These data provide preliminary evidence that genetic variation in the NTF3 gene is related to susceptibility to emotional side effects in response to MPH treatment in Korean children with ADHD. Symptom control in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder on switching from immediate-release MPH to OROS MPH Results of a 3-week open-label study.The aim of this study was to assess the impact of switching from immediate-release (IR) methylphenidate (MPH) to OROS MPH (CONCERTA, a once-daily long-acting MPH formulation, in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Subjects with ADHD aged 6-16 (n=105),who were stably maintained on their current IR MPH regimen (10-60 mg/day), were switched to 18, 36 or 54 mg OROS MPH once daily for 21 days, depending on pre-study daily MPH dose. ADHD symptoms were assessed by parents, teachers and investigators.By Day 21, parent/caregiver IOWA Conners ratings had decreased from baseline by 2.7 points to 5.2 (I/O), and by 1.8 points to 5.0 (O/D). Teacher IOWA Conners ratings were maintained. Decreases in IOWA Conners ratings are indicative of ADHD symptom improvement. Approximately 75% of parents and investigators rated therapy as good or excellent. OROS MPH therapy was well tolerated.Switching from IR MPH to OROS MPH maintained and may have improved symptom control in children and adolescents with ADHD, during the course of this study. The changes in parent/caregiver IOWA Conners ratings suggest that OROS MPH improves symptom control in the after-school period. This is consistent with the 12-h duration of action previously demonstrated for OROS MPH.[Hallucinations caused by the introduction of methylphenidate at low doses].Fixed drug eruption of the scrotum due to methylphenidate.To report two cases of fixed drug eruption induced by methylphenidate.Two children with attention deficit disorder treated with methylphenidate as a simple drug developed fixed drug eruption of the scrotum. Drug discontinuation was followed by a complete resolution of the skin eruption. Rechallenge resulted in the same drug rash. Macrophage migration-inhibiting factor (MIF) assay with methylphenidate was positive.The pathogenesis of fixed drug eruption and the role of MIF assay in the diagnosis of adverse drug reaction is discussed.Fixed drug rash induced by methylphenidate is a possible but rare phenomenon.Transitioning to OROS(®) methylphenidate from atomoxetine is effective in children and adolescents with ADHD.To explore the clinical outcomes of children/adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) who required a therapy switch from atomoxetine to OROS(®) methylphenidate (MPH).This prospective, noninterventional study involved patients aged 6-18 years with a confirmed diagnosis of ADHD who experienced insufficient clinical response and/or poor tolerability during atomoxetine treatment. Patients were transitioned to OROS MPH and followed for 12 weeks. ADHD symptoms, functional outcomes, health-related quality of life (HRQoL) and tolerability were assessed throughout the study.42 patients (intention-to-treat) transitioned from atomoxetine 43.2 plus 14.7 mg onto OROS MPH 33.0 plus 17.7 mg (mean daily starting dose), increasing to 38.6 plus 17.6 mg at the final visit. Median treatment duration was 85 days (range: 3-155). Compared with baseline, symptoms, functional outcome and HRQoL improved after transitioning to OROS MPH as assessed by the Conners' Parent Rating Scale (mean change from baseline: -10.1 ± 11.6; p < 0.0001), Children's Global Assessment Scale (8.7 ± 16.2; p = 0.0015) and ILC-LQ0-28 scores (parents' rating from 14.9 ± 3.6 [baseline] to 17.5 ± 4.8 [study end]; p = 0.0002; patients' rating from 16.9 ± 3.9 [baseline] to 19.3 ± 4.4 [study end]; p = 0.0003). Social interactions and late afternoon tasks (playing with other children, household chores, school homework and behavior towards visitors/at visits) improved (p < 0.001). Approximately 62% expressed satisfaction ('very good' or `good') with OROS MPH therapy compared with prior atomoxetine with respect to symptom control in the late afternoon. The most common treatment-emergent adverse events after switching were involuntary muscle contractions (tics; 16.7%), insomnia (14.3%), abdominal pain (9.5%) and headache (9.5%). No clinically relevant changes in body weight or vital signs were observed.In this naturalistic setting, transitioning from atomoxetine to OROS MPH was associated with improved ADHD symptoms and impacted positively on patients' and parents' HRQoL and disease burden in ADHD children who demonstrated an insufficient response and/or poor tolerability to atomoxetine.Efficacy and tolerability of OROS methylphenidate in Korean children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.This study evaluated the efficacy and tolerability in the initiation treatment of Concerta (OROS methylphenidate HCl) in Korean children with Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (AD/HD). One hundred and nineteen children with AD/HD were entered into a multi-center, open-label, four-week trial. The dosage of Concerta was adjusted by the investigators based on symptoms and safety assessments performed on a weekly basis. The safety of the drug and its efficacy for attention, behavior, and cognitive function were assessed. The primary outcome measures for efficacy were the Parent and Teacher IOWA Conners Rating Scales, Peer Interaction Items, and the Clinical Global Impression Scale. Cognitive tests (Continuous Performance Test, Matched Familiar Figure Test, Verbal Fluency Test, and Trail Making Test) were included as the secondary outcome measures. In most participants, OROS methylphenidate was well tolerated. There were significant improvements in attention, behavior, and function as measured by parents, teachers, and investigators. The benefit of the initiation of OROS methylphenidate in children with AD/HD was shown on the cognitive tests as well. These data provide support for the benefit of the once-daily methylphenidate preparation, Concerta in the treatment of Korean children with AD/HD. Children were initiated safely in this short-term trial, and its effectiveness was evident in the behavioral, as well as neuropsychological measurements.Modafinil as a treatment for Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder in children and adolescents: a double blind, randomized clinical trial.Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD) is the most prevalent psychiatric disorder currently afflicting children and is among the most common chronic conditions affecting school-age children. Modafinil is structurally different from the psychostimulants that are typically used to treat ADHD and has been reported to be effective in improving the symptoms of ADHD. The aim of the present study was to further evaluate, under double blind and controlled conditions, the efficacy of modafinil for ADHD in children and adolescents as compared to methylphenidate. Patients included 60 outpatients, children (47 boys and 13 girls) between the ages of 6-15 who clearly met the DSM-IV-TR diagnostic criteria for ADHD. Subjects were recruited from an outpatient child and adolescent clinic for a 6 week double blind, randomized clinical trial. All study subjects were randomly assigned to receive either treatment with modafinil film coated tablet (in doses of 200-300 mg/day) depending on weight (200 mg/day for <30 kg and 300 mg/day for >30 kg) (group 1) or methylphenidate (in doses of 20-30 mg/day) depending on weight (20 mg/day for <30 kg and 30 mg/day for >30 kg) (group 2). The principal measure of outcome was the Teacher and Parent ADHD Rating Scale-IV. Patients were assessed at baseline and at 21 and 42 days after the medication started. No significant differences were observed between the two groups on the Parent and Teacher Rating Scale scores. Side effects of decreased appetite and difficulty falling asleep were observed more in the methylphenidate group. The results of this study indicate that modafinil significantly improved symptoms of ADHD and was well tolerated and it is beneficial in the treatment of children with ADHD.Efficacy of theophylline compared to methylphenidate for the treatment of attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder in children and adolescents: a pilot double-blind randomized trial.Attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is a common disorder of childhood that affects 3-6% of school children. Conventional stimulant medications are recognized as useful symptomatic treatments by both specialists and parents. Nevertheless, approximately 30% of ADHD children treated with them do not respond adequately or cannot tolerate the associated adverse effects. Such difficulties highlight the need for alternative, safe and effective medications in the treatment of this disorder. Theophylline is a psychomotor stimulant most widely used as a broncodilator. Purinergic modulation may be therapeutically beneficial in the treatment of psychiatric disorders. We hypothesized that theophylline would be beneficial for the treatment of ADHD and report results of a trial of theophylline compared with methylphenidate for the treatment of ADHD. A total of 32 children with ADHD as defined by DSM IV were randomized to theophylline and methylphenidate dosed on an age and weight-adjusted basis at 4 mg/kg/day (under 12 years) and 3 mg/kg/day theophylline (over 12 years) (group 1) and 1 mg/kg/day methylphenidate (group 2) for a 6-week double-blind and randomized clinical trial. The principal measure of the outcome was the Teacher and Parent ADHD Rating Scale. Patients were assessed by a child psychiatrist, at baseline and at 14, 28 and 42 days after start of the medication. No significant differences were observed between theophylline and methylphenidate on the Parent and Teacher Rating Scale scores over the trial (t = 0.49, d.f. = 24 P = 0.62 and t = 0.19, d.f. = 24 P = 0.54 respectively). Although the number of dropouts in the methylphenidate group was higher than the theophylline group, there was no significant difference between the two protocols in terms of the dropouts. In addition, headaches were observed more often in the methylphenidate group. The results suggest that theophylline may be a useful for the treatment of ADHD. In addition, a tolerable side-effect profile is one of the advantages of theophylline in the treatment of ADHD. Nevertheless, our study is small and our results would need to be confirmed in a larger study.Testing tic suppression: comparing the effects of dexmethylphenidate to no medication in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder and Tourette's disorder.The aim of this study was to conduct a pilot study testing whether single-dose, immediate-release dexmethylphenidate (dMPH) can facilitate tic suppression in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and Tourette's disorder (TD) or chronic tic disorders. The primary hypothesis is that dMPH will improve behaviorally reinforced tic suppression in a standard tic suppression paradigm (TSP).Ten children with ADHD and TD were given dMPH on one visit and no medication on another, using a random crossover design. On both days, following a baseline period, subjects were reinforced for suppressing tics using a standard TSP.Thirteen subjects were enrolled; 10 subjects (mean age 12.7 +/- 2.6; 90% male) completed all study procedures. Relative to the no-medication condition, tics were reduced when children were given a single dose of dMPH. Behavioral reinforcement of tic suppression resulted in lower rates of tics compared to baseline, but dMPH did not enhance this suppression.Preliminary results indicate replication of prior studies of behavioral tic suppression in youths with TD and without ADHD. In addition, our findings indicate tic reduction (and not tic exacerbation) with acute dMPH challenge in children and adolescents with ADHD and TD.Methylphenidate versus dextroamphetamine in ADHD.Safety of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder medications in children: an intensive pharmacosurveillance monitoring study.Our intensive pharmacosurveillance monitoring program was performed to increase the number of adverse drug reactions (ADRs) recorded in the Italian spontaneous reporting database, and to systematically collect more thorough data about atomoxetine (ATX) and methylphenidate (MPH) safety in the pediatric setting.From September 2007 to October 2010, 1841 youth were enrolled in the Italian Attention- Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder Register, but we report here on the 76 children from the five Reference Prescription Centers in Campania, an Italian region where we administered our systematic adverse event checklist.Among our cohort, 68 children received a prescription of ATX and 8 received a prescription of MPH. Most children were male and between 10 and 13 years of age, had a diagnosis of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder-combined (ADHD-C) and had learning disability as the main comorbidity. Most ADRs reported to the Italian spontaneous reporting database occurred in patients from Campania. Twenty-five experienced at least 1 ADR for a total of 40 ADRs reported to the Italian drug agency. Most ADRs were common and not serious, and resolved completely. Weight loss was the most frequently reported ADR. Only two ADRs were unexpected and only one was uncommon. Sixteen ADRs resulted in permanent drug withdrawal. Based on the Naranjo algorithm, 25 ADRs were considered "probable" and 15 were considered "possible."Although our data provide reassurance of the safety of ATX and MPH, several unexpected or uncommon ADRs (hepatomegaly, suicidal ideation, weight gain, or drug interactions) were identified by our intensive pharmacosurveillance monitoring program. Our results show that an intensive pharmacosurveillance monitoring program that involves pharmacovigilance centers and clinicians can improve the collection of information on drug safety in children.Weight loss on stimulant medication: how does it affect body composition and bone metabolism? - A prospective longitudinal study.Methylphenidate and suicidal ideation: Report of two cases.Stimulant prescriptions are routinely used to treat Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder. Reports of psychiatric symptoms that have occurred include euphoria, delirium, confusion, toxic psychosis, and hallucinations. Here, authors report two cases of Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder who were prescribed methylphenidate. Both children developed suicidal ideation that abated after discontinuing the drug. There were no depressive symptoms reported along with it, and the ideation could not be explained on the basis of impulsivity either. [A young man with acute dilated cardiomyopathy].Hallucinations during methylphenidate therapy.Successful desensitization of methylphenidate-induced rash.Methylphenidate is a cornerstone of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) treatment. Cutaneous adverse reactions resulting from methylphenidate may prohibit its usage. We sought a way to continue this therapy in a patient who developed a rash twice following methylphenidate administration.In a desensitization protocol, methylphenidate was given in increasing doses, 30 minutes apart, over 10 days, until the therapeutic dose was reached and was continued regularly thereafter.No adverse reactions developed during the desensitization period or during the 6- month follow-up.In nonlife threatening cutaneous adverse reactions to methylphenidate, a desensitization protocol may enable the continued, safe administration of this drug.Prepotent response inhibition predicts treatment outcome in attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Inhibition deficits, including deficits in prepotent response inhibition and interference control, are core deficits in ADHD. The predictive value of prepotent response inhibition and interference control was assessed for outcome in a 10-week treatment trial with methylphenidate.Thirty-four children with ADHD (ages 8-12) received 10 weeks of methylphenidate treatment. At pretest prepotent response inhibition was assessed using the Stop-Signal Task; interference control was assessed using the Stroop Color-Word task. Methylphenidate was individually titrated to an optimal dose. Treatment outcome was assessed by parent- and teacher-rated ADHD behavior.Only stop-signal reaction time of the Stop-Signal Task was a significant predictor of parent-rated levels of inattention and hyperactivity/impulsivity at outcome. Children with lower levels of inhibition showed worse outcome after 10 weeks of treatment, independent of medication dose.Low levels of prepotent response inhibition are associated with worse response to treatment with methylphenidate. Prepotent response inhibition may be an intermediate phenotypical predictor of treatment outcome.Ingestion of stimulant medications does not alter bispectral index or clinical depth of anesthesia at 1 MAC sevoflurane in children.Children treated with stimulant medications for the behavioral management of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) may present for elective surgery. Stimulant medication is often continued until the morning of surgery to optimize perioperative behavior. It is unknown whether such stimulant drug ingestion can affect cerebral arousal and alter depth of anesthesia. A clinically relevant alteration in measured depth of anesthesia could form the basis for an evidence-based recommendation that children taking stimulant medications require a change in the amount of anesthetic delivered or that they require routine monitoring of depth of anesthesia.Thirty-four ASA 1 and 2 children aged between 5 and 16, presenting for elective day case surgery, were recruited. Seventeen had a diagnosis of ADHD and had taken stimulant medication on the day of surgery, and 17 were controls. A standard inhalational induction of anesthesia using air, oxygen, and sevoflurane by facemask was performed and maintained for 10 min at 1 MAC endtidal sevoflurane. During this time, no other stimulus was applied to the patient. Bispectral index (BIS) and other markers of depth of anesthesia were recorded after 10 min.Children in both groups were of similar ages and weights. There were a higher percentage of boys in the stimulants group. Baseline physiological parameters were similar in both groups. After induction and equilibration for 10 min of anesthesia at 1 MAC endtidal sevoflurane, there was no significant difference in BIS or clinical markers of depth of anesthesia.Children taking stimulant medication for ADHD, and who ingest medication on the day of surgery, do not appear to have altered BIS or depth of anesthesia at 1 MAC of sevoflurane. These results do not support a recommendation for a change in anesthetic practice for children having ingested stimulants up to the day of surgery, either in terms of increasing the amount of anesthetic given or monitoring of depth.A 6-month, open-label, extension study of the tolerability and effectiveness of the methylphenidate transdermal system in adolescents diagnosed with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.The aim of this study was to evaluate the tolerability and effectiveness of the methylphenidate transdermal system (MTS) over 6 months in adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).This was an industry-sponsored, 30-center, open-label study of subjects aged 13-17 years with ADHD. Subjects were dose-optimized with MTS (10-30 mg/9 hours) over 5 weeks and then dose-maintained for up to 5 months. Tolerability evaluations included treatment-emergent adverse events (TEAEs) and dermal responses. Effectiveness was assessed with the ADHD-Rating Scale-IV (ADHD-RS-IV).A total of 162 subjects received MTS treatment. The majority of TEAEs (>99%) were mild or moderate in intensity, and the most frequently reported TEAE was decreased appetite (15.4%). Thirteen subjects discontinued the study due to TEAEs. The majority (93.6%) of dermatologic reactions indicated mild erythema. There was significant improvement in mean ADHD-RS-IV total scores from study entry to end point (p<0.001).Slightly more than half (54.0%) of subjects completed this 6-month, open-label extension study of MTS; the primary reason for discontinuation was withdrawn consent (36.0%). Reported TEAEs and skin tolerability findings were similar to those observed with MTS use in children and adolescents. MTS treatment resulted in a decrease in ADHD symptoms as rated by clinicians.Tactile and visual hallucinations in a child with methylphenidate and fluoxetine combination.Methylphenidate effects on a laboratory aggression measure in children with ADHD.This study investigated the utility of the Point Subtraction Aggression Paradigm (PSAP), a computerized laboratory analog aggression measure. We measured the effects of methylphenidate (MPH) on aggressive responding in children with a DSM-III-R diagnosis of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), who had high ratings on the Child Behavior Checklist Aggression Factor (CBCL; Achenbach 1991). Results are reported for 6 subjects, ages 8-11 years. All were tested at baseline in an unmedicated condition, and after double-blind administration of placebo, 0.3 mg/kg of MPH, and 0.6 mg/kg of MPH. A main effect of decreased aggressive responding with MPH was found, with a dose-related change by repeated measures ANOVA (F = 6.59, df = 2.10, p = .014). Post-hoc analysis with the Tukey HSD indicated that only the 0.6 mg/kg was significantly (p < .05) different than placebo. Implications for use of the PSAP in future investigations of medications in aggressive children are discussed.An analysis of patient adherence to treatment during a 1-year, open-label study of OROS methylphenidate in children with ADHD.Treatment adherence is an important aspect of ADHD symptom management, but there are many factors that may influence adherence.This analysis assessed adherence to OROS methylphenidate during a 1-year, open-label study in children. Adherence was defined as the number of days medication was taken divided by the number of days in the study and determined to be high if > or =75%. Possible clinical and demographic factors associated with adherence, including use of planned medication breaks, were assessed.Mean adherence was 86.4%. It was 91.6% for the subgroup of patients who reported not taking planned medication breaks (n = 252) and 77.7% for the subgroup taking planned medication breaks (n = 155). Overall, 75% of patients showed high adherence. Older age, low starting dose, minority ethnic status, and fewer ADHD symptoms were associated with low adherence.Various factors were found to be associated with low adherence, and the results of this analysis provide guidance to physicians seeking to identify those patients with ADHD most likely not be adherent to stimulant therapyBuspirone versus methylphenidate in the treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder: a double-blind and randomized trial.The efficacy and side effects of buspirone compared with methylphenidate (MPH) in the treatment of children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). A total of 34 children with ADHD as defined by DSM-IV-TR were randomized to buspirone or methylphenidate dosed on weight-adjusted basis at buspirone (0.5 mg/kg/day) and methylphenidate (0.3-1 mg/kg/day) for a 6-week double-blind clinical trial. The principle measures of outcome were the teacher and parent ADHD Rating Scale. The side effects were assessed by the special side effect checklist of each drug. In both groups, the scores of teacher and parent ADHD Rating Scale significantly declined on the 6th week as compared to baseline (p = 0.001). These effects were observed in the subscales too. No significant differences were observed between the two protocols on the total scores of parent and teacher ADHD Rating Scale, but methylphenidate was superior to buspirone in decreasing the symptoms of inattention. The side effects of buspirone were mild and rare in comparison with MPH. Buspirone has a favorable side-effects profile. It also has clinically and statistically significant impacts on improving the ADHD symptoms in children. These preliminary findings of the efficacy of buspirone in children with ADHD need large and cross-over studies.Unexpected interaction of methylphenidate (Ritalin) with anaesthetic agents.We report difficulty with conscious sedation of a child taking methylphenidate for attention deficit disorder and possible delayed adverse interaction of ketamine and methylphenidate resulting in severe nausea, vomiting and dehydration. The effects of methylphenidate and its potential interactions with anaesthetic agents is discussed. We suggest that anaesthesiologists who provide sedation or anaesthesia to patients receiving methylphenidate be aware of the potential need for high sedative doses and the possibility of undesirable interactions.Effect of transdermal methylphenidate wear times on sleep in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.Sleep disturbances are common among children and adolescents with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder. This study sought to evaluate the effects of individualizing wear times of the methylphenidate transdermal system on sleep parameters. In this open-label, randomized trial, 26 children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder and sleep disturbances were randomized (after dose optimization) to one of four groups with different sequences of patch wear times (i.e., 9, 10, 11, and 12 hours per day wear times each for week in different sequences). The primary endpoint comprised sleep latency. Secondary endpoints included total sleep time, sleep quality, and attention deficit hyperactivity disorder and related signs (assessed with Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder Rating Scale-IV and Connor's Global Impression-Parent). A mixed-effects regression model evaluated the effects of patch wear time on sleep and symptom measures. Patch wear time exerted no significant effect on sleep latency or total sleep time, although a trend toward improved sleep quality was evident (P = 0.059) with longer patch wear times. Sleep parameters were not adversely affected by longer methylphenidate transdermal system patch wear times. Thus, if replicated in larger samples, the individualization of patch wear times should be considered according to the needs and responses of patients.[Nutrition and attention deficit hyperactivity disorder: developmental follow-up of the anthropometric variables of a group of patients receiving treatment with osmotic controlled-release methylphenidate].To perform a developmental analysis of the anthropometric variables of a group of patients diagnosed with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in order to determine the repercussions of treatment with osmotic controlled-release methylphenidate (MTF-OROS).The medical records of 187 patients with ADHD under treatment with MTF-OROS over a period of 30 months were reviewed. Data collected included weight, height and body mass index at diagnosis (baseline) and at 6, 12, 18, 24 and 30 months' follow-up.The mean age at diagnosis was 8.14 ± 1.6 years. The dose of MTF-OROS was progressively increased until 36.9 ± 12.1 mg/day (1.05 mg/kg/day) at day 30 of the follow-up. At diagnosis, 34.9% of patients had a deficient nutritional situation (subnutrition or malnutrition), which affected 50.3% of the patients at 30 months. The baseline value for weight (Z-score) progressively decreased during treatment until values that were significantly lower than the baseline value at 12 months were reached (p < 0.05); these values remained significantly lower until 30 months. The baseline value for height (Z-score) also progressively decreased during treatment until values that were significantly lower than the baseline value at 24 and 30 months were reached (p < 0.05).At the time they were diagnosed with ADHD, one out of every three patients was in a deficient nutritional situation (subnutrition or malnutrition). Continued treatment with MTF-OROS for 30 months had a negative influence on height, which could perhaps be attenuated by improving the patients' nutrition.Methylphenidate-related growth impairment.Growth deficit associated with stimulants in children who have attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) has long been the subject of scientific discussion. More recent studies describe the effects on the final height of children with ADHD who are treated with methylphenidate (MPH) as only slight. There are only a handful of reports of severe growth deficits attributed to MPH that are associated with gastrointestinal side effects. We describe a 10-year-old boy with ADHD and chronic asthma who underwent corticosteroid therapy and developed an almost complete growth arrest during MPH treatment. Growth hormone (GH) stimulation tests and measurement of GH-dependent growth factors point to the influence of MPH on GH secretion with subsequent impaired growth. One may conclude that some children are at risk of serious growth decrement when treated with MPH. The growth of children should thus be monitored carefully, even if there are no alarming gastrointestinal side effects from MPH. We found that the determination of growth velocity was a sensitive marker for the evaluation of growth impairment in our patient.Cardiac Arrest following a Myocardial Infarction in a Child Treated with Methylphenidate.The use of psychostimulants labeled to treat attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder increases. Among side effects these drugs raise blood pressure and heart rate, and the safety has been scrutinised in recent years. Data from large epidemiological studies, including over a million person-years, did not report any cases of myocardial infarction in current users of methylphenidate, and the risk of serious adverse cardiac events was not found to be increased. We present a case with an 11-year-old child, treated with methylphenidate, who suffered cardiac arrest and was diagnosed with a remote myocardial infarction. This demonstrates that myocardial infarction can happen due to methylphenidate exposure in a cardiac healthy child, without cardiovascular risk factors. An examination of the "dosage" effects of both behavior therapy and methylphenidate on the classroom performance of two ADHD children.Open-label treatment of comorbid depression and attentional disorders with co-administration of serotonin reuptake inhibitors and psychostimulants in children, adolescents, and adults: a case series.Attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and major depression are common ailments that can cause significant dysfunction throughout the life cycle. These two disorders may occur comorbidly. This case series describes 7 pediatric patients (aged 10-16 years) and 4 adults (aged 38-44 years) whose ADHD and comorbid major depression were treated in a naturalistic open clinical fashion. For all 11 patients, symptoms of major depression appeared to respond well to either fluoxetine or sertraline monotherapy. Using starting doses of fluoxetine 10 mg or sertraline 25 mg daily, we did not observe any adverse behavioral activation or clinical deterioration. However, no improvement in ADHD symptoms was observed in any patient during fluoxetine or sertraline monotherapy. Adjunctive treatment with a psychostimulant seemed necessary for chronic ADHD symptoms to be effectively addressed. The psychostimulants did not appear to provide observable antidepressant effects. With the exception of one adult who had a 20 mm Hg increase in diastolic pressure on methylphenidate monotherapy at 22.5 mg daily, the administration and coadministration of these agents were not associated with significant changes in blood pressure or heart rate. No patient developed suicidality, increased aggressiveness, mania, or other problematic side effects. This combination therapy was well tolerated and appeared to be effective in ameliorating both ADHD and depressive symptoms. These cases support previous suggestions that adjunctive treatment with psychostimulants might be a safe and effective intervention for children treated with fluoxetine or sertraline who have persistent ADHD symptoms and suggests that such combined treatment may be suitable for adults as well.Methylphenidate treatment and dyskinesia in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Case reports suggest a relationship between methylphenidate treatment and dyskinesia in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). The aim of the current study was (a) to investigate abnormal involuntary movements of children with ADHD before and after the administration of methylphenidate and (b) to investigate the effect of a provocative assessment method used to make latent dyskinesia visible, which is included in the Abnormal Involuntary Movement Scale (AIMS).Participants, aged 6-18, were recruited from a Child and Adolescent Psychiatric Hospital and Outpatient Clinic (Vadaskert Foundation), Budapest, Hungary. Using a structured diagnostic interview (Mini International Neuropsychiatric Interview Kid), 37 children were included in the ADHD group and 34 children in the control group. The AIMS was used to observe and score dyskinesia.There was a significant difference between the baseline total AIMS score in the ADHD and the control groups, with the ADHD subjects evidencing substantially higher severity than controls. Provocation, as applied with the administration of the AIMS, significantly increased the AIMS total score in both groups. The administration of methylphenidate had no effect on the total score of the AIMS. In the ADHD group, we observed a significant negative relationship between the patients' age and the overall severity on the AIMS. In contrast, in the control group we detected a significant positive relationship between the patients' age and the overall severity on the AIMS before and no relationship after provocation.Methylphenidate-treated children with ADHD had more dyskinesia than children in the control group. Dyskinesia did not worsen after a single dose of methylphenidate. Higher dyskinesia scores in the methylphenidate-treated younger age group warrant caution in the methylphenidate treatment of ADHD; however, further studies are needed to clarify the possible causal relationship between dyskinesia and methylphenidate treatment and/or age and/or the disease itself.Using the test of variables of attention to determine the effectiveness of modafinil in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD): a prospective methylphenidate-controlled trial.The efficacy of modafinil in comparison with methylphenidate in treatment of pediatric attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) has not been thoroughly investigated. This study compared the effect of modafinil versus methylphenidate on continuous attention task in children with ADHD, using the Test of Variables of Attention. Twenty-eight participants completed a baseline test followed by administration of a single dose of either methylphenidate or modafinil, after which the test was repeated. The test was performed a third time, after each subject received a dose of the medication not previously administered. Comparison of scores showed mean baseline, postmethylphenidate, and postmodafinil scores of -2.04, 0.017, and 0.09, respectively. No difference was found between improvements observed with either medication (P < .05). Adverse events for both agents were mild and self-limited, including abdominal pain, diarrhea, and hyposomnia. The authors conclude that modafinil is as effective as methylphenidate; however, a larger scale long-term study is required to confirm these results.Multicenter, randomized, open-label study of OROS methylphenidate versus atomoxetine: treatment outcomes in African-American children with ADHD.The Formal Observation of Concerta versUs Strattera (FOCUS) study was conducted to assess, in children with ADHD, treatment outcomes with Concerta [OROS methylphenidate (MPH)], a once-daily controlled-release medication, and Strattera, (atomoxetine), a selective noradrenaline reuptake inhibitor, Because of the lack of data in minority groups treated for ADHD, the present subgroup analysis was conducted to determine the effectiveness and tolerability of ADHD treatments in African-American patients who were randomized to OROS MPH (n=125) or atomoxetine (n=58) during the FOCUS study. At the end of the study, the mean dose of OROS MPH was 32.8 +/- 10.9 mg and that of atomoxetine was 1.1 +/- 0.4 mg/kg. The results demonstrated that both treatments were associated with significant improvements in ADHD symptoms from baseline; however, patients who received OROS MPH demonstrated significantly greater improvements in total ADHD symptoms, inattentiveness and global improvement. The incidence of adverse events was similar in both treatment groups. OROS MPH and atomoxetine are effective and tolerable in the treatment of African Americans with ADHD, and significantly greater treatment responses were observed in patients receiving OROS MPH compared with those receiving atomoxetine over three weeks. Additional studies are needed to evaluate treatment response in this population.Attentional capacity, a probe ERP study: differences between children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder and normal control children and effects of methylphenidate.In the present study it was investigated whether the smaller P3s in attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) children are caused by a shortage of capacity underlying P3 processes or whether they are due to a capacity allocation problem. Also, effects of methylphenidate on these processes were investigated. Performance and event-related potentials (ERPs) of 14 ADHD and 14 control children were measured using an irrelevant-probe technique. Three types of task irrelevant visual probes (standards, deviants, and novels) were presented against the background of two visual tasks that varied in task difficulty. The parietal P3 wave was measured in response to task stimuli and probes. ADHD subjects made significantly fewer correct detections than normal controls in both the easy and the hard tasks. Controls showed an enhanced P3 to task-relevant stimuli in the hard task, whereas ADHD children did not. Probe (novel) P3 amplitudes decreased from the easy to the hard task to the same extent in both groups. Methylphenidate enhanced the percentage of correct responses and task P3 amplitudes in both the easy and the hard task but probe P3 amplitudes were not influenced by methylphenidate. It was concluded that ADHD children do not suffer from a shortage in attentional capacity; rather, the evidence is in favor of a problem with capacity allocation. Furthermore, methylphenidate had enhancing effects on performance and ERPs, but did not improve the capacity-allocation deficit.Titrating Optimal Dose of Osmotic-Controlled Release Oral Delivery (OROS)-Methylphenidate and Its Efficacy and Safety in Korean Children with ADHD: A Multisite Open Labeled Study.This study was aimed to determine effectiveness and tolerability of Osmotic-controlled Release Oral delivery (OROS) methylphenidate (MPH) and its optimal dose administered openly over a period of up to 12 weeks in drug naïve Korean children with ADHD.Subjects (n=143), ages 6 to 18-years, with a clinical diagnosis of any subtype of ADHD were recruited from 7 medical centers in Korea. An individualized dose of OROS-MPH was determined for each subject depending on the response criteria. The subjects were assessed with several symptom rating scales in week 1, 3, 6, 9 and 12.77 of 116 subjects (66.4%) achieved the criteria for response and the average of optimal daily dose for response was to 30.05±12.52 mg per day (0.90±0.31 mg/kg/d) at the end of the study. Optimal dose was not significantly different between ADHD subtypes, whereas, significant higher dose was needed in older aged groups than younger groups. The average of optimal daily dose for response for the subjects aged above 12 years old was 46.38±15.52 per day (0.81±0.28 mg/kg/d) compared to younger groups (p<0.01). No serious adverse effects were reported and the dose did not have a significant effect on adverse effects.Optimal mean dose of OROS-MPH was significantly different by age groups. Higher dose was needed in older aged groups than younger groups. Effectiveness and tolerability of OROS-MPH in symptoms of ADHD is sustained for up to 12 weeks.Body mass index of children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.An association between overweight and attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in children was previously suggested. We examined the prevalence of overweight, anthropometric changes, and the effect of methylphenidate treatment in 275 children with ADHD without neurological comorbidities and in controls. Data were extracted from medical charts, for up to 17 months of follow-up. Height, weight, body mass index, and their z scores did not differ between the ADHD and control groups. Prevalence of overweight and obesity was lower in the ADHD group compared with controls (19% vs 35%, P = .02, and 7% vs 16%, P = .05, respectively). During a follow-up of up to 17 months, no significant changes in height or body mass index z scores were found, including in a subgroup of overweight children. We conclude that compared with local controls, children with ADHD have rates of overweight and obesity that are lower, but that are similar to national estimates. Methylphenidate treatment did not significantly affect height, weight, or overweight status.Methylphenidate-induced visual hallucinations.An 11-year-old boy with attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) presented with visual hallucinations several years after starting methylphenidate (MPH). The hallucinations resolved upon discontinuation of the drug. Reports of toxic hallucinosis during treatment with MPH are rare. Although the pathogenetic mechanism is unclear, the occurrence of hallucinations may be explained by a chronic increase in synaptic dopamine. Clinicians should be aware of this possible rare adverse manifestation occurring at therapeutic doses.Long lasting complex nocturnal hallucinations during Osmotic Release Oral System (OROS) methylphenidate treatment in a 7-year old girl.We report a case of a girl with Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and Oppositional defiant disorder (ODD) who experienced a 3-hour episode of nocturnal complex bizarre visual hallucinations when treated with 18 mg Osmotic Release Oral System (OROS) methylphenidate (MPH). Nocturnal polysomnography performed two weeks later revealed REM sleep reduction (17%) and fragmentation . Two episodes of confusional arousals were recorded. This finding is typical of parasomnia associated with NREM sleep - disorder of arousal. We hypothesize that this preexisting sleep impairment represents a factor of vulnerability to MPH sleep side effects. In our search of literature, we found no report of nocturnal hallucination alone during treatment with stimulants.Effects of methylphenidate on leptin and appetite in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder: an open label trial.Appetite suppression is one of the most common side effects of methylphenidate (MPH), which is used for treatment of attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). Relation of appetite and leptin is well known but there is no report regarding MPH use and leptin. In this study we compared the baseline leptin levels of ADHD children with the controls and studied the interaction between MPH and leptin-insulin level in ADHD children under MPH treatment. The major finding of this study is that at a total daily dose of 0.6 mg/kg short-acting MPH treatment, one does not observe significant side effects related to appetite suppression and metabolic features as measured via body mass index, insulin and leptin levels. Thus this range seems to be safe in developing ADHD children with minimum side effects regarding appetite for short-term treatment.Switching from methylphenidate immediate release to MPH-SODAS in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.To assess ADHD symptoms after switching from Methylphenidate Immediate-release (MPH-IR) to Methylphenidate Spheroidal Oral Drug Absorption System (MPH-SODAS) in clinically stable patients with ADHD and to identify predictors of dissatisfaction with MPH-SODAS.This is an 8-week open clinical trial. Patients were assigned to MPH-SODAS according to their pre-study dose of MPH-IR. Assessments at baseline were conducted using the Swanson, Nolan, and Pelham-IV Questionnaire (SNAP-IV), and the Barkley's Side Effect Rating Scale (SERS). Potentials predictors of treatment response were evaluated.From 62 patients, 47 completed the protocol. There was no significant change in the total score at the SNAP-IV (F (1,51.26) = 0.01; P = 0.91) and its subscales scores during the trial. Although no significant effect on the SERS total score (F (1,111.49) = 0.75; P = 0.39) was found, one adult patient with a previous cardiovascular condition presented a hemorrhagic cerebral vascular accident resulting in her obit. Overall, 46 (74.2%) patients reported to be satisfied. No factor assessed predicted dissatisfaction in univariated analyses.Results suggested that switching from MPH-IR to MPH-SODAS did not affect stabilization of ADHD symptoms in the majority of patients. MPH prescription in patients with previous cardiovascular conditions must be extremely careful. Further studies with long-acting MPH including larger samples and patients not responsive to MPH-IR are needed especially in countries outside the US.Does prolonged therapy with a long-acting stimulant suppress growth in children with ADHD?To investigate whether prolonged therapy with a long-acting stimulant affects growth in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).One hundred seventy-eight children ages 6 to 13 years received OROS methylphenidate (OROS MPH, CONCERTA) for at least 21 months. Height and weight were measured monthly during the first year and every 3 months thereafter.At baseline, subjects were approximately the expected height for their age and somewhat heavier than expected. Subjects gained height steadily throughout the study and were on average 0.23 cm less than expected at month 21. Weight did not increase and BMI decreased slightly in the first 4 months. Thereafter, weight Z score and BMI Z score remained relatively constant and children were on average 1.23 kg less than expected at month 21. Previous stimulant therapy tended to be associated with a smaller decrease in Z score during the study compared with no previous stimulant therapy. Drug holidays did not significantly affect growth.The effects of prolonged OROS MPH therapy on growth were clinically insignificant and limited to slight decreases in weight during the first months of therapy. Drug holidays did not reduce any impact on growth and are thus of questionable utility for limiting potential effects of treatment on growth.Safe and effective methylphenidate therapy in a pediatric patient with glaucoma.Stimulant medications used as first-line treatment in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) are contraindicated in patients with glaucoma. We present the first reported case of using methylphenidate therapy to safely and effectively treat ADHD in a pediatric patient with glaucoma.Dose-response characteristics in adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder treated with OROS methylphenidate in a 4-week, open-label, dose-titration study.The aim of this study was to evaluate dose-response characteristics in adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) treated with once-daily OROS methylphenidate (OROS MPH) during the 4-week, open-label, escalating dose-titration phase of a larger multisite, placebo-controlled trial. Patient factors such as age, height, weight, and baseline symptom severity were evaluated as predictors of selected dose, as was the degree of incremental response with each successive dose escalation.Adolescents 13-18 years of age with ADHD underwent a 4-week, open-label, escalating dose-titration trial to determine the minimal effective dose (18, 36, 54, or 72 mg once daily) of OROS to be used in a multiphase, placebo-controlled study (NCT00249353). Both final absolute dose and mean weight-adjusted dose were used to assess predictors of response, using a one-way analysis of variance and regression analyses.The majority of subjects who did not respond at lower doses achieved response at each escalating dose level. Approximately two-thirds of subjects required a dose of 54 mg or greater to achieve improvement criteria. Minimal effective dose correlated modestly with baseline symptom severity. Age, height, and weight did not correlate with absolute dose and accounted for only a small percentage of variance in weight-based dose. Weight was not a major factor in predicting effective dose; however, using weight-adjusted rather than absolute dose proved slightly superior for modeling of adverse effects.Adolescents required, on average, a higher absolute dose but a lower weight-adjusted dose (mg/kg) of OROS) than was previously reported in children. There were few predictors of optimal dose of OROS other than baseline symptom severity. The increased percentage of adolescent responders at each dose level using this clinically driven approach to titration differs from recent findings from randomized forced dose titration studies in adults with ADHD.A randomized, rater-blinded, crossover study comparing the clinical efficacy of Ritalin(®) LA (methylphenidate) treatment in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder under different breakfast conditions over 2 weeks.Several extended-release methylphenidate medications are available for treatment of children with ADHD. Pharmacokinetic investigations suggest that the serum levels of methylphenidate are partially altered when the medication is taken without breakfast. Clinical data comparing different breakfast situations are missing. In this study, different breakfast compositions and their influence on treatment with Ritalin LA are investigated. A total of 150 patients were enrolled in a rater-blinded, randomized crossover trial that compared a minimal breakfast with a standard breakfast in patients under stable treatment with Ritalin LA. Ratings for clinical efficacy were carried out after 1 week by teachers and parents (FBB-ADHS), as well as physicians (CGI). Additionally, a math test was administered to the patients. Of the total patients, 144 finished the trial with a breakfast compliance of 93%. All of the clinical rating scales showed consistently no difference between the two breakfast conditions. Non-inferiority of minimal breakfast versus standard breakfast was shown to be statistically significant (FBB-AHDS(Teacher): 0.97 with minimal breakfast, 1.01 with standard breakfast, P < 0.0001). The clinical efficacy of Ritalin LA is not influenced by breakfast and works independently of food intake.Effect of methylphenidate on sleep parameters in children with ADHD.The primary aim of this study was to investigate the acute impact of methylphenidate (MPH) on sleep parameters in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) children. The second aim was to investigate the different effects of intermediate- and longacting MPH on sleep parameters. The third aim was to test the different effects of dose and age on sleep parameters.Ninety-three ADHD children were enrolled and randomized to two different MPH preparations. Baseline and daily sleep diaries were evaluated for four weeks after taking medication. Weekday and weekend bedtimes, wake-up times, sleep latencies and total sleep times were compared by weeks.After taking MPH, there was a significant delay in bedtimes and a significant reduction of total sleep time (TST) both on weekdays and at weekends. There was also a significant delay in wake-up time on weekdays. However, the difference was applied to younger age group children only. There was no difference in changes of TST between metadate-CD and OROS-MPH. There also was no difference in changes of TST with different doses of MPH.MPH had negative impacts on sleep among young ADHD children, but different preparations and doses did not affect the result.The effect of OROS methylphenidate on the sleep of children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.We evaluated the effect of OROS methylphenidate (MPH) on sleep quality and architecture in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) using both a parental sleep questionnaire and polysomnography. Twenty-four ADHD children who had no comorbid psychiatric or sleep disorders except for oppositional defiant disorder completed the 6-week, prospective, open-label, flexible-dose trial with OROS MPH (Concerta) monotherapy. After OROS MPH administration, the polysomnography data indicated that the percentage of stage 2 sleep was increased (P=0.024) and the Number of Awakenings was decreased (P=0.047). Relative to baseline, Parasomnias of the Children's Sleep Habits Questionnaire were decreased (P=0.033). Sleep Onset Latency was not changed during the treatment in general, but was increased in six children with subjective sleep difficulties (F(1)=5.832, P=0.025, eta(2)(p)=0.226). Bedtime Resistance and Sleep Onset Delay in Children's Sleep Habits Questionnaire were also increased during the treatment with OROS MPH only in individuals with sleep complaints (F1=5.001, P=0.036, eta(2)(p)=0.185; F(1)=7.237, P=0.013, eta(2)(p)=0.248). These results suggest that OROS MPH in open-label treatment does not seem to impair sleep and may even improve some aspects of sleep.Photophobia and methylphenidate.It is a report of the case of a 7-year-old boy with attention-deficit hyperactive disorder (ADHD), who developed bilateral photophobia when taking methylphenidate (MPH). MPH was stopped and reintroduced many times, and on all of the trials, photophobia reappeared immediately. Photophobia might be an adverse effect of MPH that bothers ADHD children. With the consideration that MPH increases cortical excitability, it is possible that MPH increases sensitivity to some stimulus such as light, and these sensitivities make these children more irritable and sad.Stuttering priapism associated with withdrawal from sustained-release methylphenidate.Stuttering priapism is intermittent, prolonged, painful, pathologic erections with intervening periods of detumescence. An adolescent had stuttering priapism associated with withdrawal from sustained-release methylphenidate. To our knowledge, this is the first such report of stuttering priapism associated with stimulant drugs for treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.Acute effect of methylphenidate on QT interval duration and dispersion in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.Among childhood psychiatric disorders, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is of greatest interest to practitioners. Methylphenidate (MPH) is a drug that is widely used in the treatment of children in whom ADHD has been diagnosed. Although this treatment has been used for years, its effects on the heart remain the subject of debate. The QT interval comprises the ventricular activation and recovery periods as seen on electrocardiogram (ECG). The acute effect of MPH on QT interval dispersion is unknown. Researchers in the present study sought to investigate the acute effects of MPH on QT interval as seen on ECG. A total of 25 patients with ADHD (mean age, 9.4+/-2.1 y) who were treated with MPH were enrolled in the study. Twelve-lead derivation ECGs were taken before and 2 h after administration of 10 mg of MPH. Maximum QT interval, minimum QT interval, and interval durations were measured, and QT dispersion was calculated, for each ECG. QT dispersion measured after medication administration decreased significantly from 59.6+/-16.3 ms to 50.8+/-10.9 ms (P=.016); corrected QT dispersion decreased significantly from 70.9+/-17.6 ms to 61.3+/-13.3 ms (P=.011). Maximum QT interval duration decreased from 73.7+/-21.8 ms to 361.8+/-29.0 ms (P=.006); minimum QT interval duration rose from 317.0+/-23.3 ms to 322.3+/-21.6 ms (P=.312). In conclusion, the findings of this study show that MPH reduces QT dispersion during the acute period shortly after its administration.Methylphenidate and attentional training. Comparative effects on behavior and neurocognitive performance in twin girls with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.The effectiveness of four doses (5-mg, 10-mg, 15-mg, 20-mg) of methylphenidate (MPH) and attentional training (AT) were evaluated using neurocognitive instruments (Continuous Performance Test; Matching Unfamiliar Figures Test), narrow- and broad-band rating scales in the context of a double-blind, placebo-control, within-subject reversal design for dizygotic twin girls with Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD). Both interventions proved effective for improving neurocognitive test performance and behavior, although broad-band ratings revealed dose-response curves different from those obtained from the neurocognitive tests. Implications for clinical management of girls with ADHD are discussed.MAOA is associated with methylphenidate improvement of oppositional symptoms in boys with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.The monoamine oxidase A (MAOA) gene has been extensively related to aggressive, impulsive and violent behaviours. Previous studies have documented the improvement of oppositional symptoms in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) patients with methylphenidate (MPH). However, the effect of the MAOA gene in response to MPH has not been investigated. A sample of 85 boys from an ADHD outpatient service was genotyped for the MAOA-uVNTR polymorphism. The outcome measure was the parent-rated oppositional subscale of the Swanson, Nolan and Pelham Scale - version IV. The scale was applied by child psychiatrists blinded to genotype at baseline and in the first and third months of treatment. A significant interaction between the presence of MAOA high-activity genotype and treatment with MPH over time on oppositional scores was detected during the 3 months' treatment (n=85, F2,136=4.83, p=0.009). These results suggest an effect of the MAOA-uVNTR high-activity genotype on the improvement of oppositional symptoms with MPH treatment.Naturalistic exploration of the effect of osmotic release oral system-methylphenidate on remission rate and functional improvement in Taiwanese children with attention-deficit-hyperactivity disorder.To determine the differences in the remission rate, recovery rate, functional improvement, and treatment adherence related to treatment with short-acting immediate-release methylphenidate (IR-MPH) and long-acting osmotic-release oral system-methylphenidate (OROS-MPH) in a naturalistic setting among Taiwanese children with attention-deficit-hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).A total of 757 children with ADHD, aged 6-18 years, was evaluated using the following in order determine functional improvement and treatment adherence: the Chinese version of the Swanson, Nolan, and Pelham, version IV scale (SNAP-IV-C), Clinical Global Impression-ADHD-Severity (CGI-S) to measure remission and recovery rates, the Chinese version of the Social Adjustment Inventory for Children and Adolescents (CSAICA), and caregiver's satisfaction rate, treatment adherence, and frequency of adverse effects.According to the SNAP-IV-C scores, the remission rate was 30.72%, and the recovery rate was 16.38%. Compared to short-acting IR-MPH, OROS-MPH was associated with greater functional improvement and treatment adherence among children with ADHD.OROS-MPH treatment at the adequate dosage can achieve higher remission and recovery rates, produce greater functional improvement, and result in better treatment adherence than IR-MPH treatment.Comparison of the efficacy of two different modified release methylphenidate preparations for children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder in a natural setting: comparison of the efficacy of Medikinet(®) retard and Concerta(®)--a randomized, controlled, double-blind multicenter clinical crossover trial.The comparison of the efficacy of Medikinet(®) retard and Concerta(®) trial was a multisite, randomized, double-blind, crossover trial that aimed at comparing the effects of two different modified release methylphenidate preparations (Medikinet retard: 50% immediate release (IR); Concerta: 22% IR) in a natural setting across the day in 113 randomized children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (age range 6-16 years). The duration of the study per patient was 3 weeks.The primary outcome variable was the German version of the "Swanson, Kotkin, Agler, M-Flynn, and Pelham scale" in the first 3 hours of school as assessed by teachers.Medikinet retard with a higher IR component than Concerta (and an equivalent daily dose) was superior to Concerta (p=0.0009), and Medikinet retard with similar IR components in the morning as Concerta (but a lower daily dose) was noninferior to Concerta with regard to the primary outcome. Further, exploratory analyses on teacher and parent ratings on attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder and on externalizing symptoms during the day revealed no evidence for the superiority of Concerta over Medikinet retard in an equivalent daily dosage throughout the day.Children and adolescents may be treated with a lower daily dose of Medikinet retard (which has a similar IR component as Concerta) without resulting in a clinically relevant worse effect during school time.Insomnia, night terror, and depression related to clonidine in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Application of actigraphy in the clinical setting: use in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder.Clinicians rely primarily on subjective behavioral questionnaires in assessing attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). The new mini-motion logger actigraph, which is a wrist-worn minicomputer, can add an objective element to this assessment and is especially useful in children due to its small size. We applied this technology as an outcome measure in evaluating drug therapy in two children with ADHD who were receiving methylphenidate and pemoline, respectively. We also assessed preliminary findings from an additional 13 children.Drugs associated with adverse events in children and adolescents.To describe the suspected medications, types of reactions, and outcomes of adverse events (AEs) most commonly reported to the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) in children by age group.All case reports submitted to the FDA Adverse Event Reporting System (FAERS) between January 1, 2007, and August 27, 2012, for children (1 to < 12 yrs) and adolescents (12 to < 18 yrs) were examined. The most commonly reported suspected drugs were ranked. The corresponding AEs with serious outcome were compared and described between age groups.We identified a total of 78,623 reports in the FAERS database (53.8% in children and 46.2% in adolescents). Serious outcomes were noted in 40% of the children and 43% of the adolescents. The proportion of all case reports for central nervous system stimulants (lisdexamfetamine, 69.8%; methylphenidate, 68.0%) and analgesics (ibuprofen, 72.3%; acetaminophen, 68.6%) was higher in children, whereas tumor necrosis factor blockers (infliximab, 78.2%; adalimumab, 77.1%), atypical antipsychotics (aripiprazole 52.7%; risperidone 58.3%; quetiapine 72.1%) and oral contraceptives (levonogrestrel, 99.2%; drospirenone and ethinyl estradiol, 97.9%) were more commonly reported in adolescents. For most drugs, the types of reactions reported were similar but had different rank order across age groups, with the most dissimilar profiles being observed for isotretinoin and aripiprazole.This study highlights high-risk medications and their AE profiles in children and adolescents. Our findings underscore the need for further confirmation of particular drug and AE pairs and the heterogeneity of AEs by age.Comparative study of OROS-MPH and atomoxetine on executive function improvement in ADHD: a randomized controlled trial.This study aimed to compare the effects of osmotic release oral system-methylphenidate (OROS-MPH) and atomoxetine (ATX) on executive function in children and adolescents with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) by a randomized controlled trial. Subjects who met DSM-IV ADHD criteria were randomized to receive either OROS-MPH or ATX treatment. The doses were titrated to achieve optimal response and then maintained for 4-6 wk. A battery of executive function tests and the Behavior Rating Inventory of Executive Function (BRIEF) were administered to subjects who completed the dose titration (OROS-MPH, n=85; ATX, n=57) at the pre- and post-treatment periods. Forty-six children without ADHD were recruited as controls. Both OROS-MPH and ATX significantly improved scores in the Rey Complex Figure Test (RCFT), digit span, and Stroop color-word task. The scores in RCFT and the reverse digit span were not significantly different from the control group at post-treatment assessment (OROS-MPH=ATX=control, p>0.05), whereas the word interference time of the Stroop test was still more than that of the control group (OROS-MPH=ATX>control, p>0.05). OROS-MPH also significantly improved the total correct response in the verbal fluency test to normal level, and the shifting time in the trail-making test to subnormal level. The current findings suggest both OROS-MPH and ATX improved executive function generally in children and adolescents with ADHD, and could return working memory back to normative performance level. Attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder and comorbid subsyndromal depression: what is the impact of methylphenidate on mood?Youths with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) may develop demoralization or depressive or dysthymic symptoms related to chronic social, familial, and academic difficulties that are associated with their ADHD and are at higher risk for developing mood disorders. We assessed the effectiveness of methylphenidate (MPH) on both ADHD and mood symptoms in children and adolescents diagnosed with ADHD and coexistent subsyndromal depression (SSD).A group of ADHD patients with SSD (n = 47), aged 8 to 18 years, received 12 weeks of MPH treatment. The severity of depressive and ADHD symptoms was assessed using the Child Depression Rating Scale (CDRS) and the Attention Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder Rating Scale (ADHD-RS), respectively.A highly significant decrease in both ADHD-RS and CDRS scores was obtained in the total group (N = 47) after MPH treatment (P = 0.0001 and P = 0.0001, respectively). A significant positive correlation was found between the changes in the CDRS total scores and the ADHD-RS (r = 0.34, N = 47, P = 0.018). However, no such correlation was found in a subgroup (N = 8) of patients with "possible depression" (baseline CDRS score, 65-74; r = 0.026, P = 0.95).Methylphenidate treatment is effective for both ADHD and SSD symptoms. It seems that ADHD symptoms are less responsive to MPH in patients with relatively high CDRS scores (possible depression) and that those patients may be candidates for selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor treatment as a supplement for MPH. Further, larger, placebo-controlled, double-blind studies are needed to examine the impact of MPH or d-amphetamine on patients with ADHD/SSD and ADHD/major depressive disorder.Methylphenidate effects in attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder: electrodermal and ERP measures during a continuous performance task.Previous research investigating the effects of stimulants, such as methylphenidate (MPH), on children with attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder (AD/HD) has rarely included autonomic measures of arousal.Our aim was to clarify the effects of MPH on central and autonomic measures in AD/HD children during a continuous performance task (CPT) using a naturalistic open-label study.Thirty-six boys (18 AD/HD and 18 control) participated in a CPT over two trial periods, allowing a more valid estimate of the effects of medication, rather than assuming that retesting per se has no substantial impact. MPH was administered to the AD/HD group 1 h prior to the second trial. Errors and reaction time (RT) were recorded as measures of performance, electrodermal activity as an autonomic nervous system measure and event-related potentials (ERPs) as an index of central nervous system activity.AD/HD children made more errors than controls in the first session, but no group differences were found after medication. No significant differences were observed for RT. Skin conductance level was found to be lower in AD/HD children than controls, but this difference was also ameliorated after medication. Conversely, mean skin conductance response to target stimuli was found not to differ between groups during the initial test phase but became significantly different in phase 2. ERP data showed topographic differences between groups in N1, P2, N2 and P3 at the initial test phase, which were reduced at the second test.Stimulant medication ameliorated some of the dysfunctions in AD/HD children, which are reflected in behavioural and ERP measures. These results, in combination with general differences in electrodermal activity, support a hypo-arousal model of AD/HD, which can explain the action of MPH in these children.Modulation of transcallosally mediated motor inhibition in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) by medication with methylphenidate (MPH).Motor hyperactivity is one of the most outstanding symptoms of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) which might be caused by a disturbed inhibitory motor control. Using focal transcranial magnetic stimulation (TMS) we tested the cortico-callosal inhibition (duration and latency of the ipsilateral Silent Period, iSP) in 23 children with ADHD (mean age 11+/-2.6 years) before and on treatment with methylphenidate (MPH). iSP latency was age correlated, whereas iSP duration as well as Conners scores were age independent. Analyses of mean differences revealed a significant prolongation of iSP duration (p=0.001), shortening of iSP latency (p=0.027) and reduction of Conners score (p=0.001) under medication. Increase of iSP duration and reduction of Conners score under medication were significantly correlated (t=-9.87, p=0.016). Reduced iSP duration and prolonged iSP latency in ADHD children could be the result of a disturbed transcallosally mediated inhibition, most probable due to a combination of maturation deficits of callosal fiber tracts as well as neuronal synaptical transmission within the neuronal network between ipsilaterally stimulated cortex layer III--the origin of transcallosal motor-cortical fibers--and contralateral layer V, the origin of the pyramidal tract. MPH may indirectly improve the dysbalance between excitatory and inhibitory interneuronal activities of this neuronal network via dopaminergic modulatory effects of the striato-thalamo-cortical loop.Methylphenidate euphoria.Objective measurement of hyperactivity, impulsivity, and inattention in children with hyperkinetic disorders before and after treatment with methylphenidate.The purpose of this study was to investigate whether values of the respective parameters of the OPTAx test dependently differ due to the medication with methylphenidate (MPH) in children with hyperkinetic disorders (HD) suffering from hyperactivity, impulsivity, and attention deficits.The OPTAx test is an infrared motion analysis to record the movement pattern during a continuous performance test. We tested 25 children between 6 and 12 years with HD (ICD-10: F90.0 or F90.1) before and after treatment with MPH. The parameters under investigation were activity (microevents and spatial scaling), impulsivity (errors of commission), and attentiveness (accuracy and variability). For statistical analysis a one-tailed matched pairs test (adj. p = 0.01) was conducted to discriminate differences found from those occurred at random. A post hoc partial correlation of absolute differences in the respective parameters and the daily dose of MPH (adj. for BMI) was performed if p < 0.01.Statistically significant results were found for microevents, spatial scaling, errors of commission, accuracy, and variability. The partial correlation showed significant results for microevents and variability.The mean pre-post changes found in all parameters investigated consistently correspond with benefits desired from medication with MPH in children with HD. Absolute differences in microevents and variability seem to depend on the daily dose of MPH after adjustment for BMI.Effects of ethnicity on treatment attendance, stimulant response/dose, and 14-month outcome in ADHD.From the Multimodal Treatment Study of Children with Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder--a randomized clinical trial of 579 children ages 7-9 years receiving 14 months of medication management, behavioral treatment, combination, or community care--the authors matched each African American and Latino participant with randomly selected Caucasian participants of same sex, treatment group, and site. Although Caucasian children were significantly less symptomatic than African American and Latino children on some ratings, response to treatment did not differ significantly by ethnicity after controlling for public assistance. Ethnic minority families cooperated with and benefited significantly from combination (multimodal) treatment (d = 0.36, compared with medication). This incremental gain withstood statistical control for mother's education, single-parent status, and public assistance. Treatment for lower socioeconomic status minority children, especially if comorbid, should combine medication and behavioral treatment.Buspirone versus methylphenidate in the treatment of children with attention- deficit/ hyperactivity disorder: randomized double-blind study.A recent randomized clinical trial showed buspirone efficacy in the treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in children. However, results from a recent multi-site controlled clinical trial of transdermal buspirone failed to separate it from placebo in a large sample of children with ADHD. Therefore, due to these inconsistent findings, this study was designed to assess the efficacy of buspirone in the treatment of children with ADHD compared to methylphenidate in a double blind randomized clinical trial. Forty outpatients with a DSM-IV-TR diagnosis of ADHD were study population of this trial. Subjects were recruited from an outpatient child and adolescent clinic for a 6 week double blind, randomized clinical trial. All study subjects were randomly assigned to receive treatment using tablet of buspirone at a dose of 20-30 mg/day depending on weight (20 mg/day for < 30kg and 30 mg/day for > 30kg) (group 1) or methylphenidate at a dose of 20-30 mg/day depending on weight (20 mg/day for < 30kg and 30 mg/day for > 30kg (group 2) for a 6 week double blind, randomized clinical trial. The principal measure of outcome was the Teacher and Parent ADHD Rating Scale IV. Patients were assessed at baseline and at 21 and 42 days after the medication started. Significant differences were observed between the two groups on the Parent and Teacher Rating Scale scores. The changes at the endpoint compared to baseline were: -8.95±8.73 (mean±SD) and -15.60±7.81 (mean±SD) for buspirone and methyphenidate, for Parent ADHD Rating Scale. The changes at the endpoint compared to baseline were: -9.80 ±7.06 (mean±SD) and -22.40±9.90 (mean±SD) for buspirone and methyphenidate, respectively for Teacher ADHD Rating Scale. The difference between the buspirone and methylphenidate groups in the frequency of side effects was not significant except for decreased appetite, headache and insomnia that were observed more frequently in the methylphenidate group. The results of this study suggest that administration of buspirone was less effective than methylphenidate in the treatment of ADHD.[Effects of methylphenidate in auditory processing evaluation of children and adolescents with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder].To compare the performance of a group of children and adolescents diagnosed with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) pre and post-methylphenidate use in a behavioral auditory processing test battery (AP).Twenty-nine subjects, male and female, ranging from 7 to 15 years old have undergone different behavioral auditory processing tests. A control group composed of 29 subjects with and without learning disabilities was also evaluated.The group with ADHD had a performance similar to the control group without learning disabilities which improved after medication. The group with learning disabilities and without ADHD had the worst performance in tests while the group without learning disabilities and without ADHD exhibited the best ones.The AP battery was unable to distinguish ADHD patients from paired controls; the use of methylphenidate improved the performance on AP tests of ADHD group in the post-medication evaluation.Pulmonary arterial hypertension in an adolescent treated with methylphenidate.Effects of stimulant medication on the lateralisation of line bisection judgements of children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.Deficits in the maintenance of attention may underlie problems in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). Children with ADHD also show asymmetric attention deficits in traditional lateralisation and visuospatial orienting tasks, suggesting right hemispheric (and left hemispace) attentional disturbance. This study aimed to examine the lateralisation of selective attention in ADHD; specifically, the effect of a moving, random dot background, and stimulant medication in the line bisection task.The performance of children with ADHD, on and off methylphenidate, was examined using a computerised horizontal line bisection task with moving and blank backgrounds. Twenty children with a DSM-IV diagnosis of ADHD participated with 20 controls, individually matched for age, sex, grade at school, and IQ. Twelve of the 20 children with ADHD were on stimulant medication at the time of testing. Horizontal lines of varying length were presented in the centre of a computer screen, with either a blank background, or a moving, random dot field. The random dots moved either leftward or rightward across the screen at either 40 mm/s or 80 mm/s.The children with ADHD off medication bisected lines significantly further to the right compared with controls, who showed a small leftward error. Methylphenidate normalised the performance of the children with ADHD for the task with the moving dots.These results support previous evidence for a right hemispheric hypoarousal theory of attentional dysfunction, and are consistent with the emerging picture of a lateralised dysfunction of frontostriatal circuitry in ADHD.Acetyl-L-carnitine as an adjunctive therapy in the treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder in children and adolescents: a placebo-controlled trial.The objective of this study was to test whether a previous observed Acetyl-L-carnitine (ALC) treatment effect could be repeated in an ALC adjunctive therapy treatment trial of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in children and adolescents. This was a six-week, randomized clinical trial undertaken in an outpatient child and adolescent clinic. Subjects included 40 outpatients (28 boys and 12 girls) between the ages of 7-13 who met the DSM-IV-TR diagnostic criteria for ADHD. All study subjects were randomly assigned to receive treatment using capsules of ALC doses ranging from 500 to 1,500 mg/day depending on the weight of the child plus methylphenidate at a dose of 20-30 mg/day depending on weight or Placebo plus methylphenidate at a dose of 20-30 mg/day depending on weight. The principal measure of outcome was the Teacher and Parent attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder Rating Scale- IV. No difference was observed between the two groups on the Parent and Teacher Rating Scale scores (df = 1; F = 0.10; P = 0.74 and df = 1; F = 0.22; P = 0.63 respectively). Side effects consisting of headache and irritability were observed more frequently in the methylphenidate plus placebo group. The results of this study do not support the application of ALC as an adjunctive therapy to methylphenidate in children and adolescents with ADHD.Evaluation of acute cardiovascular effects of immediate-release methylphenidate in children and adolescents with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder.Attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder is a frequent condition in children and often extends into adulthood. Use of immediate-release methylphenidate (MPH) has raised concerns about potential cardiovascular adverse effects within a few hours after administration. This study was carried out to investigate acute effects of MPH on electrocardiogram (ECG) in a pediatric population. A total of 54 consecutive patients with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (51 males and 3 females; mean age =12.14±2.6 years, range 6-19 years), receiving a new prescription of MPH, underwent a standard ECG 2 hours before and after the administration of MPH 10 mg per os. Basal and posttreatment ECG parameters, including mean QT (QT interval when corrected for heart rate [QTc]), QTc dispersion (QTd) interval duration, T-peak to T-end (TpTe) intervals, and TpTe/QT ratio were compared. Significant modifications of both QTc and QTd values were not found after drug administration. QTd fluctuated slightly from 25.7±9.3 milliseconds to 25.1±8.4 milliseconds; QTc varied from 407.6±12.4 milliseconds to 409.8±12.7 milliseconds. A significant variation in blood pressure (systolic blood pressure 105.4±10.3 vs 109.6±11.5; P<0.05; diastolic blood pressure 59.2±7.1 vs 63.1±7.9; P<0.05) was observed, but all the data were within normal range. Heart rate moved from 80.5±15.5 bpm to 87.7±18.8 bpm. No change in TpTe values was found, but a statistically significant increase in TpTe/QTc intervals was found with respect to basal values (0.207±0.02 milliseconds vs 0.214±0.02 milliseconds; P<0.01). The findings of this study show no significant changes in ECG parameters. TpTe values can be an additional parameter to evaluate borderline cases. Does methylphenidate constrict cognitive functioning?It has been suggested that stimulants enhance attention in children with (attention deficit disorder with hyperactivity) (ADDH) by producing a generalized constriction or "over-focusing." Such a phenomenon might be expected to adversely affect performance on tasks, such as those in the Wallach-Kogan (W-K) battery, which explicitly call for cognitive flexibility or "divergent thinking." Nineteen ADDH children, 6 to 10 years of age, were tested on two modified subtests of the W-K battery at baseline, following placebo, and following three different dosages (.3, .6 and 1.0 mg/kg) of methylphenidate. Contrary to the hypothesis, methylphenidate did not decrease but rather sustained output on the tests, which contrasted with a decline in productivity seen across nondrug days. Some ADDH subjects displayed particularly large increases in output following methylphenidate and may represent an atypical subgroup of children who became overaroused on medication.Improved functionality, health related quality of life and decreased burden of disease in patients with ADHD treated with OROS® MPH: is treatment response different between children and adolescents?To compare clinical and health-related quality of life (HRQoL) outcomes between children and adolescents with ADHD treated with OROS® MPH, using data from two large similarly-designed multicenter, prospective, open-label, single-arm, non-interventional studies.Pooled analysis (42603ATT4037, 42603 - ATT - 4001) including patients (6 to 18 years) with a confirmed diagnosis of ADHD. Patients were treated with OROS® MPH for 12 weeks; ADHD symptoms, functioning, HRQoL, safety and tolerability parameters were assessed.822 patients (583 children [6-12 years], 239 adolescents [13-18 years]) were included in the pooled analysis. Mean daily OROS® MPH starting doses in the child and adolescent subgroups were 29.0 ± 11.7 and 37.6 ± 15.6 mg, respectively (p < 0.001). At study end (week 12), the overall mean daily dose was 35.5 ± 14.0 mg, with children and adolescents receiving 32.8 ± 12.7 and 42.0 ± 15.1 mg/day, respectively (p < 0.001). Significant (p < 0.0001: overall population, children, adolescents) symptomatic, functional and HRQoL improvements were observed from baseline to study end using the Conners' Parents Rating Scale (overall: 29.2 ± 10.7 [baseline] to 19.3 ± 11.3 [endpoint]), Children's Global Assessment Scale (overall: 58.5 ± 14.5 [baseline] to 69.6 ± 16.1 [endpoint]), and ILC-LQ0-28. At week 12, between-age group differences were seen in the individual ILC-LQ0-28 parameters: school performance (p = 0.001 [parents' assessment], p = 0.032 [childrens' assessment]), global QoL (p = 0.012 [parents']) and interests and hobbies (p = 0.023 [childrens']). Treating physician's planned continued use of OROS® MPH in 76.9%, 86.0% and 79.3% of children, adolescents and the total population, respectively, at study end (p = 0.029 between-age subgroups). 195 of 822 patients (23.7%) experienced at least one treatment-emergent adverse event; most commonly reported AEs in the total group (≥4%) were insomnia (7.2%), anorexia (4.3%) and involuntary muscle contractions (4.1%). No clinically relevant changes in body weight or vital signs were observed.Clinically relevant differences between children and adolescents with ADHD are present. Adolescents appeared to have a lower health related quality of life and functioning compared to children at baseline, however, they were able to reach comparable ratings at endpoint for most items. Similarly, burden of disease decreased in patients and their carers. OROS MPH was generally safe and well tolerated.A randomized controlled trial of clonidine added to psychostimulant medication for hyperactive and aggressive children.To compare clonidine with placebo added to ongoing psychostimulant therapy for the treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder with comorbid oppositional defiant disorder or conduct disorder.Children 6 to 14 years of age recruited through 2000 to 2001 were randomized to receive clonidine syrup 0.10 to 0.20 mg/day (n = 38) or placebo (n = 29) for 6 weeks. Primary outcome measures were the Conduct and Hyperactive Index subscales of the parent-report Conners Behavior Checklist. Side effects were monitored using physiological measures and the Barkley Side Effect Rating Scale.Evaluable patient analysis showed that significantly more clonidine-treated children than controls were responders on the Conduct scale (21 of 37 versus 6 of 29; chi2(1) = 8.75, p <.01) but not the Hyperactive Index (13 of 37 versus 5 of 29). Compared with placebo, clonidine was associated with a greater reduction in systolic blood pressure measured standing and with transient sedation and dizziness. Clonidine-treated individuals had a greater reduction in a number of unwanted effects associated with psychostimulant treatment compared with placebo.The findings support the continued use of clonidine in combination with psychostimulant medication to reduce conduct symptoms associated with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder. Treatment is well tolerated and unwanted effects are transient.The effects of methylphenidate on prepulse inhibition during attended and ignored prestimuli among boys with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder.The present study investigated attentional modification of prepulse inhibition of startle among boys with and without attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). Two hypotheses were tested: (1) whether ADHD is associated with diminished prepulse inhibition during attended prestimuli, but not ignored prestimuli, and (2) whether methylphenidate selectively increases prepulse inhibition to attended prestimuli among boys with ADHD.Participants were 17 boys with ADHD and 14 controls. Participants completed a tone discrimination task in each of two sessions separated by 1 week. ADHD boys were administered methylphenidate (0.3 mg/kg) in one session and placebo in the other session in a randomized, double-blind fashion. During each series of 72 tones (75 dB; half 1200-Hz, half 400-Hz), participants were paid to attend to one pitch and ignore the other. Bilateral eyeblink electromyogram startle responses were recorded in response to acoustic probes (50-ms, 102-dB white noise) presented following the onset of two-thirds of tones, and during one-third of intertrial intervals.Relative to controls, boys with ADHD exhibited diminished prepulse inhibition 120 ms after onset of attended but not ignored prestimuli following placebo administration. Methylphenidate selectively increased prepulse inhibition to attended prestimuli at 120 ms among boys with ADHD to a level comparable to that of controls, who did not receive methylphenidate.These data are consistent with the hypothesis that ADHD involves diminished selective attention and suggest that methylphenidate ameliorates the symptoms of ADHD, at least in part, by altering an early attentional mechanism.Stimulant use linked to sudden death in children without heart problems.Cytogenetic effects in children treated with methylphenidate.In recent years there has been a surge in methylphenidate (Ritalin) use for treatment of attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in children. However, there is a paucity of information on whether this drug poses any potential health risks, such as mutagenicity or carcinogenicity, for humans. To address this issue, we investigated whether this central nervous system stimulant produces cytogenetic abnormalities in pediatric patients at therapeutic levels. In a population composed of twelve children treated with therapeutic doses of methylphenidate, we analyzed three cytogenetic endpoints in peripheral blood lymphocytes obtained before and three months after initiation of treatment with this drug. In all participants, treatment induced a significant 3, 4.3 and 2.4-fold increase in chromosome aberrations, sister chromatid exchanges and micronuclei frequencies, respectively (P=0.000 in all cases). These findings warrant further investigations of the possible health effects of methylphenidate in humans, especially in view of the well-documented relationship between elevated frequencies of chromosome aberrations and increased cancer risk.Impact of long-term treatment of methylphenidate on height and weight of school age children with ADHD.Stimulant-associated growth deficits in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) have long been a concern. We chose 146 school age children diagnosed with ADHD being treated with methylphenidate (MPH) and 29 drug-free ADHD children, and followed them up for 2-4 years. We recorded the changes in height and weight after long-term methylphenidate treatment and analyzed the influence of confounding factors to growth in height, weight, and height velocity. The change of the gap between patients' height and mean height in the methylphenidate group was -1.86+/-0.82 cm ( P<0.001); in controls it was -0.26+/-0.51 cm ( P<0.05). The changes of height standard deviation score (SDS) in the methylphenidate group and controls were -0.14+/-0.23 SD ( P<0.001) and +0.05+/-0.10 SD ( P<0.05), respectively. The differences between the 2 groups were significant ( P<0.001). Both correlation and regression analyses indicated that the duration of treatment contributed significantly to the variance in change of height ( P<0.001). The height velocity was significantly attenuated in the first year. The change of the gap between the patients' weight and weight for height after methylphenidate was -0.14+/-1.25 kg ( P>0.05). From this study, a small but significant deceleration of height velocity has been identified as a long-term side effect of methylphenidate, the magnitude of the height deficit is related to the duration of treatment. Methylphenidate had no significant influence on weight and BMI values.Findings from the NIMH Multimodal Treatment Study of ADHD (MTA): implications and applications for primary care providers.In 1992, the National Institute of Mental Health and 6 teams of investigators began a multisite clinical trial, the Multimodal Treatment of Attention-Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (MTA) study. Five hundred seventy-nine children were randomly assigned to either routine community care (CC) or one of three study-delivered treatments, all lasting 14 months. The three MTA treatments-monthly medication management (usually methylphenidate) following weekly titration (MedMgt), intensive behavioral treatment (Beh), and the combination (Comb)-were designed to reflect known best practices within each treatment approach. Children were assessed at four time points in multiple outcome. Results indicated that Comb and MedMgt interventions were substantially superior to Beh and CC interventions for attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder symptoms. For other functioning domains (social skills, academics, parent-child relations, oppositional behavior, anxiety/depression), results suggested slight advantages of Comb over single treatments (MedMgt, Beh) and community care. High quality medication treatment characterized by careful yet adequate dosing, three times daily methylphenidate administration, monthly follow-up visits, and communication with schools conveyed substantial benefits to those children that received it. In contrast to the overall study findings that showed the largest benefits for high quality medication management (regardless of whether given in the MedMgt or Comb group), secondary analyses revealed that Comb had a significant incremental effect over MedMgt (with a small effect size for this comparison) when categorical indicators of excellent response and when composite outcome measures were used. In addition, children with parent-defined comorbid anxiety disorders, particularly those with overlapping disruptive disorder comorbidities, showed preferential benefits to the Beh and Comb interventions. Parental attitudes and disciplinary practices appeared to mediate improved response to the Beh and Comb interventions.Evaluation of pharmacological treatment of impulsivity in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.We used an assessment that involved competing reinforcer dimensions in a concurrent-schedules arrangement to examine the effects of stimulant medication on impulsivity (i.e., sensitivity of choices to reinforcer immediacy relative to rate, quality, and effort) with 4 students with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder. The assessments were administered in the context of a double-blind, placebo-controlled, counterbalanced reversal design. Reinforcer immediacy was the most influential dimension for 3 of the students and the second most influential dimension for 1 of the students across placebo and medication conditions; medication did not affect these sensitivities.A postmarketing clinical experience study of Metadate CD.The objective of the study was to investigate the effectiveness and safety of Metadate CD (methylphenidate HCl, USP) Extended Release Capsules in the treatment of Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD), in actual clinical practice.This was a multicenter, open-label, postmarketing study. Eligible patients were aged 6-17 with a diagnosis of ADHD and receiving either no treatment or maintenance treatment with another approved methylphenidate (MPH) product. Metadate CD was administered once daily for 3 weeks, titrated against reported and observed symptoms. Clinical Global Impression (CGI) scores at Week 3 were used for the primary efficacy evaluation. Patient treatment satisfaction was determined by questionnaire at the final evaluation visit. Safety was assessed through adverse event reporting, laboratory tests and vital sign measurements.Overall, of the 308 patients in the Intent-To-Treat population, the majority (65%) demonstrated a positive response to Metadate CD (defined as CGI Global Improvement rating of very much or much improved). In addition, patients previously treated with immediate-release or extended-release tablet formulations of MPH were successfully converted to Metadate CD at a comparable dose. Most patients (87%) were very satisfied or moderately satisfied with study treatment, and among previously treated patients, 71% rated Metadate CD as much better or better than their previous MPH treatment. Adverse events were consistent with current FDA-approved product labeling for Metadate CD.Metadate CD is effective and well-tolerated in actual clinical use for ADHD.Sudden death and use of stimulant medications in youths.The authors sought to determine whether a significant association exists between the use of stimulants and the rare event of sudden unexplained death in children and adolescents.A matched case-control design was performed. Mortality data from 1985-1996 state vital statistics were used to identify 564 cases of sudden death occurring at ages 7 through 19 years across the United States along with a matched group of 564 young people who died as passengers in motor vehicle traffic accidents. The primary exposure measure was the presence of amphetamine, dextroamphetamine, methamphetamine, or methylphenidate according to informant reports or as noted in medical examiner records, toxicology results, or death certificates.In 10 (1.8%) of the sudden unexplained deaths it was determined that the youths were taking stimulants, specifically methylphenidate; in contrast, use of stimulants was found in only two subjects in the motor vehicle accident comparison group (0.4%), with only one involving methylphenidate use. A significant association of stimulant use with sudden unexplained death emerged from the primary analysis, which was based on exact conditional logistic regression (odds ratio=7.4, 95% CI=1.4 to 74.9). A comprehensive series of sensitivity analyses yielded qualitatively similar findings.This case-control study provides support for an association between the use of stimulants and sudden unexplained death among children and adolescents. Although sudden unexplained death is a rare event, this finding should be considered in the context of other data about the risk and benefit of stimulants in medical treatment.Open-label study of dexmethylphenidate hydrochloride in children and adolescents with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.This pilot study examined the efficacy and duration of the effect of dexmethylphenidate (d-MPH) given once-daily in subjects with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Subjects aged 6-18 years (inclusive) with ADHD were enrolled in this 8-week, openlabel study. Outcome measures included the Conners'Teacher and Parent Rating Scales, the Attention Deficit Disorder Rating Scale (ADDRS), the Clinical Global Impression (CGI) Scale, and teacher and parent visual analog scales to estimate the duration of efficacy. d-MPH was initiated at a dose of 2.5 mg/day. The dose was flexible, based on response and tolerability, and could be increased in increments of 2.5 mg/day to a maximum daily dose of 30 mg/day.Twenty-two subjects (mean age, 8.7 +/- 0.4 years) were treated. Significant improvements (p <0.0001) from baseline occurred in the Conners' Teacher and Parent Rating Scales after 8 weeks. Of the evaluated subjects, 85.7% (18 of 21) showed at least a 30% improvement from baseline on the Conners' Teacher Rating Scale, and 86.4% (19 of 22) of subjects showed at least a 30% improvement from baseline on the Conners' Parent Rating Scale. Most subjects demonstrated an improvement on the ADDRS and the CGI-Improvement (CGI-I) scale. Median duration of effect was estimated at 6.2 hours (teachers) and at 7.5 hours (parents). On average, patients gained 2.4 pounds over the course of the study.A single daily dose of d-MPH was effective in controlling ADHD in children and was well tolerated. Future studies are needed to confirm these findings and to evaluate chronic dosing with d-MPH.Medication-induced seizures.Methylphenidate and amphetamine do not induce cytogenetic damage in lymphocytes of children with ADHD.In response to previously published findings of methylphenidate-induced chromosomal changes in children, this study was designed to determine whether methylphenidate- or amphetamine-based drugs induce chromosomal damage (structural aberrations, micronuclei, and sister chromatid exchanges) in peripheral blood lymphocytes of children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder after 3 months of continuous treatment.Stimulant drug-naïve subjects, 6 to 12 years of age, in good overall health, and judged to be appropriate candidates for stimulant therapy based on rigorously diagnosed ADHD using DSM-IV criteria, were randomized into two open-label treatment groups (methylphenidate or mixed amphetamine salts). Each subject provided a blood sample before initiation of treatment and after 3 months of treatment. Pretreatment and posttreatment frequencies of chromosomal aberrations, micronuclei, and sister chromatid exchanges were determined for each subject.Sixty-three subjects enrolled in the study; 47 subjects completed the full 3 months of treatment, 25 in the methylphenidate group and 22 in the amphetamine group. No significant treatment-related increases were observed in any of the three measures of cytogenetic damage in the 47 subjects who completed treatment or the 16 subjects who did not.Earlier findings of methylphenidate-induced chromosomal changes in children were not replicated in this study. These results add to the accumulating evidence that therapeutic levels of methylphenidate do not induce cytogenetic damage in humans. Furthermore, our results indicate that amphetamine-based products do not pose a risk for cytogenetic damage in children.Atomoxetine may improve methylphenidates' efficacy in treatment of ADHD?Right prefrontal activation as a neuro-functional biomarker for monitoring acute effects of methylphenidate in ADHD children: An fNIRS study.An objective biomarker is a compelling need for the early diagnosis of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), as well as for the monitoring of pharmacological treatment effectiveness. The advent of fNIRS, which is relatively robust to the body movements of ADHD children, raised the possibility of introducing functional neuroimaging diagnosis in younger ADHD children. Using fNIRS, we monitored the oxy-hemoglobin signal changes of 16 ADHD children (6 to 13 years old) performing a go/no-go task before and 1.5 h after MPH or placebo administration, in a randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled, crossover design. 16 age- and gender-matched normal controls without MPH administration were also monitored. Relative to control subjects, unmedicated ADHD children exhibited reduced activation in the right inferior frontal gyrus (IFG) and middle frontal gyrus (MFG) during go/no-go tasks. The reduced right IFG/MFG activation was acutely normalized after MPH administration, but not after placebo administration. The MPH-induced right IFG/MFG activation was significantly larger than the placebo-induced activation. Post-scan exclusion rate was 0% among 16 right-handed ADHD children with IQ > 70. We revealed that the right IFG/MFG activation could serve as a neuro-functional biomarker for monitoring the acute effects of methylphenidate in ADHD children. fNIRS-based examinations were applicable to ADHD children as young as 6 years old, and thus would contribute to early clinical diagnosis and treatment of ADHD children. Relationship between quality of life and psychopathological profile: data from an observational study in children with ADHD.Although ADHD significantly affects the quality of life (QoL) of patients and their families, QoL in children with ADHD has rarely been investigated in association with psychopathological profile, and the relationship remains unclear. The open-label OBSEER study evaluated the effectiveness and tolerability of Equasym XL(®), a modified-release methylphenidate, in routine care of children and adolescents (aged 6-17 years) with ADHD. At baseline, questionnaires assessing psychopathological profile (Strengths and Difficulties Questionnaire, SDQ; parental ratings) and QoL (KINDL; parent, child or adolescent versions) were completed; QoL was reassessed at final visit. We analysed the relationship between psychopathology and parent/patient-rated QoL in ADHD at baseline. Data from 721 consecutively referred children and adolescents were analysed. QoL was similarly low from parent and self-ratings and independent of severity on the SDQ subscale hyperactivity/inattention. Self-ratings indicated that additional conduct disorder was associated with further reduction in QoL. Similarly, children with high scores from parent and adolescent ratings on the SDQ subscale conduct problems had reduced QoL on some KINDL subscales. Adolescents with ADHD not receiving medication at baseline reported lower QoL than those already on medication. Results show that children and adolescents with ADHD have low QoL, independent of core symptom severity. Additional conduct problems may further impact QoL negatively, while ADHD medication use may show a trend towards improved QoL. Not all psychopathological problems associated with ADHD affect QoL similarly. As parents appear to have a less critical view of QoL compared with children's self-ratings, both parent and child ratings should be included in clinical assessments.Plasma methylphenidate concentrations in youths treated with high-dose osmotic release oral system formulation.Children and adolescents are being treated increasingly for attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) with a variety of stimulants in higher than Food and Drug Administration (FDA)-approved doses and in combination with other medications.We sought to determine methylphenidate (MPH) concentrations in children and adolescents treated with high-dose, extended-release osmotic release oral system (OROS) MPH plus concomitant medications, and to examine MPH concentrations with respect to the safety and tolerability of treatment.Plasma MPH concentrations were measured by liquid chromatography-mass spectrometry 4-5 hours after administration of medication in a sample of youths diagnosed with ADHD. These youths were treated naturalistically with higher than FDA-approved doses of OROS MPH in addition to their concomitant medications. Markers of safety and tolerability (e.g., measures of blood pressure and heart rate) were also examined.Among the 17 patients (with a mean age of 16.2 +/- 2 years and a mean number of concurrent medications of 2.23 +/- 0.94), the mean plasma MPH concentration was 28 +/- 9.1 ng/mL, despite a mean daily dose of OROS MPH of 169 +/- 5 mg (3.0 +/- 0.8 mg/kg per day). No patient had a plasma MPH level >or=50 ng/mL or clinical signs of stimulant toxicity. No correlation was found between plasma MPH concentrations and OROS MPH dose or changes in vital signs.High-dose OROS MPH, used in combination with other medications, was not associated with either unusually elevated plasma MPH concentrations or with clinically meaningful changes in vital signs. Study limitations include a single time-point sampling of MPH concentrations, a small sample size, and a lack of outcome measures to address treatment effectiveness.Comparative short term efficacy and tolerability of methylphenidate and atomoxetine in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.To compare the short term efficacy and tolerability of methylphenidate and atomoxetine in children with Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Open label randomized parallel group clinical trial.Child Guidance Clinic of a tertiary care hospital of Northern India from October 2010 to June 2012.69 patients (age 6-14 y) with a diagnosis of ADHD receiving methylphenidate or atomoxetine.Methylphenidate (0.2-1 mg/kg/d) or atomoxetine (0.5-1.2 mg/kg/d) for eight weeks.Treatment response (>25% change in baseline Vanderbilt ADHD Diagnostic Parent Rating Scale (VADPRS); Vanderbilt ADHD Diagnostic Teacher Rating Scale (VADTRS); Clinical Global Impression Severity Scale (CGI-S) at eight weeks and adverse effects.Treatment response was observed in 90.7% patients from methylphenidate group and 86.2% patients of atomoxetine group at an average dose of 0.45 mg/kg/d and 0.61 mg/kg/d, respectively. The patients showed comparable improvement on VADPRS (P=0.500), VADTRS (P=0.264) and CGI-S (P=0.997). Weight loss was significantly higher in methylphenidate group (-0.57±0.78 kg; P=0.001), and heart rate increase was observed at higher rate in atomoxetine group (7± 9 bpm; P=0.021).Methylphenidate and atomoxetine are efficacious in Indian children with ADHD at lesser doses than previously used. Their efficacy and tolerability are comparable. TRIAL REGISTRATION NO.: CTRI/2011/08/001981.Amantadine versus methylphenidate in children and adolescents with attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder: a randomized, double-blind trial.The aim of the present study was to further evaluate, under double blind and controlled conditions, the efficacy of amantadine for attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in children and adolescents as compared to methylphenidate.This was a 6-week randomized clinical trial. Forty patients (28 boys and 12 girls) with a DSM-IV-TR diagnosis of ADHD were the study population of this trial. All study subjects were randomly assigned to receive the treatment using capsule of amantadine at a dose of 100-150 mg/day depending on weight (100 mg/day for <30 kg and 150 mg/day for >30 kg) or methylphenidate at a dose of 20-30 mg/day for a 6-week double blind, randomized clinical trial. The principal measure of outcome was the Teacher and Parent Attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder Rating Scale-IV.No significant differences were observed between the two groups on the Parent and Teacher Rating Scale scores (df = 1; F = 0.02; p = 0.86 and df = 1; F = 0.01; p = 0.89, respectively). Side effects of decreased appetite and restlessness were observed more frequently in the methylphenidate group.The results of this study indicate that amantadine significantly improved symptoms of ADHD and was well tolerated and it may be beneficial in the treatment of children with ADHD. Nevertheless, the present results do not constitute proof of efficacy.Growth deficits in children treated with desipramine: a controlled study.Using multiple assessment methods, growth deficits in weight and height were examined in a clinical sample of children and adolescents with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder treated chronically (mean 14 months) with desipramine (DMI) and two comparison samples of children treated chronically with methylphenidate (MPH) and a not-treated group. Although there were statistically significant weight deficits in children treated with both DMI and MPH compared with normal controls, only those treated with MPH sustained height deficits that attained statistical significance. It appears that DMI may be an appropriate alternative for patients with stimulant-associated severe suppression of growth in height.Aripiprazole induced acute dystonia after discontinuation of a stimulant medication.A pilot study: differential effects of methylphenidate-OROS on working memory and attention functions in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder with and without behavioural comorbidities.To examine the effects of methylphenidate-OROS (MPH-OROS) on working memory (WM) and attention functions in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), and to investigate whether there is a differential effect in ADHD children with (ADHD+) and without (ADHD-) behavioural comorbidities. Participants included a clinic referred sample of 12 stimulant naïve school-aged children with a diagnosis of combined ADHD according to the DSM-IV criteria (6 ADHD+, 6 ADHD-), and 11 healthy children. A neuropsychological protocol was applied at three different moments: before treatment, after one those of MPH-OROS, and after one month of MPH-OROS daily treatment. The protocol was simultaneously administered to the control group. Initial differences in attention parameters between naïve children with ADHD and the control group disappeared after the first dose of MPH-OROS. For WM, one month of daily treatment was necessary to achieve this pattern of results. Both ADHD groups (ADHD+ and ADHD-) showed these differences, but there was a greater improvement in (ADHD-). MPH-OROS had an immediate effect on attention deficits, but long-term treatment was needed to improve WM to the level of healthy subjects. The presence of comorbid behavioural conditions determined a less robust response in neuropsychological performance to stimulant treatment.An observational study of once-daily modified-release methylphenidate in ADHD: effectiveness on symptoms and impairment, and safety.ADHD affects over 5% of children worldwide. It is typically treated with stimulant medications, and methylphenidate (MPH) is the most commonly prescribed. This study investigated the effectiveness, on symptoms and impairment, and safety of Equasym XL(®), a combination of 30% immediate-release and 70% modified-release MPH, in the treatment of ADHD in daily clinical practice. This open-label, observational, post-marketing surveillance study was conducted in 169 centres in Germany. Eligible patients, aged 6-17 years, were diagnosed with ADHD and about to begin treatment with Equasym XL(®). Effectiveness was assessed by physicians using the clinical global impression (CGI) severity and improvement scales; teachers and parents completed questionnaires evaluating ADHD symptoms and behavioural problems (DAYAS, FBB-ADHD and SDQ-P). Assessments were carried out at baseline, after 1-3 and 6-12 weeks of treatment. Of 852 enrolled patients, 822 were evaluable; 25.30% were treatment naïve, 69.84% had previously received different MPH formulations, and 4.87% had received other medications. ADHD symptoms improved from baseline to last visit for the majority of patients for all outcome measures. According to physician ratings of core ADHD symptoms, 75.73% of patients showed improvements on the CGI-Improvement scale, 17.77% had no change, and 6.50% worsened. In teacher and parent ratings, the effectiveness of Equasym XL(®) was rated better than prior therapy at all measured time points across the day, particularly late morning (teachers) and early afternoon (parents). Equasym XL(®) was generally well tolerated; only 3.16% of patients permanently discontinued treatment due to adverse events. Equasym XL(®) is effective and well tolerated in daily clinical practice.National Institute of Mental Health Collaborative Multimodal Treatment Study of Children with ADHD (the MTA). Design challenges and choices.The Collaborative Multimodal Treatment Study of Children with Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD), the MTA, is the first child multisite cooperative agreement treatment study of children conducted by the National Institute of Mental Health, Rockville, Md. It examines the long-term effectiveness of medication vs behavioral treatment vs both for treatment of ADHD and compares state-of-the-art treatment with routine community care. In a parallel-groups design, 576 children (age, 7-9 years) with ADHD (96 at each site) are thoroughly assessed and randomized to 4 conditions: (1) medication alone, (2) psychosocial treatment alone, (3) the combination of both, (4) or community comparison. The first 3 groups are treated for 14 months and all are reassessed periodically for 24 months. Designers met the following challenges: framing clinically relevant primary questions; defining the target population; choice, intensity, and integration and combination of treatments for fair comparisons; combining scientific controls and standardization with clinical flexibility; and implementing a controlled clinical trial in a nonclinical setting (school) controlled by others. Innovative solutions included extensive decision algorithms and manualized adaptations of treatments to specific needs.Stimulant therapy and seizure risk in children with ADHD.Stimulants are an effective treatment frequently prescribed for attention-deficit-hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), but they commonly are believed to lower the threshold for seizures. Although several studies have revealed that stimulants do not exacerbate well-controlled epilepsy, there is a paucity of data about seizure risk in nonepileptic children treated with stimulants. Two hundred thirty-four children (179 males, 9.1 +/- 3.6 years of age; 55 females, 9.6 +/- 3.9 years of age) with uncomplicated ADHD received electroencephalograms (EEGs) performed in our institution. Thirty-six patients (15.4%) demonstrated epileptiform abnormalities, and 198 (84.6%) demonstrated normal or nonepileptiform EEGs. Rolandic spikes accounted for 40% of the abnormal EEGs and 60% of those with focal abnormalities. Stimulant therapy was elected by 205 of 234 patients (87.6%). Seizures occurred only in the treated group, in one of 175 patients with a normal EEG (incidence 0.6%, 95% confidence intervals 0%-1.7%) and three of 30 treated patients with epileptiform EEGs (incidence 10%, 95% confidence interval 0%-20.7%). Seizures occurred in two of 12 children (16.7%) with rolandic spikes. These data suggest that a normal EEG can be used to assign children with ADHD to a category of minimal risk for seizure. In contrast, an epileptiform EEG in neurologically normal children with ADHD predicts considerable risk for the eventual occurrence of seizure. The risk, however, is not necessarily attributable to stimulant use.A non-interventional study of extended-release methylphenidate in the routine treatment of adolescents with ADHD: effectiveness, safety and adherence to treatment.This multi-centre, open-label, non-interventional study evaluates effectiveness, safety and adherence to treatment of a specific extended-release methylphenidate with a 50 % immediate and a 50 % extended-release component (Medikinet(®) retard) in the clinical routine treatment of 381 adolescents with ADHD and a mean age of 14.0 ± 1.9 years. ADHD and associated psychiatric symptoms, medication status and dosage frequency, treatment adherence and adverse events were assessed at baseline and after a median treatment length with Medikinet(®) retard of 70 days. Primary outcome criterion was the change of ADHD symptom severity from baseline to endpoint according to the ADHD-KGE (German: ADHS-Klinische Gesamteinschätzung) change score. At baseline, 4.2 % of the patients were treatment naïve, 92.7 % had previously received different methylphenidate formulations and 3.1 % had received atomoxetine or amphetamine. During the study, patients received a mean daily dose of 35.7 ± 15.1 mg Medikinet(®) retard. At endpoint, in 78 % of patients, the total ADHD symptom severity was reduced, in 20.4 %, it remained unchanged and in 1.6 %, it was worsened. The mean ADHD-KGE total ADHD symptom score was reduced from 1.8 ± 0.7 (moderate) at baseline to 0.8 ± 0.5 (mild; p < 0.001) at endpoint; the mean ADHD-KGE total-associated symptom score was reduced from 1.9 ± 0.7 (moderate) at baseline to 1.0 ± 0.6 (mild; p < 0.0001) at endpoint. After the medication switch from previous methylphenidate formulation to Medikinet(®) retard, multiple dosing with ≥3 daily medication intakes was reduced from 12.9 % at baseline to 3.1 % at endpoint (p < 0.001). Adherence to treatment was improved in 37 % of patients. Most frequent adverse events were loss of appetite and gastrointestinal problems. The findings suggest that pharmacologically treated adolescents with ADHD and insufficient symptom reduction and/or treatment adherence benefit from switching to Medikinet(®) retard and that it is well tolerated when given in clinical routine care.Methylphenidate in hyperactive boys with comorbid tic disorder: II. Short-term behavioral effects in school settings.In this study, 11 prepubertal hyperactive boys with tic disorder received placebo and three doses of methylphenidate (0.1, 0.3, and 0.5 mg/kg) for 2 weeks each, under double-blind conditions. Each boy was observed for approximately 20 hours in the school setting (classroom seatwork activities, lunchroom, and playground). Results showed that methylphenidate effectively suppressed hyperactive/disruptive behaviors in the classroom and physical aggression in the lunchroom and on the playground. Methylphenidate also reduced the occurrence of vocal tics in the classroom and the lunchroom. None of the motor tic measures revealed drug effects, but the lowest mean rate of motor tics occurred on the 0.3 mg/kg dose. On an operationally defined minimal effective dose, only one boy experienced motor tic exacerbation.Methylphenidate transdermal system in attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder in adolescents: profile report.Melatonin effects in methylphenidate treated children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder: a randomized double blind clinical trial.The aim of this study was to determine melatonin effects on sleep patterns, symptoms of hyperactivity and attention deficiency in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Children with age range of 7-12 years who had a combined form of ADHD were randomly divided in to 2 groups according to gender blocks. One group took melatonin (3 or 6mg) combined with methylphenidate (Ritalin) (1mg/kg), and the other group took placebo combined with methylphenidate (1mg/kg). ADHD rating scale and sleep patterns questionnaires were completed. Research hypotheses were assessed at the baseline, the second, fourth and eighth weeks after the treatment.The mean sleep latency and total sleep disturbance scores were reduced in melatonin group, while the scores increased in the placebo group (p≥0.05). Data analysis, using ANOVA with repeated measures, did not show any statistically significant differences between the two groups in ADHD scores.Administration of melatonin along with methylphenidate can partially improve symptoms of sleep disturbance. However, it does not seem to reduce attention deficiency and hyperactivity behavior of children with ADHD.Treatment of ADHD in patients unresponsive to methylphenidate.Varying the wear time of the methylphenidate transdermal system in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder often have varying needs for coverage of their symptoms throughout the day. The objectives of this study were to determine the efficacy, duration of action, and safety of methylphenidate transdermal system worn for variable times by children (ages 6-12) diagnosed with ADHD.Methylphenidate dose was optimized over 5 weeks using 10-, 15-, 20-, or 30-mg patches worn for 9 hours. The efficacy of 4- and 6-hour wear times was then assessed in an Analog Classroom setting during a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blind, three-way crossover phase. The main efficacy measures were the Swanson, Kotkin, Agler, M-Flynn, and Pelham Rating Scale deportment scale and the Permanent Product Measure of Performance math test.All of the efficacy measures indicated that 4- and 6-hour wear times improved ADHD symptoms and that medication effects on the Swanson, Kotkin, Agler, M-Flynn, and Pelham Rating Scale deportment scale and Permanent Product Measure of Performance math test decreased between 2 and 4 hours after patch removal. The majority of adverse events were transient and mild to moderate in severity.These findings suggest that the duration of medication effect is related to the wear time of the patch and may be tailored to accommodate the schedules of patients.Effect of methylphenidate on auditory event related potential in boys with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.Event related brain potentials (ERPs) is a non-invasive technique giving knowledge about neural activity associated with sensory and cognitive information processing. The aims of the present study were to investigate amplitude and latency of P100, N200, and P300 in parietal and frontal areas in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), and in healthy children, and to determine the effect of methylphenidate (MPH) on these ERPs indices in ADHD group.ERP indices, latencies of parietal P3 (PP3L), P1 (PP1L), N2 (PN2L), and frontal P1 (FP1L), N2 (FN2L), P3 (FP3L), and amplitudes of parietal P3 (PP3A), P1 (PP1A), N2 (PN2A), and frontal P1 (FP1A), N2 (FN2A), and P3 (FP3A), using an auditory oddball paradigm were recorded before and under MPH treatment in boys with ADHD, and in 23 healthy children.Before MPH treatment, PP3L was significantly longer and PP3A, PN2A, FN2A, and FP3A smaller in children with ADHD compared to healthy children (all P values < .05). No significant difference was found in PP1L, PP1A, PN2L, FP1L, FP1A, FN2L, and FP3L between ADHD and control group (all P values > .05). MPH treatment resulted in a significant decrease in PP3L, PN2L, and FP3L, and increase in PP3A, PP1A, and FP3A (all P values < .05). There was no significant difference in PP1L, PN2A, FP1L, FP1A, FN2L, and FN2A between before MPH and under MPH treatment in ADHD subjects (all P values > .05). Under MPH treatment, PP3L, PP3A, PP1L, PP1A, PN2L, FP1L, FP1A, FN2L, FP3L, and FP3A were not significantly different between children with ADHD and healthy controls (all P values > .05). However, PN2A and FN2A were significantly smaller in ADHD subjects compared to controls (both P values < .05).This study provides indirect evidence that ADHD subjects are associated with abnormalities in signal detection (inattention) and discrimination, and information processing. In addition, present study has shown that except FN2A and PN2A, MPH normalizes ERP indices, which suggested that MPH may be effective on impaired information processing in ADHD, but not on the receiving information.Academic achievement and emotional status of children with ADHD treated with long-term methylphenidate and multimodal psychosocial treatment.To test the hypothesis that intensive multimodal psychosocial intervention (that includes academic assistance and psychotherapy) combined with methylphenidate significantly enhances the academic performance and emotional status of children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) compared with methylphenidate alone and with methylphenidate combined with nonspecific psychosocial treatment (attention control).One hundred three children with ADHD (ages 7-9), free of conduct and learning disorders, who responded to short-term methylphenidate were randomized for 2 years to receive one of three treatments: (1) methylphenidate alone, (2) methylphenidate plus psychosocial treatment that included academic remediation, organizational skills training, and psychotherapy as well as parent training and counseling and social skills training, or (3) methylphenidate plus attention control treatment. Children's function was assessed through academic testing, parent ratings of homework problems, and self-ratings of depression and self-esteem.No advantage was found on any measure of academic performance or emotional status for the combination treatment over methylphenidate alone and over methylphenidate plus attention control. Significant improvement occurred across all treatments and was maintained over 2 years.In stimulant-responsive young children with ADHD without learning and conduct disorders, there is no support for academic assistance and psychotherapy to enhance academic achievement or emotional adjustment. Significant short-term improvements were maintained over 2 years.The rCBF brain mapping in adolescent ADHD comorbid developmental coordination disorder and its changes after MPH challenging.Comorbid developmental coordination disorder (DCD) in the patients with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) often complicated the treatment strategy. Methylphenidate (MPH) improves the coordination problem in patients with ADHD.The study intended to investigate the pathophysiology and the mechanisms of MPH in comorbid DCD of the adolescents with ADHD.Brain images using technetium-99m ethyl cysteinate dimmer ((99m)Tc-ECD) single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) were done in 10 drug-naïve adolescents with ADHD without DCD and 5 adolescents with ADHD comorbid DCD. The baseline rCBF and changes of rCBF after 10 mg MPH challenge between two groups were compared using statistical parametric mapping (SPM99) analysis.Lower rCBF of bilateral frontal lobe, inferior parental lobe, and increased rCBF of right posterior cingulate gyrus, anterior lobe of cerebellum were found in ADHD comorbid DCD group compared to ADHD without DCD group. Decreased rCBF in the right occipital, inferior temporal lobe was found in ADHD comorbid DCD group after MPH while ADHD alone group revealed increased rCBF in bilateral occipital lobe.The results help us understand the pathophysiology of DCD in ADHD adolescents. The different rCBF response to MPH provides a clue for future intervention of DCD in ADHD adolescents.Tolerability and effects of OROS® MPH (Concerta ®) on functioning, severity of disease and quality of life in children and adolescents with ADHD: results from a prospective, non-interventional trial.Attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder may have substantial impact on family life, peer interactions, and quality of life. Stimulants are recommended as first-line pharmacotherapy for ADHD. OROS(®) MPH (Concerta(®)) is a long-acting preparation with duration of effect for up to 12 h. In this 8-week, prospective, open-label, non-interventional trial the impact of therapy with OROS(®) MPH on functioning in four different areas of life (school, recreation, family life, and peer interaction), severity of disease, and quality of life (QoL) as well as tolerability were investigated under daily routine care. 306 patients, aged 10.2±2.3 years, were either transitioned to OROS(®) MPH from short-acting, immediate-release MPH (-IR) preparations (n=231; 75%), or treatment was initiated with OROS(®) MPH in MPH-naïve patients (n =75; 25%). In both groups, therapy with OROS(®) MPH was associated with significant improvements in daily functioning, severity of disease, and QoL. Adverse events (AE) were documented in 160 patients (52.3%). In 95 patients (31.0%) a causal relationship was assessed as at least possible. Four serious AEs were reported in 2 patients and rated as doubtfully related to study medication. Most frequent AEs (≥5% of patients) were insomnia, anorexia, ineffectiveness of medication, and headache. In 12.1% of patients AE led to discontinuation of study participation. Considering the limitations of this non-interventional study, the results refer to the importance of a therapy that covers not only school-time, but also takes other areas of life into account. Initiating treatment with long-acting preparations, such as OROS(®) MPH in MPH-naïve patients might be a feasible option.[Waived EEG diagnosis before administration and during drug therapy with methylphenidate: dangerous or justifiable?].The issue of whether or not to perform an EEG before or during therapy with psychostimulants currently is a topic of controversial discussion. Only a few studies have described the types of EEG alterations that occur in patients without epilepsy who are being treated with psychostimulants. The aim of our study was to assess the types of change in the EEG that occur before and during this treatment so as to be able to formulate recommendations for EEGs in children with ADHD.The EEGs of 124 children and adolescents with ADHD before and during treatment with methylphenidate were analyzed retrospectively.In summary the rate of hypersynchronous activity (HSA) during therapy with methylphenidate does not increase. Patients on antiepileptic medication did not show any increased rates of seizures or HSA.Whether or not methylphenidate medication influences the occurrence of epileptic seizures remains unsettled. Given the data from this study, we would conclude that an EEG during therapy with methylphenidate is not necessary. Before commencing a planned methylphenidate therapy, however, an EEG should be performed.A young man with acute dilated cardiomyopathy associated with methylphenidate.An 18-year-old obese man with a body mass index of 40, diagnosed with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder and treated with methylphenidate (Concerta) was acutely admitted to hospital with hypoxia and dyspnoea. On investigation signs of liver-, renal-, and heart-failure were found. Noradrenalin infusion was started. Echocardiography showed dilated left ventricle and an ejection fraction (EF) of 25%. Liver function improved, noradrenalin and dobutamine were tapered, but three days after admission a new echocardiography showed an EF of 10%. The patient was transferred to the National Hospital (Rikshospitalet, Oslo), where intensified treatment including intra aortic balloon pump (IABP) was instituted. Cardiac function improved, and 3 weeks later the IABP was disconnected. EF at this point was 15%. The patient was denied heart transplantation due to various cofactors. The investigation concluded with a probable relationship between his cardiomyopathy and the use of methylphenidate (Concerta).Mortality associated with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) drug treatment: a retrospective cohort study of children, adolescents and young adults using the general practice research database.Following reports of sudden death in patients taking medication to treat attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), this study aimed to identify cases of death in patients prescribed stimulants and atomoxetine and to determine any association between these and sudden death.The UK General Practice Research Database (GPRD) was used to identify patients aged 2-21 years from 1 January 1993 to 30 June 2006 with a prescription for methylphenidate, dexamfetamine or atomoxetine. Patients were followed from the date of first prescription until whichever came first: date of death, transferred-out date, age >21 years or end of the study period.From a cohort of 18 637 patient-years, seven patients died. Cause of death was obtained for six of the patients. None were deemed to be cases of sudden death. Compared with a general population rate of sudden death in the literature, the worst-case scenario of one case of sudden death gave an incident rate ratio of 1.63 (95% CI 0.04, 9.71). Although it was not the primary outcome of the study, following reports of suicide in the cohort the standardized mortality ratio (SMR) of suicide was calculated. Due to differences in the definition of suicide used for children and adults, patients were categorized into two age groups: 11-14 years and 15-21 years. The SMR for suicide for patients aged 11-14 years was 161.91 (95% CI 19.61, 584.88). The SMR for suicide for patients aged 15-21 years was 1.84 (95% CI 0.05, 10.25).This study demonstrated no increase in the risk of sudden death associated with stimulants or atomoxetine. However, an increased risk of suicide was seen. Although we cannot exclude that the medications may contribute to the increased risk of suicide, there are other factors such as depression and antisocial behaviour that frequently co-exist with ADHD, which can also predispose to teenage suicide. Clinicians should identify patients at increased risk of cardiovascular events and identify those patients at increased risk of suicide, particularly males with co-morbid conditions, and monitor them appropriately.Restoration of disturbed intracortical motor inhibition and facilitation in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder children by methylphenidate.Previous investigations using transcranial magnetic stimulation (TMS) have shown that neural inhibitory motor circuits are disturbed in ADHD children. We sought to investigate the influence of methylphenidate (MPH) on inhibitory and facilitatory motor circuits of ADHD children with TMS paired pulse protocols using surplus long interval inter-stimulus intervals (ISI) not investigated so far.Motorcortical modulation was tested with TMS paired pulse protocols employing ISI of 3, 13, 50, 100, 200, and 300 msec in 18 ADHD children before and on treatment with MPH. Clinical improvement by MPH was measured by the Conners score.Analysis of variance (ANOVA) revealed a significant three-way interaction "Group x Amplitude x ISI," p = .001. Subsequent two-factorial ANOVAs and t-tests showed group specific differences of motor evoked potential (MEP) amplitudes for inhibitory ISIs of 3 and 100 msec, and for facilitatory ISIs of 13 and 50 msec. Compared to controls, an adjustment of these parameters by MPH could be shown. On MPH, a significant bivariate correlation was found between the Conners score reduction and averaged MEP amplitude changes only for inhibitory ISIs (3 and 100 msec).In ADHD children, MPH modulates disturbed facilitatory and inhibitory motor circuits, which for the latter is associated with clinical improvement.The relationship between symptomatic and functional changes of Korean children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder treated with osmotic-controlled release oral delivery system-methylphenidate.This study examined the effect of osmotic-controlled release oral delivery system-methylphenidate (OROS-MPH) on the adaptive functioning of children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and investigated the relationship between reduced ADHD symptoms and improvements in functioning and factors that are predictive of functional improvement.This study was a prospective, multicenter, open-label study of 116 children with ADHD treated with OROS-MPH for 12 weeks. Attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder symptoms, functional impairment, and other comorbid disorders were evaluated using various clinical scales. Correlational and multiple regression analyses were conducted to examine the relationship between symptomatic versus functional changes after OROS-MPH treatment.Correlation analysis showed a moderately strong association between changes in the ADHD core symptoms versus functional measure scores (r = -0.65). The self-control subscale of the Life Participation Scale showed higher correlations with symptomatic measures than did the happy/social subscale. Functional outcomes were impacted by several factors including the baseline severity of ADHD symptoms, changes in ADHD, and oppositional defiant symptoms after treatment. Attention was more associated with functional outcomes than hyperactivity/impulsivity.Treatment with OROS-MPH was associated with symptomatic functional changes that were moderately correlated; therefore, symptomatic functional outcomes appear to be partially overlapped but distinct domains. Consequently, functional measures should be incorporated as important outcome measures in future treatment studies; the importance of treatments targeting functional improvement should be emphasized in the treatment of children with ADHD.Methylphenidate and idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura--is there an association?A double-blind, placebo-controlled withdrawal trial of dexmethylphenidate hydrochloride in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.d,l-threo-methylphenidate HCl (D,L-MPH) is the most common treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). A previous report showed placebo-controlled efficacy for the purified d-isomer (dexmethylphenidate hydrochloride, d-MPH, Focalin) with a 2:1 potency compared to dl, and suggested a 6-hour duration of action. This study complements that report by studying the effect of placebo-controlled discontinuation and retesting the duration of action.A 6-week, open-label titration of d-MPH (2.5-10 mg twice-a-day) was followed by a double-blind, placebo-controlled, 2-week withdrawal study of responders.In the open titration, 82% of the 89 enrolled patients achieved a Clinical Global Impression-Improvement (CGI-I) rating of much or very much improved. Only 5 patients discontinued for adverse events. Seventy-five patients continued into the placebo-controlled discontinuation. For the randomly assigned d-MPH (n=35) and placebo (n=40) groups, mean ages, respectively, were 10.1 +/- 2.9 and 9.9 +/- 2.7 years, 86% and 78% were male, and 70.6% and 80.0% took the ceiling dose of 10 mg twice-daily, respectively. Each group had 80% combined type ADHD and 20% inattentive type. By the end of the 2-week, placebo-masked withdrawal, significantly more placebo patients (24 of 39) than d-MPH continuers (6 of 35) relapsed (61.5% versus 17.1%, p=0.001). Compared to d-MPH continuers, placebo patients deteriorated significantly more in the 2-week period on teacher ratings of the 18 ADHD symptoms rated 0-3 (p=0.028), the 3 p.m. and 6 p.m. parent ADHD symptom ratings (p=0.0026 and p=0.0381, respectively), and clinic (2-3 p.m.) and home (6 p.m.) Math Tests (p=0.024 and p<0.0001, respectively). The 6 p.m. scores replicated the significant effect at 6 hours reported in the previous study.d-MPH is safe, tolerable, and effective, with a 6-hour duration of effect suggested by the significant difference from placebo at 6 hours on a double-blind discontinuation.Methylphenidate normalises activation and functional connectivity deficits in attention and motivation networks in medication-naïve children with ADHD during a rewarded continuous performance task.Children with Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD) have deficits in motivation and attention that can be ameliorated with the indirect dopamine agonist Methylphenidate (MPH). We used functional magnetic resonance imaging (fMRI) to investigate the effects of MPH in medication-naïve children with ADHD on the activation and functional connectivity of "cool" attentional as well as "hot" motivation networks.13 medication-naïve children with ADHD were scanned twice, under either an acute clinical dose of MPH or Placebo, in a randomised, double-blind design, while they performed a rewarded continuous performance task that measured vigilant selective attention and the effects of reward. Brain activation and functional connectivity was compared to that of 13 healthy age-matched controls to test for normalisation effects of MPH.MPH normalised performance deficits that were observed in children with ADHD compared to controls. Under placebo, children with ADHD showed reduced activation and functional inter-connectivity in bilateral fronto-striato-parieto-cerebellar networks during the attention condition, but enhanced activation in the orbitofrontal and superior temporal cortices for reward. MPH within children with ADHD enhanced the activation of fronto-striato-cerebellar and parieto-temporal regions. Compared to controls, MPH normalised differences during vigilant attention in parieto-temporal activation and fronto-striatal and fronto-cerebellar connectivity; MPH also normalised the enhanced orbitofrontal activation in children with ADHD in response to reward.MPH normalised attention differences between children with ADHD and controls by both up-regulation of dysfunctional fronto-striato-thalamo-cerebellar and parieto-temporal attention networks and down-regulation of hyper-sensitive orbitofrontal activation for reward processing. MPH thus shows context-dependent dissociative modulation of both motivational and attentional neuro-functional networks in children with ADHD.Double-blind versus open evaluations of stimulant drug response in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder.Although placebo controls and double-blind conditions are considered to be essential for the unbiased scientific assessment of drug effects, there is very little research on these procedures in the pediatric psychopharmacology literature. To examine the impact of controlled assessment procedures on the magnitude of observed drug effects, two groups of children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) were evaluated for response to methylphenidate under two different assessment procedures. One group (n = 33) was part of a placebo-controlled, double-blind crossover research protocol, with randomized dose sequences, compliance checks, numerous dependent measures, written informed consent, and a considerable amount of staff involvement. The other group (n = 43) received pharmacotherapy at a community-based child psychiatry outpatient service where they were followed in a routine clinical manner, with "no treatment" as the only control condition, standard fixed-dose titration, parental responsibility for data collection, use of form letters, and minimal staff involvement. Each individual in both groups received divided doses of 0.3 and 0.5/0.6 mg/kg daily for a minimum of 1 week at each dose. Comparisons of teacher ratings obtained for the two assessment procedures revealed highly similar findings. The results of this study are discussed with regard to both their methodological and clinical implications.Methylphenidate improves reading performance in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder and comorbid dyslexia: an unblinded clinical trial.Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD) and dyslexia are frequently co-occurring disorders. Although methylphenidate (MPH) is the primary treatment for ADHD, the effect on reading in children with these comorbid problems is not yet known. This study was an unblinded clinical trial to evaluate the reading performance before and after treatment with MPH. Reading performance was compared with General Linear Model repeated measures between three groups: (1) an experimental group of children with both ADHD and dyslexia (N = 24), (2) a control group of children with ADHD (N = 9) and (3) a control group of children with dyslexia (N = 10). MPH improved reading performance significantly stronger in the experimental group than in the control groups; the number of correctly read words increased to a larger extent. In conclusion, MPH proved to be an aid in the reading process of children with ADHD and comorbid dyslexia by improving the learning conditions, but MPH cannot cure the reading disorder. Future research should study the effect of MPH on reading in a double-blind clinical trial.Methylphenidate improves response inhibition but not reflection-impulsivity in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Impulsivity is a cardinal feature of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), which is thought to underlie many of the cognitive and behavioural symptoms associated with the disorder. Impairments on some measures of impulsivity have been shown to be responsive to pharmacotherapy. However, impulsivity is a multi-factorial construct and the degree to which different forms of impulsivity contribute to impairments in ADHD or respond to pharmacological treatments remains unclear.The aims of the study were to assess the effects of methylphenidate (MPH) on the performance of children with ADHD on measures of reflection-impulsivity and response inhibition and to compare with the performance of healthy volunteers.Twenty-one boys (aged 7-13 years) diagnosed with ADHD underwent a double-blind, placebo-controlled trial of MPH (0.5 mg/kg) during which they performed the Information Sampling Task (IST) and the Stop Signal Task. A healthy age- and education-matched control group was tested on the same measures without medication.Children with ADHD were impaired on measures of response inhibition, but did not demonstrate reflection-impulsivity on the IST. However, despite sampling a similar amount of information as their peers, the ADHD group made more poor decisions. MPH improved performance on measures of response inhibition and variability of response, but did not affect measures of reflection-impulsivity or quality of decision-making.MPH differentially affected two forms of impulsivity in children with ADHD and failed to ameliorate their poor decision-making on the information sampling test.Risperidone-to-methylphenidate switch reaction in children: three cases.As atypical antipsychotics are increasingly used in the treatment of childhood behavioural disorders either as monotherapy or in combination with other medications, there is a need to know more about their safety, in particular during switching to and from methylphenidate treatment, as antipsychotics and methylphenidate have opposing effects on dopaminergic neurotransmission. This report is about three cases of children who developed severe adverse reactions during switching from risperidone to methylphenidate. The first patient was a 6-year-old boy, diagnosed with attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and oppositional defiant disorder (ODD). He developed severe hyperactivity and agitation on taking methylphenidate after the discontinuation of risperidone treatment. The second patient was a girl of 6, already on risperidone for ADHD and borderline intellectual functioning when referred. She displayed severe hyperactivity, agitation and irritability upon switching to methylphenidate medication. The third patient was a 15-year-old female adolescent with a similar clinical course as the previous patients. In all the cases described here, it is only with the discontinuation of methylphenidate that the adverse reactions resolved and readministration of methylphenidate in two patients did not produce any adverse effect after a drug-free interval. Functional regulation of certain neuroreceptors during risperidone treatment may lead to altered behavioural responses upon switching to methylphenidate. Thus, a drug-free interval is recommended in order to prevent adverse reactions.The beneficial effect of methylphenidate in ADHD with comorbid separation anxiety.The objective of this study was to assess the response of subsyndromal separation anxiety (SSSA) symptoms to methylphenidate (MPH) treatment in patients with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). A group of patients with ADHD and SSSA (n=42), aged 8-17 years, received 12 weeks of MPH treatment. The severity of SSSA symptoms was assessed using appropriate scales including the Screen for Child Anxiety Related Emotional Disorders and the specially designed Child and Adolescent Separation Anxiety Scale (CASAS). The severity of ADHD symptoms was assessed using the ADHD Rating Scale. The severity of ADHD and separation anxiety reduced significantly and significant positive correlations were found between the changes in ADHD Rating Scale and the total CASAS scores (P=0.012), as well as other relevant subscales of Screen for Child Anxiety Related Emotional Disorders and CASAS. The MPH-related attenuation in the severity of ADHD was associated with a corresponding improvement in separation anxiety related to school. SSSA symptomatology may be secondary to ADHD and thus the alleviation in ADHD symptoms achieved by MPH treatment results in corresponding relief in separation anxiety. Can we predict short-term side effects of methylphenidate immediate-release?Objective. In children and adolescents who were prescribed immediate-release methylphenidate (MPH-IR) for the first time, we aimed to investigate the effect of gender, psychiatric co-morbidity and the baseline severity of clinical symptoms on the short-term side-effects of the medication. Method. In a clinical sample, over a period of 6 months, all MPH-naive patients with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) (N=90; male, n=73; female, n=17) age: 9.0±2.2 years (5-16 years)) were included. Patients were prescribed MPH-IR 10-30 mg/day (17.6±4.95). The assessment included structured measurements, including the Turgay Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th edition (DSM-IV)-Based Child and Adolescent Behavior Disorders Screening and Rating Scale (T-DSM-IV-S) (parents and teachers), Conners' Teacher Rating Scale for ADHD-Short version (teachers). Parents also completed the "Barkley Stimulants' Side Effects Rating Scale" (BSSERS) at baseline and on the third, seventh and 15th days of medication. Results. Repeated measures multiple ANOVA revealed an overall significant difference in BSSERS between the baseline measures and the 15th day (P<0.01). On the 15th day, only the "loss of appetite" item severity scores increased (P=0.001), whereas the scores of "irritability", "proneness to cry", "anxiety", "nail biting" and "euphoria" items decreased significantly. In post hoc analyses, when subjects whose side effects increased and did not increase were compared, chi-square tests revealed a significant difference (P=0.029) only for the presence of co-morbidity, and no difference for the gender, age, dosage of MPH, and the baseline severity of inattentiveness and/or hyperactivity. Discussion. The only significant increase during MPH treatment was for the "loss of appetite" item on BSSERS. Our results suggest that some of the BSSERS items may represent both the ADHD symptoms and the side effects. When overall BSSERS item severity is considered, having a co-morbid diagnosis may be predictive of more severe adverse effects. Effect of methylphenidate treatment on appetite and levels of leptin, ghrelin, adiponectin, and brain-derived neurotrophic factor in children and adolescents with attention deficit and hyperactivity disorder.We aimed to explore whether the use of methylphenidate relates leptin, ghrelin, adiponectin, and brain-derived neurotrophic factor (BDNF). In addition, the relationship between methylphenidate-related weight loss in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) patients and these biomolecules were evaluated.Thirty ADHD patients receiving methylphenidate and 20 healthy controls were included. Leptin, ghrelin, adiponectin, and BDNF levels were measured at baseline and after two-month treatment in both groups.At baseline, leptin, ghrelin, adiponectin, and BDNF levels were similar in the ADHD and control groups. The most common adverse events occurring in the ADHD group after a 2-month treatment period included loss of appetite (70%) and weight loss (66.7%). A significant difference was found in body weight, BMI, and CGI scores of the ADHD patients after the treatment. While post-treatment ghrelin and adiponectin levels were significantly higher in the ADHD group, BDNF level was significantly lower. Post-treatment decrease in leptin levels was not significant.Leptin and BDNF were not associated with poor appetite and/or weight loss due to methylphenidate treatment. However, ghrelin and adiponectin might be biomolecules that play a role in underlying neurobiological mechanisms of methylphenidate-related appetite or weight loss.Reported paediatric adverse drug reactions in the UK 2000-2009.The UK Medicines and Healthcare products Regulatory Agency (MHRA) runs a national spontaneous reporting system (Yellow Card Scheme) to collect 'suspected' adverse drug reaction (ADR) data. MHRA advice is to report all suspected ADRs in paediatric (<17 years) patients.Data on all ADRs reported to the MHRA in patients <17 years from the years 2000-9 were supplied in two datasets, inclusive and exclusive of vaccines.Of 222 755 ADR reports received by the MHRA from 2000-9, 31726 (14.2%) were in children <17 years. The number of reports in 2000 was greater than in subsequent years (12035) due to a national vaccination programme (Meningococcal Serogroup C conjugate vaccine). The median number of ADR reports per annum (2001-2009) for children was 2146 (95% CI 1801, 2575). Vaccines were included in 22102 (66.5%) paediatric ADR reports, with Meningococcal Serogroup C conjugate vaccine reported most frequently (12106 reports) and headache the commonest symptom (3163). Excluding vaccines, methylphenidate (653 reports) and atomoxetine (491) were the most commonly reported medications, and the most commonly reported symptom was vomiting (374). Reporting by nurses increased from 396 in 2001 to 1295 in 2009 (41.8% of all reports); reporting by doctors stayed constant. Reports from patients, parents or carers more than doubled but remained infrequent (1.5% in 2005, 4.0% in 2009).Although under-reporting is probably common, the Yellow Card Scheme in the UK receives more than 2000 reports per year on patients <17 years. Nurses now report more suspected ADRs in children than any other healthcare professional.Children with ADHD and tic disorder and their classmates: behavioral normalization with methylphenidate.To examine behavioral differences between children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and tics and their peers and the extent to which methylphenidate (0.1, 0.3, and 0.5 mg/kg) normalized the behavior of probands and indirectly influenced the behavior of peers (treatment spillover).Thirty-four prepubertal children with ADHD and chronic tic disorder (who were participating in a double-blind, placebo-controlled methylphenidate evaluation) and their peers were observed for approximately 20 hours in the school setting (classroom seatwork activities, lunchroom, and playground).Children with ADHD and tics were more inattentive and more disruptive in the classroom and more aggressive in all school settings than their peers. Although treatment with methylphenidate made probands less easily distinguished from their peers (normalization), many children still scored in the deviant range for at least one ADHD behavior when receiving the 0.5-mg/kg dose. There was little evidence that peer behavior improved as a function of the proband's dose of medication.Although conventional doses of methylphenidate produced dramatic clinical improvement in ADHD-related behavior, complete behavioral normalization is often not attained.Acute neuropsychological effects of methylphenidate in stimulant drug-naïve boys with ADHD II--broader executive and non-executive domains.Accumulating evidence supports methylphenidate-induced enhancement of neuropsychological functioning in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). The present study was designed to investigate the acute effects of the psychostimulant drug, methylphenidate (MPH), on neuropsychological performance in stimulant naïve boys with ADHD.Seventy-three drug-naïve boys (age 7-15) with ADHD (combined type) completed neuropsychological tasks from the CANTAB battery under randomised, placebo controlled, double-blind conditions following an acute challenge with either placebo (n = 24), .3 (n = 25) or .6 (n = 24) mg/kg oral MPH.MPH did not impair performance on any task. MPH (.6 mg/kg) lengthened response latencies on a task of Spatial Recognition, shortened response times on a Reaction Time task and restored performance on a Delayed Matching to Sample visual, non-working memory task. Contrary to predictions, MPH did not enhance performance on tasks with a prominent executive component, including Go/NoGo, Spatial Working Memory, Stockings of Cambridge and Attentional Set shifting tasks.Acute administration of MPH to drug-naïve boys with ADHD did not impair neuropsychological performance. Acute MPH enhanced performance on some aspects of non-executive functioning. MPH-induced slowing of responding on a relatively complex Spatial Recognition memory task and quickened responding on a reaction time task requiring less cognitive resources suggests that MPH may act by improving self-regulatory ability. MPH may not exert its effects on neuropsychological functioning by enhancing executive processes.Nortriptyline for treating enuresis in ADHD--a randomized double-blind controlled clinical trial.Treating enuresis in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) has not been previously reported. This study aims to investigate the efficacy, tolerability, and adverse effects of nortriptyline for treating enuresis in children with ADHD.Forty-three children aged from 5 to 14 years old were randomized into two groups. The treatment group received methylphenidate plus nortriptyline, while the placebo group received methylphenidate plus placebo. Nortriptyline and placebo were administered for 30 days and methylphenidate was administered for 45 days. The major outcome measure was parent-reported frequency of enuresis for 2 weeks prior to the intervention, during the intervention, and for 2 weeks after stopping the adjuvant therapy. Adverse effects were also checked.While nortriptyline statistically decreased the incidence of nocturnal enuresis during the intervention, the number of enuresis events did not significantly change in the placebo group. In addition, enuresis was not different from the baseline frequency of enuresis after stopping nortriptyline or placebo administration. Both nortriptyline and placebo were tolerated well.Administration of nortriptyline for treating enuresis in ADHD has not been investigated before. Nortriptyline is statistically superior to placebo. However, enuresis will relapse after stopping nortriptyline in children with ADHD who continue taking methylphenidate.Acute dyskinesia on starting methylphenidate after risperidone withdrawal.We report on acute and transient dyskinesia occurring within hours of taking modified-release methylphenidate (Concerta XL) in a stimulant-naïve 7-year-old boy who had recently stopped taking risperidone. We propose that the mechanism of this adverse drug reaction is likely to be an interaction between supersensitive dopamine receptors and acute exposure to an indirect dopamine agonist. Clinicians need to be aware of this potential side effect, and to use the combination of psychostimulants and neuroleptic drugs with caution.Sleep disturbances and ADHD medications.An observational study of response heterogeneity in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder following treatment switch to modified-release methylphenidate.Methylphenidate (MPH) has been shown to be effective in the treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in children. The overall population of children and adolescents with ADHD may comprise distinct clusters of patients that differ in response to MPH. The aim of this analysis was to look for subgroups with different treatment trajectories and to identify their distinctive features.OBSEER was a prospective, observational study examining the effectiveness and safety of once-daily modified-release MPH over 3 months in patients (aged 6-17 years) with ADHD under routine care. Assessments were carried out at baseline (Visit 1), after 1-3 weeks (Visit 2) and 6-12 weeks (Visit 3) after first use of once-daily modified-release MPH. Change in ADHD symptoms, as rated by parents and teachers, was examined post hoc in patients of the intent-to-treat-population (N = 822), using growth-mixture modelling to detect response trajectory groups after switching medication. Age, MPH dose at Visit 1 before medication switch, prescribed once-daily modified-release MPH dose at Visits 1 and 2, conduct problems and emotional symptoms were considered predictors of response subgroups.Assessing formal statistical criteria and usefulness of the models, a 4-class solution best fitted the data: after switching medication two response groups with severe symptoms at study start and subsequent substantial treatment effects, and two showing no or comparatively little treatment effect, one of which had severe and the other less severe symptoms at study start. Patient age, conduct problems and MPH dose at Visit 1 were predictors of inclusion in subgroups.Older children and children with few conduct problems were more likely to be members of a patient cluster with fewer symptoms at study start. Children with a low MPH dose before medication switch had a higher chance of being in the patient cluster with a strong treatment response after switching medication. The current analyses should assist in identifying children likely to achieve a favourable treatment course with MPH and, additionally, those who are in need of alternative treatment options.Misinterpreting emotional expressions in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder: evidence for a neural marker and stimulant effects.In addition to cognitive impairment, there are disruptions to mood and emotion processing in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) but little is known about their neural basis. We examined ADHD disturbances in mood and emotion recognition and underlying neural systems before and after treatment with stimulant medication.Participants were 51 unmedicated ADHD adolescents and 51 matched healthy control subjects rated for depressed and anxious mood and accuracy for identifying facial expressions of basic emotion. Brain function was recorded using event-related potentials (ERPs) while subjects viewed these expressions. ADHD subjects were retested after 4 weeks, following treatment with methylphenidate (MPH).ADHD subjects showed a profile of emotion-related impairment: higher depression and anxiety, deficits in identifying threat-related emotional expressions in particular, and alterations in ERPs. There was a pronounced reduction in occipital activity during the early perceptual analysis of emotional expression (within 120 msec), followed by an exaggeration of activity associated with structural encoding (120-220 msec) and subsequent reduction and slowing of temporal brain activity subserving context processing (300-400 msec). Methylphenidate normalized neural activity and produced some improvement of emotion recognition but had no impact on negative mood. Improvements in neural activity with MPH were consistent predictors of improvement in clinical features of emotional lability and hyperactivity.Objective behavioral and brain function measures of emotion processing may provide a valuable addition to the clinical armamentarium for assessing emotional disturbances in ADHD and the efficacy of stimulants for treating these disturbances.Adverse reactions of Methylphenidate in children with attention deficit-hyperactivity disorder: Report from a referral center.The aim of the current study was to determine various aspects of methylphenidate adverse reactions in children with attention deficit-hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in Iran.During the 6 months period, all children under methylphenidate treatment alone or along with other agents attending a university-affiliated psychology clinic were screened regarding all subjective and objective adverse drug reactions (ADRs) of methylphenidate. Causality and seriousness of detected ADRs were assessed by relevant World Health Organization definitions. The Schumock and Thornton questionnaire was used to determine preventability of ADRs.Seventy-one patients including 25 girls and 46 boys with ADHD under methylphenidate treatment were enrolled within the study period. All (100%) ADHD children under methylphenidate treatment developed at least one ADR. Anorexia (74.3%), irritability (57.1%), and insomnia (47.2%) were the most frequent methylphenidate-related adverse reactions. Except for one, all other detected ADRs were determined to be mild. In addition, no ADR was considered to be preventable and serious.Our data suggested that although methylphenidate related adverse reactions were common in children with ADHD, but they were mainly mild and nonserious.Excessive talking triggered by methylphenidate in a boy with ADHD.The open-label treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder in 4- and 5-year-old children with beaded methylphenidate.The aim of this study was to assess the effectiveness and tolerability of a long-acting methylphenidate (MPH) formulation, beaded MPH (B-MPH), for treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in 4- and 5-year-old children.Eleven children (9 boys and 2 girls) with ADHD received 4 weeks of B-MPH treatment in a single-site, open-label pilot study. Medication dosing was flexible, with titration to a maximum of 30 mg/day. A brief education session on behavior management was offered to parents at each treatment visit.Subjects experienced a mean decrease of 1.09 (standard deviation [SD]=0.73, p<0.01) on the Swanson, Nolan, and Pelham Questionnaire (SNAP-IV) ADHD composite score to an end point of 1.18 (SD=0.64). Subjects demonstrated mean decreases in scores of inattention of 1.01 (SD=0.85, p<0.01) and in hyperactivity/impulsivity of 1.17 (SD=0.74, p<0.01), with end point scores of 1.10 (SD=0.61) and 1.26 (SD=0.77), respectively. The Clinical Global Impressions-Severity (CGI-S) scale showed a statistically significant improvement from a baseline mean of 5 to the final visit mean of 3.36 (p<0.01). At the final visit, the mean daily B-MPH dose was 17.73 mg. Subjects did not experience any statistically significant changes in weight, blood pressure, or pulse during the study. The most common adverse event was decreased appetite.B-MPH was safe and effective for the treatment of ADHD in the 4- and 5-year-olds participating in this study.Methylphenidate treatment in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder and comorbid social phobia.The aim of this study was to assess the response of social phobia (SP) symptoms to methylphenidate (MPH) treatment in children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). Twenty-one ADHD patients with SP, aged between 8 and 18 years, received 12 weeks of MPH treatment. The severity of SP symptoms were assessed by the Liebowitz Social Anxiety Scale for Children and Adolescents (LSAS-CA), and the severity of ADHD symptoms was assessed by the ADHD Rating Scale at baseline and at endpoint. MPH treatment was associated with a significant decrease in the ADHD Rating Scale scores (P<0.0001) and in the total LSAS-CA scores (P=0.013), as well as the school-related items of LSAS-CA (P=0.011). A significant correlation was found between the reductions in ADHD score and total LSAS-CA score (P=0.038), especially in school-related SP. The improvement in ADHD symptoms because of MPH treatment correlates with a parallel improvement in SP. MPH treatment appears to be safe and effective in ADHD/SP children. Remission in children and adolescents diagnosed with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder via an effective and tolerable titration scheme for osmotic release oral system methylphenidate.The purpose of this study was to identify the optimal dose of osmotic release oral system methylphenidate (OROS-MPH) using a dosage forced-titration scheme to achieve symptomatic remission in children with attention- deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). We also evaluated the efficacy and safety of, and patient and parent satisfaction with, the change in therapy from immediate-release methylphenidate (IR-MPH) to OROS-MPH over 10 weeks.We recruited 521 children and adolescents aged 6-18 years with an American Psychiatric Association, Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th ed. (DSM-IV) diagnosis of ADHD, who had received IR-MPH treatments (<70 mg/day) for at least 1 month. The treatment, switched from IR-MPH to OROS-MPH according to a conversion scheme, started with a 6-week forced-titration phase of OROS-MPH to achieve symptomatic remission (defined as a score of 0 or 1 for each of the first 18 ADHD items in the Chinese version of the Swanson, Nolan, and Pelham, Version IV [SNAP-IV]), followed by a 4-week maintenance phase. The global ADHD severity and drug side effects of the participants were evaluated. Parents completed the ratings scales for the ADHD-related symptoms. Patient and parent satisfaction for the OROS-MPH treatment was also assessed.Among the 439 participants with ADHD who completed the trial, 290 participants (66.1%) achieved symptomatic remission. The mean dose of OROS-MPH among participants in remission was 36.7 mg (1.08 mg/kg) per day. Increased efficacy, superior satisfaction, and safety equivalent to that of IR-MPH were demonstrated in intra-individual comparisons from the baseline to the end of study. Determinants for remission included less severe ADHD symptoms (SNAP-IV score < 40), no family history of ADHD, and an appropriate dosage of medication according to the patient's weight.The findings suggest remission as a treatment goal for ADHD therapy by providing an optimal dosage of medication for children and adolescents with ADHD through using an effective and tolerable forced-titration scheme.Using n-of-1 trials as a clinical tool to improve prescribing.N-of-1 trials are within-patient, randomised, double-blind, placebo-controlled cross-over comparisons of two drugs for chronic illnesses. We have investigated the use of these, offered to doctors as individualised medication effectiveness tests (IMETs), as a tool to improve drug prescribing.To examine patient perspectives and experiences of n-of-1 trials.We provided n-of-1 trials for osteoarthritis (OA), comparing paracetamol and ibuprofen; and attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), comparing dexamphetamine or methylphenidate and placebo. Patients or their carers were surveyed before and after the trials by questionnaire, and after the trial by semistructured interview with thematic analysis.Australian community-based patients and practitioners.Forty-two patients with OA and 21 carers of patients with ADHD, for whom the effectiveness of proposed or existing medication was uncertain, completed the questionnaires, and 25 patients/carers (11 with OA and 14 with ADHD) participated in semi-structured interviews.Patients in this purposive sample were generally very satisfied with the n-of-1 trial process. Their participation led to increased knowledge, awareness and understanding of their condition, their bodies' response to it, and its management. Some of this arose specifically from use of daily symptom diaries. This led to a sense of empowerment and control as well as improved individually-focused care.N-of-1 trials appeared to empower these patients as a result of both collecting information about their responses to different treatment options, and participating actively in subsequent therapeutic decisions. They are a patient-centred intervention that may improve medication management in suitable chronic diseases.Effects of stimulant medication on cognitive performance of children with ADHD.The effect that treatment with stimulant medication has on the intellectual performance of children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) was examined. Thirty-one children diagnosed with ADHD were given a WISC-III before any treatment was implemented. At least 1 year later, children were retested. At this time, 24 of the children were taking stimulant medications. Children receiving medications had significant increases in IQ scores, but no changes were found for those not taking medications. Changes in IQ scores were moderately related to parents' perceived efficacy of the medication and parent-reported compliance with medication but were not strongly related to changes in parent-reported ADHD symptoms.Autonomic correlates at rest and during evoked attention in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder and effects of methylphenidate.The aim of this study was to assess autonomic nervous system functioning in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and to examine the effects of methylphenidate and focussed attention.Children with ADHD (n = 19) were tested while they were stimulant free and during a period in which they were on stimulants. On both occasions, autonomic nervous system functioning was tested at baseline and during focussed attention. Autonomic nervous system functioning of control subjects was also tested at baseline and during focussed attention. Autonomic nervous system activity was determined by means of heart rate variability (HRV) and skin conductivity analyses. Attention was evoked by means of the BioGraph Infiniti biofeedback apparatus. HRV was determined by time domain, frequency domain and Poincaré analysis of RR interval data. Skin conductivity was determined by the BioGraph Infiniti biofeedback apparatus.The main findings of this study were (a) that stimulant-free children with ADHD showed a sympathetic underarousal and parasympathetic overarousal of the sympathovagal balance relative to control subjects; (b) methylphenidate shifted the autonomic balance of children with ADHD towards normal levels; however, a normal autonomic balance was not reached, and (c) stimulant-free children with ADHD exhibited a shift in the sympathovagal balance towards the sympathetic nervous system from baseline to focussed attention; however, methylphenidate appeared to abolish this shift.Stimulant-free children with ADHD have a parasympathetic dominance of the autonomic balance, relative to control subjects. Methylphenidate attempts to restore the normal autonomic balance in children with ADHD, but inhibits the normal autonomic nervous system response to a cognitive challenge.These results indicate that methylphenidate may have a suppressive effect on the normal stress response. Although this may be of benefit to those who interact with children who suffer from ADHD, the implications for the physiological and psychological well-being of the children themselves are debatable. Further research is needed.Only 19 children with ADHD and 18 control subjects were tested. Further studies should include prior testing in order to exclude children with possible co-existing learning disabilities. Cognitive function and emotional responses of children with ADHD were not tested.School observations of children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder and comorbid tic disorder: effects of methylphenidate treatment.Although the findings from recent controlled studies suggest that methylphenidate is a safe and effective treatment for many children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and comorbid tic disorder, relatively little is known about drug effects on school behavior. Thirty-four prepubertal children with ADHD and tic disorder received placebo and 3 doses of methylphenidate (0.1, 0.3, and 0.5 mg/kg) twice daily for 2 weeks each under double-blind conditions. Treatment effects were assessed using direct observations of child behavior in classroom, lunchroom, and playground settings. Treatment with methylphenidate resulted in marked reductions of hyperactive, disruptive, and aggressive behavior, which was evident even for the 0.1 mg/kg dose. There were no "nonresponders." The only observed changes in tics were a small but statistically significant increase in the frequency of motor tics (classroom, 0.1 mg/kg dose) and a tendency for fewer vocal tics (lunchroom). However, these changes in motor tic frequency were not perceived by care providers as a worsening in the severity of the child's tic disorder. Most dose-response relationships were linear, but the mean (operationally defined) minimal effective dose (MED) was 0.3 mg/kg. In summary, the findings support the conclusions that (1) methylphenidate suppresses ADHD behaviors in the classroom and aggressive behavior in all settings and that (2) a low dose may have a weak exacerbation effect on the frequency of motor tics; but, in general, the majority of youngsters do not experience clinically significant tic worsening with a MED.Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, creativity, and the effects of methylphenidate.Given that children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) are more impulsive than peers, this study explored whether they are correspondingly more creative, and whether creativity declines when impulsivity is decreased through methylphenidate (Ritalin) therapy. A repeated-measures quasi-experimental design was used to compare the performance of 19 boys with previously diagnosed ADHD and 21 comparison boys aged 8 through 11 on two administrations of alternate forms of the Torrance Tests of Creative Thinking-Figural (nonverbal). Boys with ADHD received prescribed methylphenidate only for the first session. Overall, mean Torrance summary scores for comparison boys (mean = 115.1, SD = 16.1) were higher than for boys with ADHD (mean = 107.6, SD = 12.7). However, the difference between means was small (7%) and did not meet the 25% criterion for a clinically significant difference. No changes in performance over time (comparison group) or medication state (ADHD group) were observed. These data suggest that, when measured nonverbally, the creative thinking performance of boys with ADHD is not superior to that of peers who do not have ADHD. Regarding the effects of methylphenidate, prescribed therapy did not influence performance on this measure of creative thinking.Effects of methylphenidate on olfaction and frontal and temporal brain oxygenation in children with ADHD.Olfaction and attention-deficit-/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) are mediated by dopamine metabolism and fronto-temporal functioning converging in recent findings of increased olfactory sensitivity in children with ADHD modulated by methylphenidate (MPH) and altered frontal and temporal oxygenation in adults with ADHD.We investigated olfactory sensitivity, discrimination, and identification (Sniffin' Sticks) in 27 children and adolescents with ADHD under chronic MPH medication and after a wash-out period of at least 14 half-lives in balanced order and 22 controls comparable for handedness, age, and intelligence. In addition, inferior frontal and temporal oxygenation was measured by means of functional near-infrared spectroscopy (fNIRS) during the presentation of 2-phenylethanol. Group differences in regard to sex distribution were statistically controlled for by analysis of covariance.Patients did not differ from controls in any olfactory domain under treatment with MPH. Cessation of medication led to a significant increase in olfactory discrimination. Controls displayed typical inferior frontal and temporal brain activity in response to passive olfactory stimulation, while brain oxygenation was diminished in the patient group when assessed without medication. Under medication ADHD patients showed a trend for a normalisation of brain activity in the temporal cortex.The here reported effects of MPH cessation on olfactory discrimination and frontal and temporal oxygenation along with previous findings of increased olfactory sensitivity in medication-naïve ADHD children and its normalisation under chronic MPH treatment lead to the conclusion that MPH exerts differential chronic effects vs. acute cessation effects on altered olfactory function in ADHD. These effects are most probably mediated by modulation of the dopaminergic system.Rate-dependency and hyperactivity: methylphenidate effects on operant responding.The two most common treatment for hyperactivity are psychopharmacological regimens and behavior therapy. Although the concurrent use of stimulant medication has been purported to enhance a child's rate of responding under a behavior management program, studies examining the interaction of the two treatments have been unable to confirm this hypothesis. The present investigation sought to examine the effects of differing levels of methylphenidate hydrochloride (Ritalin) upon operant responding with hyperactive children. After an initial drug-free training period, 10 first through fourth grade hyperactive males performed an operant key-pressing task under a mult VR 5 FI 30 sec reinforcement schedule across four randomly determined, double-blind drug conditions (placebo, 5, 10, 15 mg). Only VR responding changed significantly during medication conditions; however, rate-dependent psychostimulant effects were found within both reinforcement schedules. Discrepancies with animal rate-dependency and implications for treatment and future research are discussed. Medication effects on operant responding appear to depend upon the reinforcement schedule and dose employed.Response to methylphenidate by adult and pediatric patients with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder: the Spanish multicenter DIHANA study.The purpose of this multicenter Spanish study was to evaluate the response to immediate-release methylphenidate by children and adults diagnosed with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), as well as to obtain information on current therapy patterns and safety characteristics.This multicenter, observational, retrospective, noninterventional study included 730 patients aged 4-65 years with a diagnosis of ADHD. Information was obtained based on a review of medical records for the years 2002-2006 in sequential order.The ADHD predominantly inattentive subtype affected 29.7% of patients, ADHD predominantly hyperactive-impulsive was found in 5.2%, and the combined subtype in 65.1%. Overall, a significant lower Clinical Global Impression (CGI) score and mean number of DSM-IV TR (Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders Fourth Edition, Text Revision) symptoms by subtype were found after one year of treatment with immediate-release methylphenidate; CGI decreased from 4.51 to 1.69, symptoms of inattention from 7.90 to 4.34, symptoms of hyperactivity from 6.73 to 3.39, and combined subtype symptoms from 14.62 to 7.7. Satisfaction with immediate-release methylphenidate after one year was evaluated as "very satisfied" or "satisfied" by 86.90% of the sample; 25.75% of all patients reported at least one adverse effect. At the end of the study, 41.47% of all the patients treated with immediate-release methylphenidate were still receiving it, with a mean time of 3.80 years on therapy.Good efficacy and safety results were found for immediate-release methylphenidate in patients with ADHD.Methylphenidate side effect profile is influenced by genetic variation in the attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder-associated CES1 gene.A naturalistic, prospective study of the influence of genetic variation on dose prescribed, clinical response, and side effects related to stimulant medication in 77 children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) was undertaken. The influence of genetic variation of the CES1 gene coding for carboxylesterase 1A1 (CES1A1), the major enzyme responsible for the first-pass, stereoselective metabolism of methylphenidate, was investigated.Parent- and teacher-rated behavioral questionnaires were collected at baseline when the children were medication naïve, and again at 6 weeks while they were on medication. Medication dose, prescribed at the discretion of the treating clinician, and side effects, were recorded at week 6. Blood and saliva samples were collected for genotyping. Single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) were selected in the coding, non-coding and the 3' flanking region of the CES1 gene. Genetic association between CES1 variants and ADHD was investigated in an expanded sample of 265 Irish ADHD families. Analyses were conducted using analysis of covariance (ANCOVA) and logistic regression models.None of the CES1 gene variants were associated with the dose of methylphenidate provided or the clinical response recorded at the 6 week time point. An association between two CES1 SNP markers and the occurrence of sadness as a side effect of short-acting methylphenidate was found. The two associated CES1 markers were in linkage disequilibrium and were significantly associated with ADHD in a larger sample of ADHD trios. The associated CES1 markers were also in linkage disequilibrium with two SNP markers of the noradrenaline transporter gene (SLC6A2).This study found an association between two CES1 SNP markers and the occurrence of sadness as a side effect of short-acting methylphenidate. These markers were in linkage disequilibrium together and with two SNP markers of the noradrenaline transporter gene.NWP06, an extended-release oral suspension of methylphenidate, improved attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder symptoms compared with placebo in a laboratory classroom study.The purpose of this study was to determine the efficacy of NWP06, a novel extended-release (ER) liquid formulation of methylphenidate (MPH), compared with placebo in the treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) in children in a laboratory school.A total of 45 subjects ages 6-12 years were enrolled in this dose-optimized, randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled, crossover laboratory school study. Following open-label dose optimization, subjects received 2 weeks of double-blind treatment (1 week of NWP06 and 1 week of placebo). The treatment sequence (NWP06/placebo or placebo/NWP06) was randomly assigned with the last day of each week-long treatment occurring on the laboratory school test day. Efficacy measures included Swanson, Kotkin, Agler, M-Flynn and Pelham (SKAMP) Rating Scale-Combined and Permanent Product Measure of Performance (PERMP) mathematics tests measured at pre-dose and at 0.75, 2, 4, 8, 10, and 12 hours post-dose on each laboratory classroom day. Safety assessments included physical examination, screening electrocardiogram (ECG), vital signs, clinical laboratory tests, adverse event measures, and assessment of suicidality with the Columbia Suicide Severity Rating Scale.NWP06 resulted in significant (p<0.0001) improvements in the SKAMP-Combined score at 4 hours post-dose (mean=7.12) as compared with placebo (mean=19.58) in the completers (n=39). Significant separation from placebo occurred at each time point tested (0.75, 2, 4, 8, 10, 12 hours), with onset of action of NWP06 at 45 minutes post-dose and duration of efficacy extending to 12 hours post-dose. Adverse events (AEs) and changes in vital signs following NWP06 treatment were generally mild and consistent with the known safety profile of MPH. The most common AEs in the open-label phase were decreased appetite (55.6%), upper abdominal pain (42.2%), affect lability (26.7%), initial insomnia (22.2%), insomnia (17.8%), and headache (17.8%).NWP06 treatment effectively reduced symptoms of ADHD in children beginning at 45 minutes and continuing for 12 hours post-dose. NWP06 was well tolerated.ClinicalTrials.gov Identifier: NCT00904670. http://www.clinicaltrials.gov/ct2/show/NCT00904670 .Autonomic hypoactivity in boys with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder and the influence of methylphenidate.This study investigates an overall autonomic hypoactivity reflecting hypoarousal as important aetiological factor in ADHD at baseline during rest and in response towards stimuli. In addition, effects of methylphenidate (MPH) are examined. We further assessed whether this hypoarousal is a stable characteristic or ameliorated by arousing emotional stimuli.Boys with ADHD were examined with (n = 35) or without MPH (n = 45) and compared with healthy boys (n = 22) regarding skin conductance level (SCL) during rest and skin conductance responses (SCRs) as well as valence and arousal ratings in response to positive, neutral, and negative pictures.ADHD children without MPH were characterized by reduced baseline SCL and overall reduced SCRs. ADHD children with MPH never differed from control children. All groups displayed normal valence and arousal ratings of the stimuli and enhanced SCRs to emotional in comparison to neutral pictures.This is the first study to unravel (1) a general autonomic hypoactivity in ADHD children at baseline and in response to low arousing neutral and highly arousing emotional stimuli, and (2) hints that MPH normalizes this hypoactivity. Results contribute to the understanding of ADHD aetiology and MPH functionality, and are consistent with the cognitive-energetic model of ADHD.Comparison of Two brands of Methylphenidate (Stimdate(®) vs. Ritalin(®)) in Children and Adolescents with Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder: A Double-Blind, Randomized Clinical Trial.To compare the effectiveness and safety of the methylphenidate produced in Iran (Stimdate®) with its original brand (Ritalin®) in children with Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).In this double-blinded randomized clinical trial, 30 patients with ADHD who were 6 to 16 years old, were divided into two groups: 15 in Stimdate® and 15 in Ritalin® group. The two groups were compared for side effects profile, Conner's Parent's Rating Scale-Persion version (CPRS-R), Child Symptom Inventory-4 (CSI-4), Clinical Global Impressions (CGI), and Children's Global Assessment Scale (CGAS), at baseline and at the 4(th) and 6(th) weeks.The subjects showed significant decreases in the CPRS-Rand CSI-4 scores and significant increase of CGAS scores during the follow-up, but there were no significant difference between Stimdate® and Ritalin® group, regarding the pattern of changes observed. The mean therapeutic dose and the number of side effects were not significantly different between the two studied groups.Both Stimdate® and Ritalin® had comparable clinical efficacy and safety in children with ADHD.A pilot study of methylphenidate preference assessment in children diagnosed with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.The use of methylphenidate (MPH) in the treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is widely accepted; however, there is increased concern regarding its abuse potential. Few studies have examined the reinforcing effects of drugs in individuals receiving them for clinical purposes. This study attempts to assess MPH preference in children with ADHD using a choice procedure in order to explore the relationship among drug preference, clinical efficacy, and abuse potential.Participants were 5 children (10-14 years of age) receiving MPH for the treatment of ADHD. Reinforcing effects were assessed using a double-blind choice procedure, with six sampling sessions and six choice sessions. Participant-rated effects were measured using self-report questionnaires. Clinical effects were measured using direct observations and behavior ratings.Differences between the number of MPH, Placebo, and Neither choices across participants were significant (chi2 = 9.6; p < 0.01). Three of five participants reliably chose MPH more often than placebo. MPH produced idiosyncratic patterns of participant-rated effects but failed to produce significant clinical effects.These findings add to the literature on the reinforcing effects of MPH and are the first reported in a clinical sample of children. Further research exploring the role of clinical efficacy in MPH preference is warranted.Cardiac safety of methylphenidate versus amphetamine salts in the treatment of ADHD.Safety concerns about central nervous system stimulants for the treatment of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) include adverse cardiac effects. This study aimed to compare the risk for cardiac events in users of methylphenidate and amphetamine salts.A retrospective cohort design using claims data from the Florida Medicaid fee-for-service program representing a total of 2131953 children and adolescents was used. The analysis included all beneficiaries who were between 3 and 20 years of age, enrolled between July 1994 and June 2004, had at least 1 physician diagnosis of ADHD and were newly started on methylphenidate or amphetamine salts. Each month of follow-up was classified according to stimulant use into current use or former use. We defined cardiac events as first emergency department (ED) visit for cardiac disease or symptoms. Risk between current users of methylphenidate versus amphetamine salts and former users of drugs in these categories was compared by using a time-dependent Cox proportional hazard model that adjusted for differences in gender; race; age; year of the index date; disability; congenital anomalies; history of circulatory disease; history of hospital admission; and use of antidepressants, antipsychotics, and bronchodilators.A total of 456 youth visited the ED for cardiac reasons during 52783 years of follow-up. After adjustment for differences in covariates, the risk for cardiac ED visits was similar among current users of methylphenidate or amphetamines. Periods of former use had a similar risk between youth with an exposure history to methylphenidate or amphetamine.Exposure to methylphenidate and amphetamines salts showed similar risk for cardiac ED visits. Additional population-based studies that address manifestation of serious heart disease, especially after long-term use, dosage comparisons, and interactions with preexisting cardiac risk factors are needed to inform psychiatric treatment decisions.The effects of methylphenidate on neural systems of attention in attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.Recent studies have suggested that attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is associated with abnormalities in basal ganglia and prefrontal cortical functioning. However, these studies have primarily relied upon cognitive tasks that reflect impulse control rather than attentional mechanisms.The authors used functional magnetic resonance imaging to investigate the neural correlates of selective and divided attention in a randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled pharmacological challenge with methylphenidate in 15 adolescents with ADHD (ages 14-17), eight adolescents with reading disorder (ages 12-17), and four adolescents with both reading disorder and ADHD (ages 14-18) who were scanned during both a methylphenidate and a placebo session. Fourteen healthy comparison subjects (ages 12-20) who were not given methylphenidate served as the primary comparison group.During the divided attention task, unmedicated subjects with ADHD or reading disorder recruited the left ventral basal ganglia significantly less than the healthy comparison subjects. Methylphenidate led to an increase in activation in this region but had no effect on task performance. Subjects with ADHD also recruited the middle temporal gyrus significantly less than the comparison subjects, but methylphenidate did not have a direct effect on activation in this region.These results suggest that ADHD is associated with abnormal processing in attentional networks, with specific dysfunction in striatal circuitry. Methylphenidate may act to normalize activity within this network.Combined ω3 and ω6 supplementation in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) refractory to methylphenidate treatment: a double-blind, placebo-controlled study.Children (6-12 years) with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) being treated with methylphenidate and standard behavior therapy for more than 6 months, whose parents reported no improvement in behavior and academic learning, were randomly assigned to receive supplementation with a combined ω3 and ω6 preparation or a placebo. Outcome was measured at 3 and 6 months after treatment using a self-assessment checklist completed by the parents. Statistically significant improvement was found in the treatment group compared with the placebo group (P < .01) in the following measures: restlessness, aggressiveness, completing work, and academic performance. Statistically significant improvement was not found at 3 months of treatment between groups but was evident at 6 months of treatment (P < .05) with inattention, impulsiveness, and cooperation with parents and teachers. Distractibility failed to show improvement. Effect sizes ranged from 0.3 to 1.1 at 3 months and 0.2 to 1.4 at 6 months for individual symptom variables.Long-term methylphenidate therapy in children with comorbid attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder and chronic multiple tic disorder.This study examined changes in attention-deficit hyperactivity (ADHD) behaviors and motor and vocal tics during long-term treatment with methylphenidate.Thirty-four prepubertal children with ADHD and chronic multiple tic disorder (who had participated in an 8-week, double-blind, placebo-controlled methylphenidate evaluation) were evaluated at 6-month intervals for 2 years as part of a prospective, nonblind, follow-up study. Treatment effects were assessed using direct observations of child behavior in a simulated (clinic-based) classroom and behavior rating scales completed by parents and physician. Videotapes of the simulated classroom were scored by coders who were blind to treatment status.There was no evidence (group data) that motor tics or vocal tics changed in frequency or severity during maintenance therapy compared with diagnostic or initial double-blind placebo evaluations. Behavioral improvements demonstrated during the acute drug trial were maintained during follow-up. There was no evidence (group data) of clinically significant adverse drug effects on cardiovascular function or growth at the end of 2 years of treatment.Long-term treatment with methylphenidate seems to be safe and effective for the management of ADHD behaviors in many (but not necessarily all) children with mild to moderate tic disorder. Nevertheless, careful clinical monitoring is mandatory to rule out the possibility of drug-induced tic exacerbation in individual patients.An objective measure of methylphenidate response: clinical use of the MCA.Selegiline in the treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder in children: a double blind and randomized trial.Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is a common disorder of childhood that affects 3% to 6% of school-age children. Conventional stimulant medications are recognized by both specialists and parents as useful symptomatic treatment. Nevertheless, approximately 30% of ADHD children treated with them do not respond adequately or cannot tolerate the associated adverse effects. Such difficulties highlight the need for alternative safe and effective medications in the treatment of this disorder. Selegiline is a type B monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI) that is metabolized to amphetamine and methamphetamine stimulant compounds that may be useful in the treatment of ADHD. The authors undertook this study to further evaluate, under double-blind and controlled conditions, the efficacy of selegiline for ADHD in children. A total of 28 children with ADHD as defined by DSM IV were randomized to selegiline or methylphenidate dosed on an age and weight-adjusted basis at selegiline 5 mg/day (under 5 years) and 10 mg/day (over 5 years) (Group 1) and methylphenidate 1 mg/kg/day (Group 2) for a 4-week double-blind clinical trial. The principal measure of the outcome was the Teacher and Parent ADHD Rating Scale. Patients were assessed by a child psychiatrist at baseline, 14 and 28 days after the medication started. No significant differences were observed between the two protocols on the Parent and Teacher Rating Scale scores. Although the number of dropouts in the methylphenidate group was higher than in the selegiline group, there was no significant difference between the two protocols in terms of the dropouts. Decreased appetite, difficulty falling asleep and headaches were observed more in the methylphenidate group. The results of this study must be considered preliminary, but they do suggest that selegiline may be beneficial in the treatment of ADHD. In addition, a tolerable side effect profile may be considered as one of the advantages of selegiline in the treatment of ADHD.Variability of response time as a predictor of methylphenidate treatment response in korean children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.Methylphenidate (MPH) is an effective medication for the treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). However, about 30% of patients do not respond to or are unable to tolerate MPH. Based on previous findings, we hypothesized that great variability in response time (RT) among Korean children with ADHD on a computerized continuous performance attention test would be related to poor MPH treatment response.Children (ages 6-18 years) with ADHD were recruited for a prospective 12-week, open-labeled, multicenter study to examine optimal dosage of OROS methylphenidate. Of the 144 subjects selected, 28 dropped out due to adverse events, medication noncompliance, or follow-up loss, and an additional 26 subjects with comorbid disorders were excluded from statistical analyses. We defined 'responders' as subjects who received a score of less than 18 on the attention deficit hyperactivity disorder rating scale (ARS; Korean version, K-ARS) and a score of 1 or 2 on the Clinical Global Impression-Improvement scale (CGI-I). RT variability was assessed with the ADHD diagnostic system (ADS).Fifty-nine (67%) subjects responded to MPH treatment. The non-responders showed greater RT variability at baseline (Mann Whitney U = 577.0, p < 0.01). Baseline RT variability was a significant predictor of MPH response (Nagelkerke R(2) = 0.136, p < 0.01). It predicted 94.9% of responder, 17.2% of non-responder and 69.3% of overall group.High RT variability may predict poor response to MPH treatment in children with ADHD.12-month efficacy and safety of OROS MPH in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder switched from MPH.The aim of this study was to evaluate long-term clinical treatment with OROS methylphenidate (MPH) (Concerta) in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) who had been previously treated with immediate release (IR) MPH.Subjects aged 6-16 years (n=105) who were stable on IR MPH (10-60 mg/day) were switched to 18, 36 or 54 mg OROS MPH once daily for 21 days, depending on prestudy MPH dose. Subjects who benefited from OROS MPH could continue in a 12-month extension period. ADHD symptoms and treatment response were assessed by parents/caregivers and investigators.Out of 105 enrolled children, 101 completed the 21-day treatment phase. In all, 89 parents/caregivers (88.1%) wanted their child to continue with the study treatment into the extension phase, and 56 children (63 %) completed the 1-year trial. The parent/caregiver global assessment of satisfaction ranged from 49 to 69% during the extension phase, and 49 to 71% of investigators rated the treatment as adequate. Efficacy and satisfaction were found more commonly in patients in the older age group (10-16 years), those on a higher dose (36 mg or 54 mg) and with the predominantly inattentive ADHD subtype. OROS MPH was well tolerated.Children and adolescents can effectively and safely be switched from IR MPH to OROS MPH with improved symptom control and compliance.Risperidone Versus Methylphenidate in Treatment of Preschool Children With Attention-Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder.Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD) is a common psychiatric diagnosis among preschool children.The aim of this study was to examine the Risperidone treatment compared to Methylphenidate (MPH) in preschool children with ADHD.Thirty three outpatient preschool children, aged 3-6 years, diagnosed with ADHD (The diagnosis of ADHD was established by two child and adolescent psychiatrists according to the DSM-IV-TR criteria), participated in a 6-week, double-blind clinical trial with risperidone (0.5-1.5 mg/d) and methylphenidate (5-20 mg/d), in two divided doses. Treatment outcomes were assessed using the Parent ADHD Rating Scale and Conners Rating Scale. Patients were assessed by a child psychiatrist at baseline, 2, 4 and 6 weeks after the medication started. Side effects were also rated by side effects questionnaire.There were no significant differences between the two protocols on the Parent ADHD Rating Scale scores (P > 0.05) and Parent Conners Rating Scale scores (P > 0.05). Both groups showed a significant improvement in ADHD symptoms over the 6 weeks of treatment for parent ADHD Rating Scale (P < 0.001) and Parent Conners Rating Scale (P < 0.001). The most common adverse effects seen with risperidone were daytime drowsiness and anorexia (20%), and with methylphenidate it was anorexia (55%).Results of this study show that risperidone may be effective and well tolerated for ADHD in preschool children, but more researches are needed to clarify the potential benefits and adverse effects in long term use and comorbid conditions.Tryptophan antagonism of stimulant-induced tics.Association of the adrenergic alpha2A receptor gene with methylphenidate improvement of inattentive symptoms in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Preclinical studies have demonstrated the relevance of adrenergic alpha2A receptor on the attentional process and the mechanism of action of methylphenidate hydrochloride. Several molecular genetic investigations suggest a role for the adrenergic alpha2A receptor gene (ADRA2A) in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), especially in the inattentive dimension. However, the effect of ADRA2A in the response to methylphenidate in humans has not been previously investigated, to our knowledge.To evaluate the association between the ADRA2A -1291 C>G polymorphism and the clinical response to methylphenidate treatment in children and adolescents with ADHD.A pharmacogenomic study was undertaken between November 1, 2002, and May 1, 2004, using a nonrandom assignment, quasi-experimental design.An ADHD outpatient program at a university hospital in Brazil. Patients One hundred six patients consecutively diagnosed as having ADHD were genotyped for the ADRA2A -1291 C>G polymorphism and were included in the analyses. Intervention Short-acting methylphenidate administered in increasing dosages until no further clinical improvement was detected or until limited adverse effects occurred.The primary outcome measure was the parent-rated inattentive subscale of the Swanson, Nolan, and Pelham Scale version IV. Secondary outcome measures included the Barkley Side Effect Rating Scale and the parent-rated hyperactivity-impulsivity subscale of the Swanson, Nolan, and Pelham Scale version IV. Scales were applied by child psychiatrists blinded to genotype at baseline and at 1 and 3 months of treatment.A significant interaction effect between the presence of the G allele and treatment with methylphenidate over time on inattentive scores was detected during the 3 months of treatment (n = 106; F(2,198) = 4.30; P = .02).We documented the effect of the G allele at the ADRA2A -1291 C>G polymorphism on the improvement of inattentive symptoms with methylphenidate treatment in children and adolescents with ADHD. Our findings provide clinical evidence for the involvement of the noradrenergic system in the modulation of methylphenidate action.Multisite controlled study of OROS methylphenidate in the treatment of adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Despite the persistence of attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) into adolescence, little is known about the efficacy and tolerability of stimulant medications in this age group.To report the results of a multisite controlled study among adolescents with ADHD evaluating the efficacy and tolerability of osmotic-release oral system (OROS) methylphenidate.Adolescents (N = 220) having a confirmed Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition diagnosis of ADHD underwent dose titration to identify dosages of OROS methylphenidate that improved symptoms to predefined criteria. Subjects successfully completing the dose titration phase (n = 177) (ie, tolerated and responded to treatment and adhered to the protocol) were randomized to receive 2 weeks' treatment with their individualized dosage of OROS methylphenidate (18, 36, 54, or 72 mg once daily) or placebo. Treatment effectiveness was measured using investigator, parent, and adolescent assessments of ADHD.A significant reduction from baseline in the investigator-rated ADHD Rating Scale, the primary efficacy measure, was found with OROS methylphenidate treatment compared with placebo. Similar findings were noted with parent- and adolescent-report measures. Based on a Clinical Global Impression improvement subscale score of much or very much improved, 52% of subjects in the OROS methylphenidate group improved compared with 31% receiving placebo. Thirty-seven percent of subjects required the maximum dosage of 72 mg/d. The incidence of drug-related adverse events was similar between the 2 study groups.In adolescents, once-daily OROS methylphenidate significantly reduced ADHD symptoms and was well tolerated using dosages up to 72 mg/d.Moderators and mediators of treatment response for children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder: the Multimodal Treatment Study of children with Attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Intent-to-treat analyses of the study revealed that medication management, alone or combined with intensive behavioral treatment, was superior to behavioral treatment and community care in reducing attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) symptoms; but only combined treatment showed consistently greater benefit than community care across other outcome domains (disruptive and internalizing symptoms, achievement, parent-child relations, and social skills). We examine response patterns in subgroups defined by baseline variables (moderators) or variables related to treatment implementation (mediators).We reconducted random-effects regression (RR) analyses, adding factors defined by moderators (sex, prior medication use, comorbid disruptive or anxiety disorder, and public assistance) and a mediator (treatment acceptance/attendance).Study outcomes (N = 579) were upheld in most moderator subgroups (boys and girls, children with and without prior medication, children with and without comorbid disruptive disorders). Comorbid anxiety disorder did moderate outcome; in participants without anxiety, results paralleled intent-to-treat findings. For those with anxiety disorders, however, behavioral treatment yielded significantly better outcomes than community care (and was no longer statistically different from medication management and combined treatment) regarding ADHD-related and internalizing symptoms. In families receiving public assistance, medication management yielded decreased closeness in parent-child interactions, and combined treatment yielded relatively greater benefits for teacher-reported social skills. In families with high treatment acceptance/attendance, intent-to-treat results were upheld. Acceptance/attendance was particularly important for medication treatments. Finally, two thirds of children given community care received stimulants. Behavioral treatment did not significantly differ from, but medication management was superior to, this subgroup.Exploratory analyses revealed that our study (the Multimodal Treatment Study of Children With Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder [MTA]) results were confirmed across most baseline variables and treatment acceptance/attendance. In children with ADHD plus anxiety, behavioral treatment surpassed community care and approached medication-based treatments regarding parent-reported ADHD symptoms.Motor skills of children newly diagnosed with Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder prior to and following treatment with stimulant medication.Motor difficulties are common in children with Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD). Although preliminary evidence has suggested that methylphenidate can improve the motor skills in children with ADHD and Developmental Coordination Disorder (DCD), the effect of stimulant medication on motor performance in children newly diagnosed with ADHD with or without motor impairment remains unclear. A cohort study of 49 medication-naïve children (39 male; mean age 8.4±1.3 years) with ADHD was conducted. Children were evaluated using the Movement Assessment Battery for Children and the developmental test of visual motor integration at diagnosis and again three months following daily treatment with a stimulant medication. Motor difficulties were highly present at baseline (73.5%) but resolved in a subset after treatment with stimulant medication, suggesting that their motor difficulties may be attributed in part to their attentional problems. Nevertheless, motor impairment persisted in 55.1% of the sample. The severity of the behavioural symptoms was significantly associated with balance skills in children without motor impairments (r(2)=0.30, p<0.01) and with visual motor integration skills in children with persisting motor difficulties (r(2)=0.27, p<0.01). Attentional difficulties negatively affect the motor skills of children with ADHD. Following the use of stimulant medication, an important subset continued to demonstrate motor difficulties. The improvement in behaviour was insufficient to resolve motor problems and these children should therefore be targeted for rehabilitation services.Growth and pubertal development of adolescent boys on stimulant medication for attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.To investigate the growth and pubertal attainment of boys with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) on stimulant medication.Longitudinal study of boys aged 12.00-15.99 years at recruitment in 2005-2011, with stimulant-treated ADHD for at least 3 years, attending three paediatric practices (subjects), compared with longitudinal data from 174 boys from the Nepean longitudinal study (controls).Subjects' growth parameters before treatment were compared with controls aged 7 or 8 years; growth parameters and longitudinal changes on treatment to ages 12.00-13.99 and 14.00-15.99 years were compared with controls reviewed at 13 and 15 years of age, respectively. The subjects' pubertal staging and height velocity were related to their treatment history.Sixty-five subjects were recruited; mean duration of treatment was 6.3 ± 1.9 years. At baseline, their growth parameters were not significantly different from those of the controls after adjusting for age. Compared with the controls, after adjusting for current age and baseline growth parameter z score, subjects aged 12.00-13.99 years had significantly lower weight and body mass index (P < 0.01), and those aged 14.00-15.99 years had significantly lower height and weight (P < 0.05). At 12.00-13.99 years of age, the subjects were comparable to the controls in their pubertal development adjusted for age, but those aged 14.00-15.99 years reported significant delay (mean Tanner stage, 3.6 for subjects v 4.0 for controls; P < 0.05). The dose of medication was inversely correlated with the height velocity from baseline to 14.00-15.99 years of age (P < 0.05).Prolonged treatment (more than 3 years) with stimulant medication was associated with a slower rate of physical development during puberty. To maintain adequate height velocity during puberty, we recommend keeping the dose as low as possible.Comments on 'Cytogenetic effects in children treated with methylphenidate' by El-Zein et al.Methylphenidate effects on task-switching performance in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.To examine the specificity of methylphenidate effects on the processes that support the ability to rapidly and accurately coordinate the performance of multiple tasks in children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).Twenty children with ADHD performed the task-switching paradigm while on and off medication. The paradigm involves switching between two different tasks, discriminating the value of a number presented on a computer screen and deciding how many numbers were present on the screen. The children also performed single-task control conditions.Analyses of variance indicated the medication selectively enhanced the children's ability to rapidly and accurately switch between tasks and to focus attention on the currently relevant response set.This study helps to elucidate the nature of methylphenidate effects on the cognitive processes which support the ability to coordinate the performance of multiple tasks. Medication appears to selectively enhance inhibitory processes which support task-switching.Music and video as distractors for boys with ADHD in the classroom: comparison with controls, individual differences, and medication effects.This study examined the effects of music and video on the classroom behavior and performance of boys with and without attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and examined the effects of 0.3 mg/kg methylphenidate (MPH). In one study, 41 boys with ADHD and 26 controls worked in the presence of no distractor, music, or video. Video produced significant distraction, particularly for the boys with ADHD, and MPH improved the performance of boys with ADHD across distractor conditions.There were individual differences in response to the music such that some boys were adversely affected and others benefited relative to no-distractor.In a second study, music and MPH were assessed in an additional 86 boys with ADHD to examine further the music results. In the presence or absence of music, MPH improved performance relative to placebo. Similar individual differences were found as in Experiment 1.Association of a carboxylesterase 1 polymorphism with appetite reduction in children and adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder treated with methylphenidate.Carboxylesterase 1 is the enzyme involved in methylphenidate (MPH) metabolism. The aim of this study was to evaluate the association between a -75 T>G polymorphism and appetite reduction in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). A sample of 213 children with ADHD was investigated. The primary outcome was appetite reduction measured by the Barkley Stimulant Side Effect Rating Scale applied at baseline, at 1 and 3 months of treatment. MPH doses were augmented until no further clinical improvement or significant adverse events occurred. The G allele presented a trend for association with appetite reduction scores (P=0.05). A significant interaction between the G allele and treatment over time for appetite reduction scores was also observed (P=0.03). The G allele carriers presented a higher risk for appetite reduction worsening when compared with T allele homozygotes (odds ratio=3.47, P=0.01). The present results suggest an influence of carboxylesterase 1 -75 T>G polymorphism on the worsening of appetite reduction with MPH treatment in youths with ADHD. Immediate effects of methylphenidate on cognitive attention skills of children with attention-deficit-hyperactivity disorder.This study investigated the immediate effects of stimulant medication (methylphenidate) on cognitive attention processes in children with attention-deficit-hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). Thirteen males and two females (mean age 9 y 5 mo, SD 18.3 mo) with a diagnosis of ADHD and who were to be prescribed methylphenidate were assessed twice on one day with the Test of Everyday Attention for Children, a neuropsychological battery designed to tap different aspects of cognitive attention. Between assessments, the children were administered methylphenidate (10 mg). Each child had at least average intelligence (IQ 80 or over, as measured by the Wechsler Intelligence Scale for Children-III UK) and was on no other medication. A group of 16 children, who were matched for age, sex, and intelligence, also performed the cognitive tests twice on the same day to control for practice effects of testing. At the first assessment, children with ADHD demonstrated significant impairments in several aspects of cognitive attention in comparison with the control group, particularly sustained attention. After administration of methylphenidate for the children with ADHD, they showed significant improvements in their performance on measures of cognitive attention compared to controls. The immediate effects of methylphenidate and the significance of measuring cognitive aspects of attention as well as behavioural measures are discussed.Exploring the impact of once-daily OROS® methylphenidate (MPH) on symptoms and quality of life in children and adolescents with ADHD transitioning from immediate-release MPH.To explore the clinical and health-related quality of life (HRQoL) outcomes in children/adolescents with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) who required a therapy switch from immediate-release (IR) methylphenidate (MPH) and were initiated on Osmotic Release Oral System (OROS(®)) MPH.Prospective, noninterventional study including patients (aged 6-18 years) with a confirmed diagnosis of ADHD who transitioned from IR MPH to OROS(®) MPH based on medical needs. Patients were transitioned to OROS(®) MPH and were followed for 12 weeks. Attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder symptoms, functional outcomes, HRQoL, and tolerability were assessed throughout the study.598 patients entered the intention-to-treat analysis. The mean OROS(®) MPH starting dose was 29.5 ± 12.0 mg/day, increasing slightly to 33.5 ± 13.2 mg/day at final visit. Compared with baseline, there were significant (all P < 0.0001) symptomatic, functional, and HRQoL improvements after transitioning from IR MPH to OROS(®) MPH as assessed by the Conners' Parent Rating Scale (from 29.0 ± 10.5 to 19.5 ± 11.1), Children's Global Assessment Scale (by 11.0 ± 13.3), and Inventory for Assessing Quality of Life (ILC) LQ0-28 scores (parents' rating from 17.2 ± 3.9 to 19.4 ± 4.0; patients' rating from 18.7 ± 4.0 to 20.5 ± 3.9). Overall, no significant changes in quality of sleep or appetite were observed. More than 70% of parents and physicians rated the effectiveness of OROS(®) MPH as at least "good" and were at least "satisfied" with OROS(®) MPH. The most common treatment-emergent adverse events were insomnia and anorexia. No clinically relevant changes in body weight or vital signs were observed.In this naturalistic setting, transitioning from IR MPH to OROS(®) MPH, in patients who showed previously insufficient response and/or poor tolerability, was successful. Patients' and parents' HRQoL as well as burden of disease showed a clinically relevant improvement. OROS(®) MPH was generally safe and well tolerated.Once-daily multilayer-release methylphenidate in a double-blind, crossover comparison to immediate-release methylphenidate in children with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the comparative efficacy and safety of a novel long-duration multilayer-release (MLR) methylphenidate (MPH) formulation and immediate-release (IR) MPH in attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) children.This study was a randomized, double-blind, crossover comparison of once-daily MLR and twice-daily IR-MPH in home and school settings in children with a Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th edition (DSM-IV) diagnosis of ADHD. Patients completed a 1-week baseline followed by two active medication titration phases. Each phase of treatment was 1-4 weeks of titration with an additional stable dose week. The final dose was based on efficacy and adverse events for each patient. Efficacy measures included Clinical Global Impressions (CGI) and Conners' Parent and Teacher Rating Scales (CPRS and CTRS). The Clinical Assessment of Side Effects (CASE) scale assessed frequency of adverse events.Of the 90 enrolled patients, aged 6.4-17.5 years, 79 (88%) completed the study. Stable daily doses were 32.0 and 32.5 mg for MLR and IR-MPH, respectively. All efficacy parameters were significantly improved from baseline. A total of 73.2% and 81.0% of patients on MLR and IR-MPH were rated as "much" or "very much improved" on the CGI. A total of 77.4% and 81.1% of patients were normalized on the CPRS-R and 78.9 and 90.4% of patients were normalized on the CTRS-R for MLR and IR-MPH, respectively. The mean CASE score was not different from baseline for either treatment.Parental quality of life and depressive mood following methylphenidate treatment of children with attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder.This naturalistic study investigated the associations between quality of life and depressive mood in parents and symptom changes in attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) children.At baseline and at weeks 4 and 8, the parents evaluated their children, who were receiving treatment with osmotic-release oral system methylphenidate (mean dosage 36.3 ± 15.5 mg/day), using the Swanson, Nolan, and Pelham - Fourth Edition (SNAP-IV-18) scale. The parents evaluated themselves using the Beck Depression Inventory (BDI) and the World Health Organization Quality of Life Assessment, Brief Version (WHOQOL-BREF).A significant reduction in SNAP-IV-18 scores and improvements in parental BDI scores and parental WHOQOL-BREF scores were observed. The decrease in BDI scores from baseline to 8 weeks was significantly associated with increases in WHOQOL-BREF sub-domain scores from baseline to 8 weeks, with a greater decrease at 4 weeks and after. The decrease in the SNAP-IV-18 hyperactivity-impulsivity score was significantly associated with increases in WHOQOL social sub-domain scores from baseline to 8 weeks. For those patients who showed a 25% or greater decrease in the SNAP-IV-18 total scores from baseline to 8 weeks, the decreases in the SNAP-IV-18 total score and in the inattention and hyperactivity-impulsivity scores were significantly associated with a decrease in BDI scores from baseline to 8 weeks.Methylphenidate treatment for ADHD was associated with both symptom alleviation in children with ADHD and improvement in parental depressive mood and quality of life, suggesting that the effects of treatment could go beyond symptom improvement in ADHD.Sudden hearing loss associated with methylphenidate therapy.An 8-year-old child diagnosed with attention deficit/hyperactivity disorder presented to our Department of Otolaryngology 4 days after suffering hearing loss, loss of balance, tinnitus, and fullness sensation of the left ear. Her symptoms occured with the first dose of methylphenidate. The medical history and physical examination revealed no other diseases associated with sudden hearing loss. The audiogram revealed a total hearing loss on the left ear. Stapedial reflexes, distortion product and transient-evoked otoacoustic emissions were absent in left ear. The absence of clinical, laboratory and radiological evidence of a possible cause for complaints, an association between methylphenidate and sudden hearing loss was suggested. The patient received a standard course of oral corticosteroid and hyperbaric oxygen therapy. Weekly otological and audiological examinations were performed. Conservative and medical treatments offered no relief from hearing loss. Sudden hearing loss is a serious and irreversible adverse effect of methylphenidate. Therefore, the risk of hearing loss should be taken into consideration when initiating methylphenidate therapy.Long-term effects of methylphenidate transdermal delivery system treatment of ADHD on growth.To examine the long-term effects of the methylphenidate transdermal system (MTS) on the growth of children being treated for attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder.Height, weight, and body mass index (BMI) were measured in 127 children ages 6 to 12 at longitudinal assessments for up to 36 months of treatment with MTS. These data were compared with norms provided by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.MTS treatment was associated with small but significant delays in growth for height, weight, and BMI. The latter two indices were affected in a dose-dependent manner. Children who had not received prior stimulant therapy and children who entered the study with above-average height, weight, and BMI were most likely to experience growth deficits during the trial. Effects on all parameters of growth were most apparent during the first year of treatment, and attenuated over time.Consistent with prior studies of methylphenidate, our results suggest that treatment with MTS can lead to reductions in expected height, weight, and BMI that show some attenuation over the course of treatment. Growth of patients with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder treated with MTS should be closely monitored, but in this study, deficits in growth in relation to MTS treatment were not a significant clinical concern for most children.